15978603
MaryAnne_Tebedo
MaryAnne Geivett Tebedo (born October 30, 1936 in Colorado) was a Colorado State Senator from Springs. From 1982 through 1988 Tebedo served as a Republican in the House of Representatives, and was elected to the Colorado State Senate in 1988. Tebedo completed her legislative career on December 31, 2001 pursuant to limits. Tebedo chaired two Senate committees, the Local Government Committee and the State, Military and Veterans Affairs Committee, and served on eight legislative committees. Legislation she sponsored dealt with early education through college, transportation, energy and mining, local government affairs, National Guard, state finance, constitution and elections, large and small business and labor affairs, and the environment.Colorado Springs Gazette columnist Ralph Routon wrote a series of columns supporting the idea of placing all of Colorado on year-round saving time in order to save state residents the aggravation of resetting their clocks every six months.(Routon mentions in his original column, Lets Make Daylight Time Year-Round Gazette, The (Colorado Springs), 23 October 1999, several other beneficial effects, at least to himself)  The idea gathered noticeable popular support within Colorado Springs, and attention of the states larger newspapers,(said attention being negative, as Ed Quillen savaged the plan in his articleThe Plot to Eliminate the Mountain Time Zone, Denver Post, 7 November 1999,) but when then state Senator MaryAnne Tebedo attempted to present the idea to the state legislature, her research uncovered Federal laws forbidding the state-initiated extension of daylight saving time.  Still determined to relieve Coloradans of the need to change their clocks, Tebedo introduced the only bill legally permitted to her: a proposal to exempt the state of Colorado from DST.  The bill failed to escape committee during the 2000 legislative session.(Year-round Daylight Time is Not an Option Gazette, The (Colorado Springs), 29 January, 2000: Routon mentions Tebedos intent to introduce the bill)  She also stunned fellow senators by stating that teen pregnancy drops off significantly after age 25. http://www.csindy.com/colorado/10-republicans-whove-kept-us-in-business/Content?oid1120066MaryAnne is the mother of Tebedo, a former Executive Director of the organization for Family Values.References(External links*http://www.maryannetebedo.com/personal.htm*http://www.maryannetebedo.com/
15990862
Environmental_issues_in_the_United_States
thumb|right|Per capita anthropogenic greenhouse gas emissions by country for the year 2000 including land-use change.As with many other countries there are a number of issues in the States.IssuesClimate changeThe United States is the second largest emitter, after China, of dioxide from the burning of fuels.() The policy of the United States is widely debated; many call on the country to take a leading role in fighting warming.() The U.S. is one of only two countries that has not signed up to the Protocol.ConservationMany plant and animal species became extinct soon after first human settlement, including the North American megafauna; others have become nearly extinct since European settlement, among them the Bison and Condor.(Pleistocene Megafauna Extinctions)The last of the pigeons died in 1914 after being the most common bird in North America. They were killed as both a source of food and because they were a threat to farming. Saving the Eagle, the national bird of the U.S., from extinction was a notable conservation success.DeforestationEnergyright|300px|thumb|Satellite image showing the light output at night in the United StatesSince about 86% of all types of energy used in the United States are derived from fuel consumption it is closely linked to gas emissions and therefore climate change. The energy policy of the United States is determined by federal, state and local public entities, which address issues of energy production, distribution, and consumption, such as building codes and gas mileage standards.Invasive speciesMiningNuclearThe most notable accident involving power in the United States was the Mile Island accident in 1979. Nuclear Power Station has been the source of two of the top five most dangerous nuclear incidents in the States since 1979.( and )safety in the United States is governed by federal regulations and continues to be studied by the Regulatory Commission (NRC). The safety of nuclear plants and materials controlled by the U.S. government for research and weapons production, as well those powering naval vessels, is not governed by the NRC.The movement in the United States consists of more than eighty anti-nuclear groups which have acted to oppose nuclear power and/or weapons in the USA. The movement has delayed construction or halted commitments to build some new nuclear plants,((Lights Out at Shoreham: Anti-nuclear activism spurs the closing of a new $6 billion plant Newsday.com, undated.) and has pressured the Regulatory Commission to enforce and strengthen the safety regulations for nuclear power plants.(Jerry Brown and Rinaldo Brutoco (1997). Profiles in Power: The Anti-nuclear movement and the Dawn of the Solar Age, p. 198.)   Anti-nuclear campaigns that captured national public attention in the 1970s and 1980s involved the Cliffs Nuclear Power Plant, Station Nuclear Power Plant, Canyon Power Plant, Nuclear Power Plant, and Mile Island.(Giugni, Marco (2004).  Social Protest and Policy Change: Ecology, Antinuclear, and Peace Movements p. 44.)PesticidesPesticide use in the United States is predominately by the agricultural sector. and about a quarter of pesticides used are used in houses, yards, parks, golf courses, and swimming pools.The Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (FIFRA) was first passed in 1947, giving the United States Department of Agriculture responsibility for regulating pesticides. In 1972, FIFRA underwent a major revision and transferred responsibility of pesticide regulation to the Environmental Protection Agency and shifted emphasis to protection of the environment and public health.PollutionAir pollutionWater pollutionMarine pollutionSolid and hazardous wasteAt 760 kg per person the United States generates the greatest amount of municipal waste.(http://www.nationmaster.com/graph/env_mun_was_gen-environment-municipal-waste-generation Municipal waste generation)PopulationThe total U.S. population crossed the 100 million mark around 1915, the 200 million mark in 1967, and the 300 million mark in 2006 (estimated on Tuesday, October 17).()() The U.S. population more than tripled during the 20th century  a growth rate of about 1.3 percent a year  from about 76 million in 1900 to 281 million in 2000. This is unlike most countries, especially Germany, Russia, Italy and Greece, whose populations are slowly declining, and whose fertility rates are below replacement.Population growth is fastest among minorities, and according to the States Census Bureaus estimation for 2005, 45% of American children under the age of 5 are minorities.() In 2007, the nations minority population reached 102.5 million.(US Census Press Releases, U.S. Census Bureau) A year before, the minority population totaled 100.7 million. and Latino Americans accounted for almost half (1.4 million) of the national growth of 2.9 million between July 1, 2005, and July 1, 2006.()Based on a population clock maintained by the U.S. Census Bureau, the current U.S. population, as of 15:00 GMT (EST+5) February 14, 2010 is 308,683,012.() A 2004 U.S. Census Bureau report predicted an increase of one third by the year 2050.() A subsequent 2008 report projects a population of 439 million, which is a 44% increase from 2008.WasteEnvironmental movementIn the States today, the organized movement is represented by a wide range of organizations sometimes called organizations or NGOs. These organizations exist on local national and international scales. Environmental NGOs vary widely in political views and in the amount they seek to influence the government. The environmental movement today consists of both large national groups and also many smaller local groups with local concerns. Some resemble the old U.S. conservation movement - whose modern expression is the Nature Conservancy, Audubon Society and National Geographic Society - American organizations with a worldwide influence.See also*Domestic policy of the George W. Bush administration - Environment*of environmental issues*controversy*in the United States*States offshore drilling debate*pollution in the United StatesReferencesExternal links*Calculate the ecological footprint of your household: Low Impact Living
15999593
Sosensky
File:Coat of Arms of Sosensky (Kaluga oblast).png|thumb|right|150px|The of arms of SosenskySosensky () is a town in District of Oblast, Russia, located in the southeastern part of the oblast,  southwest of Kaluga, the center of the oblast, and  from Kozelsk, the administrative center of the district. Population: It was founded in April 1952 as the coal-mining settlement of Tsentralny Kozelskogo Stroyupravleniya (). On January 27, 1954 it was granted settlement status and renamed Leninsky (); however, for an unknown reason it was renamed Shepelevsky () on April 5, 1954, and finally Sosensky on April 10, 1954. It was granted town status in 1991.ReferencesExternal links*Official website of Sosenskyar:de:Sossenskieo:Sosenskijfa:fr:Sossenskija:no:Sosenskijnn:Sosenskijru:tl:Sosenskywar:Sosenskydiq:Sosenskyzh:
16013077
Trade_unions_in_Ethiopia
The unions of Ethiopia have a total membership of approximately 300,000.(Education International Barometer of Human & Trade Union Rights in Education (accessed 14 May 2008)) Over 203,000 are members of the of Ethiopian Trade Unions (CETU). Ethiopia has also ratified ILO conventions 29 (in 2003), 87 (1963), 98 (1963), 100 (1999), 105 (1999), 111 (1966), 138 (1999), and 182 (2003).(Annual Survey of violations of trade union rights: Ethiopia, International Trade Union Confederation website (accessed 14 May 2008))HistoryAn organized labor movement came late to Ethiopia. This was due, in part, to the small size of its industrial working force (which was estimated to number 15,583 in 1957), but more importantly because the Ethiopian government viewed any type of organized protest as a form of insurrection.(Edmond J. Keller, Revolutionary Ethiopia: From Empire to Peoples Republic (Bloomington: Indiana University Press, 1991), p. 147.)Although the 1955 constitution guaranteed the right to form workers associations, it was not until 1962 that the Ethiopian government issued the Labor Relations Decree, which authorized trade unions. In April 1963, the imperial authorities recognized the of Ethiopian Labor Unions (CELU), which represented twenty-two industrial labor groups. By 1973 CELU had 167 affiliates with approximately 80,000 members, which represented only about 30 percent of all eligible workers.(Wubne, Mulatu. Labor Unions. A Country Study: Ethiopia (Thomas P. Ofcansky and LaVerle Berry, editors). of Congress Research Division (1991). This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the domain.http://lcweb2.loc.gov/frd/cs/about.html.) The CELU drew its membership from not only the railway workers, but included workers at the Addis Ababa Fiber Mills, Indo-Ethiopian Textiles, Sugar Plantation, Airlines and General Ethiopian Transport (also known as the Anbassa Bus Company).(Bahru Zewde, A History of Modern Ethiopia, second edition (London: James Currey, 2001),p. 200)CELU never evolved into a national federation of unions. Instead, it remained an association of labor groups organized at the local level. The absence of a national constituency, coupled with other problems such as corruption, embezzlement, election fraud, ethnic and regional discrimination, and inadequate finances, prevented CELU from challenging the status quo in the industrial sector. Further, both management and government officials treated the unions with contempt. As Keller notes, The government was slow to revise archaic labor laws such as those which dealt with labor and the wage. Union leaders were harassed, and when unions threatened to strike, they were locked out.(Keller, Revolutionary Ethiopia, p. 148.) CELU had organized general strikes in 1964, and 1970, but each time failed to attract necessary widespread support.(Keller, Revolutionary Ethiopia, p. 177.) After 1972 CELU became more militant as drought and famine caused the death of up to 200,000 people. The government responded by using force to crush labor protests, strikes, and demonstrations.( This militancy peaked with the successful general strike of 711 March 1975, which not only led to salary and pension increases, but played an important role in the Revolution and helped to discredit the regime of Emperor Haile Selassie.(Keller, Revolutionary Ethiopia, pp. 177f.)Although many of its members supported the overthrow of Emperor Haile Selassie, the CELU came to ally itself with the radical intelligentsia in pressuring the Derg to share power. The CELU also demanded shop-floor control over production.(Keller, Revolutionary Ethiopia, p. 218.) Despite numerous strikes in and around Ababa, which sometimes ended in bloody confrontations, on May 19, 1975, the Derg temporarily closed CELU headquarters on the grounds that the union needed to be reorganized. The military authorities also demanded that workers should elect their future leaders according to the aims and objectives of Ethiopian socialism. This order ostensibly did not rescind traditional workers rights, such as the right to organize freely, to strike, and to bargain collectively over wages and working conditions. Instead, the intent was to control the political activities of the CELU leadership. As expected, CELU rejected these actions and continued to demand democratic changes and civilian rights. After battling one another for most of the year, the Derg at last decreed a curfew and law on 30 September, and arrested 1,500 union members; although the CELU responded with a general strike, it failed to gather support in the main industrial sectors. As Rene Lafort concludes, The CELU was dead. The Labour Code promulgated on 6 December 1975 was its obituary.(Lefort, Ethiopia: An Heretical Revolution? translated by A.M. Berrett (London: Zed Press, 1983), p. 136)On 8 January 1977, the Derg replaced the CELU (abolished December 1975) with the Trade Union (AETU). The AETU had 1,341 local chapters, known as workers associations, with a total membership of 287,000, or twice as large as CELU had been. The government maintained that the AETUs purpose was to educate workers about the need to contribute their share to national development by increasing productivity and building socialism.(In 1978 the Derg replaced the AETU executive committee after charging it with political sabotage, abuse of authority, and failure to abide by the rules of centralism. In 1982 a further restructuring of the AETU occurred when Addis Ababa issued the Trade Unions Organization Proclamation. An uncompromising Marxist-Leninist document, this proclamation emphasized the need to enable workers to discharge their historical responsibility in building the national economy by handling with care the instruments of production as their produce, and by enhancing the production and proper distribution of goods and services. A series of meetings and elections culminated in a national congress in June 1982, at which the government replaced the leadership of the AETU. In 1986 the government renamed the AETU the Ethiopia Trade Union (ETU).(In 1983/84 the AETU claimed a membership of 313,434. The organization included nine industrial groups, the largest of which was manufacturing, which had accounted for 29.2 percent of the membership in 1982/83, followed by agriculture, forestry, and fishing with 26.6 percent, services with 15.1 percent, transportation with 8.1 percent, construction with 8.0 percent, trade with 6.2 percent, utilities with 3.7 percent, finance with 2.4 percent, and mining with 0.7 percent. A total of 35.6 percent of the members lived in Addis Ababa and another 18.0 percent in Shewa. Eritrea and Tigray accounted for no more than 7.5 percent of the total membership. By the late 1980s, the AETU had failed to regain the activist reputation its predecessors had won in the 1970s. According to one observer, this political quiescence probably indicated that the government had successfully co-opted the trade unions.(Current statusIn 2000 a private company dissolved its labor union after a disagreement between management and the workers. A total of 586 workers were expelled from the company, including union leaders. The Ethiopian government attempted to mediate the dispute, but the employer refused to cooperate; the case was expected to be referred to the Ministry of Labor and Social Affairs later that year.(Ethiopia: Country Reports on Human Rights Practices, Bureau of Democracy, Human Rights, and Labor, US State Department (accessed 9 July 2009))During 2008, the top management of the state-owned Printing Enterprise disagreed with its union over issues of worker compensation and unlawful termination. In late December a labor advisory board, composed of state ministers, representatives of the employees, the CETU, and Bole Printing Enterprise management, found that both sides were at fault and decided to reinstate the unlawful terminations of employees. The employees were expected to resume their duties.(2008 Human Rights Reports: Ethiopia, Bureau of Democracy, Human Rights, and Labor, US State Department (accessed 8 July 2009))See also*of EthiopiaReferencesin thiopien
16038923
Stockholm_during_the_Middle_Ages
Stockholm during the Ages is the period in the of Stockholm stretching from the foundation of the city c. 1250 to the end of the Union in 1523.  During this period, Stockholm still didnt fill up the small island Stadsholmen (the city islet) which today known as the Stockholm Old Town (Gamla stan), and as a consequence this article to some extent overlap stan. Foundation and initial growth stads ldsta sigill.png|thumb|Seal of Stockholm known from an imprint from 1296; most likely the citys first seal mentioned in a letter from 1281(Hall, p 21).The origin of Stockholm pre-dates its written history and how and why the city evolved in the mid-13th century is still disputed.  However, even though events during the 1250s and 1260s remain diffuse, if nothing else, the amount of surviving documents, such as letters and diaries, seem to indicate Stockholm rapidly grew to become the largest city in Sweden during the late 1270s and throughout the 1280s.  It is still disputed whether this development was a planned process initiated by the king and German merchants, or a rather spontaneous growth.  The lack of the perpendicular city plans and uniformly-sized blocks common in contemporary cities in Germany and Poland, seem to corroborate the latter.(Hall, p 43)Its reasonable to assume, Birger jarls primary interest when founding Stockholm, not only was to strengthen his own domestic and international position, but that he was also aiming at a general economic expansion.  As Sweden just had experienced more than 50 years of continuous warfare between rivalling political parties, it was at this time hardly able to produce the economical resources required to build an entire city. Furthermore, Sweden could not yet present a single city in the continental sense of the word, and it therefore seem unreasonable to assume the king could have been able to build a city from scratch by himself.  He did, however, achieve an agreement with Lbeck where he invited Germans to settle in Sweden as Swedes and promised them generous benefits if they did.  While no surviving document can confirm Stockholm was found, planned and built by Germans, their increasing presence in Swedish historical records coincide with the development of mining in Sweden.  So, whether Birger jarl truly is the founder of Stockholm or not, its initial growth undoubtedly starts with him.(Hall, p 46)The economic breakthrough, however, appear to have come during the end of the 13th century under the leadership of Magnus Laduls (1275-90).  Magnus not only strengthened the relations with Lbeck and the league but also increased Swedish influence over Gotland and Visby and stabilized the administration.  During his rein several trade centres were granted city privileges and, notwithstanding the word capital probably didnt exist in his vocabulary, he made Stockholm the de facto political centre and royal residence.  The castle and the protection it could offer, initiated by Birger jarl, was the prerequisite to create a medieval city of continental standard, but the organisation and financial strength to produce it came with Magnus.  An example of this is the city wall.  A large-scale enterprise of this magnitude could hardly have been produced by the burghers of the newly established city, and, as it is first mentioned in 1288, it must have been one of the project Magnus organized.(Hall, p 47) Kalmar Union Image:Sten Sture d.. intg i Stockholm (1864) mlning av Georg von Rosen.jpg|thumb|200px|Sten Sture the Elder enters Stockholm. Painting by von Rosen, 1864.During the turbulent closing era of the Swedish Ages, controlling Stockholm and its castle became crucial to anyone aspiring to rule the kingdom, and the city was therefore repeatedly subject to lengthy blockades and occasionally besieged by various Swedish-Danish fractions disputing the Union.  In 1471, Sture the Elder defeated I of Denmark at the of Brunkeberg only to lose the city to Hans of Denmark in 1497.  Sten Sture managed to size power again in 1501 which resulted in a Danish blockade lasting 1502-1509 and eventually a short peace.  Hans son II of Denmark continued the ambitions of his father and made failed attempts to conquer the city in 1517 and 1518, to finally besiege it and force Queen Gyllenstierna leading the resistance to capitulate in 1520.  In November the same year, archbishop Trolle crowned his allied Christian King of Sweden and together they had their common enemies, nobles and burghers of Stockholm, beheaded during the so called Bloodbath.  When King Gustav Vasa finally besieged and conquered the city three years later, an event which ended the Kalmar Union and the Swedish Middle Ages, he noted every second building in the city was abandoned.(Nilsson, pp 59-63) Population Image:Stora Gramunkegrand 5 detail March 2007.JPG|thumb|left|During the late Middle Ages, most buildings were made of brick, which gave the city its character. Some prominent faades were, however, painted red to accentuate their importance  like the restored faade of 5, Grmunkegrnd, also featuring several other aesthetic details.(Hall, p. 40)By the end of the 15th century, the population in Stockholm can be estimated to 5-7.000 people, which made it a relatively small town compared to several other contemporary cities, even in a medieval context. (Hamburg and Bremen ~20.000, Lbeck 25.000, Kln and London 40.000, and Paris 100.000.)  On the other hand, among the approximately forty cities in the Swedish kingdom, the second largest must have been either Kalmar or bo, none of which can have been a home to more than 1-2.000 inhabitants.  Of course, these estimations are very unreliable as there was no census in the modern sense, only tax rolls (skottebcker) enlisting individuals liable to taxation.  For example, it is well-known trade was dominated by Germans, and these tax rolls seem to indicate one third of the citys tax-paying population were Germans, most originating from Lbeck, Danzig, and Westphalia.  They were, however, most likely over-represented in these records as they formed an elite in the city centred around the southern square Jrntorget, while Finns, also believed to have been numerous in the city, are hard to discern in these records, especially as they often took Swedish names (i.e. Bengt instead of Pentti), but also because they in general had simpler duties and didnt necessarily pay taxes.  Furthermore, it is generally assumed no European city managed to reproduce its own population before the early 19th century and thus was dependent of people moving in. Considering medieval warfare and epidemics, the population must have fluctuated considerably.(Nilsson, pp 24-27) Trade kran mars 2007.JPG|thumb|150px|An old crane still hanging over the Jrntorget square reminds of the lively medieval marketplace.During the Middle Ages, export was administered mostly by German merchants who also dominated among the merchants in the city.  Most of the merchants were living by or near the squares Kornhamnstorg (Corn Harbour Square) and Jrntorget (Iron Square) on the southern corner of the city.  Regional peasantry supplied the city with food and raw materials, while the craftsmen in the city produced handicrafts, most of them living by the central square Stortorget or by the oldest two streets in Stockholm, the names of which still reflects their trade: Kpmangatan (Merchants Street) and Skomakargatan (Shoemakers Street) in the central part of the city.  Fishermen and carpenters dominated on the eastern waterfront, except the southern stretch which was located near the so called Cog Harbour (Koggahamnen) were the merchants large sea-going ships were moored.  In the western part of the city, along the thoroughfare Vsterlnggatan, lived a heterogeneous group of craftsmen, including butcher, smiths of all sorts, carpenters, bakers, etcetera  in short, it was the industrial city district.(Nilsson, pp 43-47)  The northern part of the island was occupied by the royal castle.A tax roll from 1460 enlists two groups of craftsmen identified by name; on one side 43 carpenters, 40 fishermen, 25 shoemakers, and 24 tailors  approximately 35 per cent of the population liable to taxation  and on the other side 17 master masons, 8 meat costermongers, 8 bakers, 8 brewers, and 7 butchers.  Of course, countless other men worked in the city but failed to reach into the tax rolls.  The same tax roll mentions 13 women with a profession: 4 brewers, 1 tailor, 1 brawn-maker, 1 bagpipe-maker, 2 seamstress, 3 weavers, and 1 blood-letter.  Lastly a group of 150 women not given a title appear in the records, but their intimate names was hardly meant to deny they were prostitutes: Anna svandunet the swan-down, Birgitta rdnacka (red-neck). Katarina papegojan (the parrot).  The most important crafts were organised in guilds intended both to guarantee the quality of items produced and ensure prices were favourable to the craftsmen.( See also * of Sweden (800-1521)* stan Notes  References *  (Gran Dahlbck p 17-72, Robert Sandberg p 75-184, Eva Eggeby and Klas Nyberg p 187-276.)* 
16052406
Hondeklip_Bay
footnotes               Hondeklip Bay (Afrikaans Hondeklipbaai, which translates as dog stone bay) is a coastal village in the Namakwa district of the Cape province of Africa. It lies about 95 km south west of the district capital Springbok.This village was originally used as a harbour to export copper ore from the mines around Springbok but was later surpassed by Nolloth, which had a safer harbour as well as a railway line.Today Hondeklip Bay is a popular regional holiday destination and serves the fishing and diamond-mining community.af:Hondeklipbaainl:Hondeklipbaairo:Hondeklipbaai
16078025
Uplift_modelling
Uplift modelling, also known as incremental modelling, true lift modelling, or net modelling is a new modelling technique that directly models the incremental impact of a treatment (such as a direct marketing action) on an individuals behavior.Uplift modelling has applications in relationship management for up-sell, cross-sell and retention modelling.  It has also been applied to medicine. Introduction Uplift modelling uses a randomized scientific control to not only measure the effectiveness of a marketing action but also to build a predictive model that predicts the incremental response to the marketing action. It is a new mining technique that has been applied predominantly in the financial services, telecommunications and retail direct marketing industries to up-sell, cross-sell, churn and retention activities.  Measuring uplift The uplift of a marketing campaign is usually defined as the difference in response rate between a treated group and a randomized control group. This allows a marketing team to isolate the effect of a marketing action and measure the effectiveness or otherwise of that individual marketing action. Honest marketing teams will only take credit for the incremental effect of their campaign. The table below shows the details of a campaign showing the number of responses and calculatedresponse rate for a hypothetical marketing campaign. This campaign would be defined as having a response rate uplift of 5%. It has created 50,000 incremental responses (100,000 - 50,000).  Traditional response modelling Traditional response modelling typically takes a group of treated customers and attempts to build a predictive model that separates the likely responders from the non-responders through the use of one of a number of modelling techniques. Typically this would use decision trees or analysis. This model would only use the treated customers to build the model. Uplift modelling In contrast uplift modelling uses both the treated and control customers to build a predictive modelthat focuses on the incremental response. To understand this type of model it is proposed that thereis a fundamental segmentation that separates customers into the following groups: * The Persuadables : customers who only respond to the marketing action because they were targeted* The Sure Things  : customers who would have responded whether they were targeted or not* The Lost Causes  : customers who will not respond irrespective of whether they are targeted* The Do Not Disturbs : customers who are less likely to respond because they were targetedThe only segment that provides true incremental responses is the Persuadables. Uplift modelling provides a scoring technique that can separate customers into the groups described above. Traditional response modelling often targets the Sure Things being unable to distinguish them from the Persuadables. Return on investment Because uplift modelling focuses on incremental responses only it provides very strong return on investment cases when applied to traditional demand generation and retention activities. For example by only targeting the persuadable customers in an outbound marketing campaign the contact costs and hence the return per unit spend can be dramatically improved.  Removal of negative effects One of the most effective uses of uplift modelling is in the removal of negative effects from retention campaigns. Both in the telecommunications and financial services industries often retention campaigns can trigger customers to cancel a contract or policy. Uplift modelling allows these customers, the Do Not Disturbs, to be removed from the campaign. Application to A/B and Multivariate Testing It is rarely the case that there is a single treatment and a control group. Often the treatment can be a variety of simple variations of a message or a multi-stage contact strategy that is classed as a single treatment. In the case of A/B or testing Uplift Modelling can help in understanding whether the variations in tests provide any significant uplift compared to other targeting criteria such as behavioural or demographic indicators.  History of uplift modelling The first appearance of true response modelling appears to be due to Radcliffe and Surry(N. J. Radcliffe & P. D. Surry. Differential response analysis: Modeling true response by isolating the effect of a single action.   Proceedings of Credit Scoring and Credit Control VI. Credit Research Centre, University of Edinburgh Management School (1999)). Victor Lo also published on this topic (Lo, V. S. Y.. (2002). The true lift model. ACM SIGKDD Explorations Newsletter.   Vol. 4 No. 2, 7886. 1) and more recently Radcliffe again (Radcliffe, N. J.   (2007).   Using Control Groups to Target on Predicted Lift: Building and Assessing Uplift Models, Direct Marketing Analytics Journal, Direct Marketing Association.)Radcliffe also provides a very useful frequently asked questions section on his web site (The Scientific Marketer FAQ on Uplift Modelling)Similar approaches have been explored in Medicine (Cai, T., Tian, L., Wong, P. H., Wei, L. J. (2009). Analysis of Randomized Comparative Clinical Trial Data for Personalized Treatment Selections. Harvard University Biostatistics Working Paper Series, Paper 97.) Notes and references  External links *Abby Johnson explains how it works in this video broadcast.de:Uplift-Modelluplift
16099963
Silverton_Tramway
thumb|300px|Sulphide Street railway station, the Silverton Tramway terminus in Broken Hill. It is now a museum.The Silverton Tramway was an Australian  long  gauge railway running from Cockburn on the Australian state border to Broken Hill in South Wales. Operating between 1888 and 1970 it served the mines of Broken Hill, and formed the link between the standard gauge South Wales Government Railways and the narrow gauge Australian Railways.() The line was owned and operated by the Tramway Company.HistoryInceptionThe Silverton Tramway was conceived as a way to transport ore from the newly discovered ore deposits at Silverton, to the smelters at Port Pirie, with the line later extended to Broken Hill with the discovery of that field.() The need for a private line was in part due to the NSW Government refusing to allow the South Australian Railways to complete their narrow gauge link across the border.( The Silverton Tramway Act was passed by New South Wales in 1886, permitting the narrow gauge line to be built.() The Act also permitted the New South Wales government to buy out the company and assets after 21 years, provided a payment of 21 times the average of the previous seven years, and that the Company could be obliged to alter the track gauge at any time at its own expense.(  The line was built in twelve months at a cost of 125,000 pounds.( )thumb|left|300px|Level crossing, SilvertonOnce opened, major traffic on the line included passengers, livestock, bullion, ore and concentrates.( In 1913, 844,477 tons of ore and concentrates were carried on the tramway and another 843,307 tons of other goods including coke, coal, timber, crude oil and livestock,( and by 1933 twenty locomotives were owned by the company, along with 660 goods wagons. Passenger services were operated by the South Australian Railways, who paid the Company to access the line,( the main passenger terminal in Broken Hill being at Sulphide Street.( ) By the 1950s the Company was also providing a shunting service on  of sidings in Broken Hill, and was also operating steam locomotives up to  long and weighting 97 tons, ordered from Beyer Peacock at the same time as the W Class locomotives.( locomotives were delivered from 1961, appearing in the yellow and blue colours some years later.Gauge conversionAfter the completion of the Railway, the Silverton Tramway and the South Australian line to Port Pirie was a missing link in an unbroken Sydney to Perth rail journey (Perth to Western Australia was the other). Moves towards conversion of the line to standard gauge were made with the passing of the Railway Standardisation Agreement Act of 1944, in which the New South Wales government would acquire the Silverton Tramway Company, then pass it to the South Australian Railway Commissioner.( This agreement lapsed, with a new one made in 1949, in which the Commonwealth would be responsible for the acquisition.The New South Wales government did not wish the Company to remain as a main line operator, or to purchase it themselves; while South Australian train crews were not happy to work trains across the state border due to a loss of favourable industrial conditions.(. When the Company purchased its diesel locomotives, a number of structures, including bridges, were modified to carry standard gauge, as the company ordered the wider bogies needed to operate on standard gauge(Roberts, L: Rails to Wealth; The Story of the Silverton Tramway Company 1886-1972 L E Roberts 1995 ISBN 0 646 26587 3). By 1967 the Silverton Tramway Company offered to build a standard gauge line for a fixed sum, and transfer the line to New South Wales soon after. This line would run from Cockburn to Broken Hill on an alignment that had some interaction with the existing Crystal Street station, but the Commonwealth Government rejected it as they wished for the line to be built on a totally new alignment away from the Company lines.( By 1968 South Australia believed that they would have gauge converted their portion of the line before the short section to Broken Hill was even finished.thumb|300px|Silverton Tramway, SilvertonDemiseThe standard gauge line was finally opened in 1970 on a new alignment which led directly to the New South Wales-operated Crystal Street station, taking one year and over $2 million more than if the Silverton proposal was carried out.( The Silverton Tramway Companys business was lost to the Australian Railways(, with the company closing its narrow gauge shortline business, and returning the permanent way to the Crown.()The company then reinvented itself as Rail, a short haul rail operator servicing the mining industry in and around Broken Hill. Since 1886 the company hauled some 90 million tonnes of bulk and general freight and 2.8 million passengers over an aggregate of 19 million kilometres (12 million miles).(ReferencesFurther reading* The Silverton Tramway (New South Wales). Light Railways (Summer 1968) Light Railways Research Society of Australia.See also*Rail
16126959
Dunkard_Creek
Dunkard Creek is a stream that flows through County, Pennsylvania and County, West Virginia near the towns of Mount Morris, Pennsylvania, and West Virginia.  It flows into the River near Dunkard, Pennsylvania, approximately three miles north of the Pennsylvania-West Virginia border.  Mason-Dixon Historical Park is located on the banks of Dunkard Creek in an area where the creek crosses the border three times in less than one mile.  The park grounds include Browns Hill, the westernmost site from which Mason and Dixon made astronomical observations during the original survey of the Pennsylvania-Maryland border in 1767.(Cope, Thomas D.  Degrees Along the West Line, the Parallel Between Maryland and Pennsylvania.  Proceedings of the American Philosophical Society 93 (May, 1949). p 129.)  The creek is named for members of the Dunkard sect, a pacifist, nonconformist group of Christians who settled in the region during the 18th century.In September 2009, Dunkard Creek suffered a massive kill resulting in the death of more than 160 species of fish, salamanders and endangered mussels in the creek.  The West Virginia Department of Environmental Protection determined that an bloom was responsible for the loss.(http://www.wvpubcast.org/newsarticle.aspx?id11415)  The bloom is believed to have been possible as a result of high chloride and salt levels in the water.  A CONOSOL Energy mine discharge site on the creek is the likeliest source of contamination.(http://statejournal.com/story.cfm?funcviewstory&storyid68240) .  Since at least 2002, the West Virginia DEP had known about and been pressured by environmental groups to take action on high levels of chlorides and other contaminants in the Blacksville No. 2 outfall but they took no action against CONSOL.In March, 2011 CONSOL Energy reached an agreement with the US EPA and the State of West Virginia regarding damage done to Dunkard Creek caused by high levels of TDS in the discharge from their Blacksville No. 2 mine ( http://blogs.wvgazette.com/coaltattoo/2011/03/14/consol-to-pay-5-5-million-in-dunkard-creek-deal ).  As part of that settlement, CONSOL agreed to pay $5.5 million in civil penalties for pollution violations related to the huge fish kill in the fall of 2009 in Dunkard Creek along the West Virginia-Pennsylvania border.  The settlement also describes requirements for CONSOL to complete a new, $200 million water treatment system to better control pollution discharges from its active and former mining operations in the area.Mathews Restoration SiteDunkard Creek drains a rural  watershed within nine townships in Greene County, Pennsylvania, and three districts in Monongalia County, West Virginia. The river is classified as a warm water fishery and historically supports a variety of fish, including bass, sunfish, and muskellunge in all but the lower 6.2 miles (from Taylortown to Poland Mines, Greene County, Pennsylvania), which have been devastated by decades of unchecked mine drainage (AMD).(http://www.epa.gov/reg3wapd/tmdl/pa_tmdl/DunkardCreek/DunkardCreekDR.pdf)In 2007, thanks to the support of an EPA Targeted Watersheds Grant, the County Watershed Alliance and the Friends of Dunkard Creek sought to reclaim part of the lower  by creating a Passive Treatment System, or wetlands, on the Mathews farm near Poland Mines. At this site, the abandoned Maiden #1 mine dumped over a million gallons of untreated AMD into Dunkard Creek each day.Working with Stream Restoration, Inc. and public/private partners from across the region, the Alliance created a Passive Treatment System consisting of:1. An aerobic wetland (shallow water flowing over vegetation). Once established, an aerobic wetland produces large amounts of organic debris. The debris encourages anaerobic bacteria, which can revert sulfate ions into sulfide ions. Sulfide ions can then bind with heavy metal ions (such as iron) to remove them from the water.2. Limestone ponds and channels. (Limestone, because of its high calcite content, reduces the acidity of AMD naturally.) When combined with man-made wetlands, it creates a self-renewing PassiveTreatment System.In all, close to 12,000 tons of limestone (equal in weight to 8,000 average-sized cars were used at the Mathews Restoration Site. And volunteers started more than 2,000 plantings from 34 different species of plants, trees and shrubs. The combination of plantings and engineered flow ponds and channels is a great example of how man and nature can work together to reclaim an area from AMD.(http://orp.live.mediaspanonline.com/OR/Story/04_20_tree_planting 2007 observer-reporter.com article)See also*of rivers of Pennsylvania*of rivers of West VirginiaReferences
16158213
Moeletsi_Mbeki
Moeletsi Mbeki (born 30, 1945) is a political economist and the deputy chairman of the African Institute of International Affairs, an independent think tank based at the of the Witwatersrand. He is the younger brother of former President Mbeki and son of ANC leader Mbeki. He has been a frequent critic of President Mbeki.( An IOL online article about the last cabinet meeting of the Mbeki Administration. http://www.iol.co.za/index.php?set_id1&click_id3086&art_idnw20080924153804200C107252)CareerMoeletsi Mbeki has a strong background in journalism, with a resume that includes a University Fellowship and time at the BBC. He often acts as a political commentator in Africa, and is the author of a paper titled Perpetuating Poverty in Sub-Saharan Africa, published on 30 June 2005 by Policy Network.  He was a media consultant for the ANC in the 90s, and is currently the chairman of Endemol South Africa, a TV production house, and KMM Review Publishing(http://people.africadatabase.org/en/person/10811.html) and() Africa.() He has also been director of Comazar, which rehabilitates and grants concessions to railway networks in Africa.In 2003 it was revealed by Perlman that the SABC had blacklisted a lot of political commentators and that Moeletsi was one of them, possible due to his political views. Moeletsi generated some controversy when he said that Africa was governed better under colonial rule than today.(Dispatch Online - Your premier Eastern Cape news site) (See 2007 in rail transport). In October 2006 Moeletsi Mbeki applied for an order to have Moyo jailed the next time he visits South Africa. He has been known to oppose certain Economic Empowerment (BEE) deals in South Africa(Why BEE should be abolished IOL)(Mineweb.com - The worlds premier mining and mining investment website HOMEPAGE) and has written articles for the Institute, a USA-based libertarian think tank.(http://www.cato.org/pubs/fpbriefs/fpb85.pdf)WritingsHe has written many articles about the political and economic situation in South Africa, Zimbabwe and the rest of Africa.* Articles by Moeletsi Mbeki in the New Statesman* South Africa: Only a matter of time before the bomb explodes* Africa was better governed under colonial rule than it is today* Overview of his opinions* A growing gap between the black elite and the black masses?: Elites and political and economic change in South Africa since the Anglo Boer War* South Africa: Democracy is Mature, the Private and NGO Sector is Strong, and Government is Weak in South Africa* South Africa: Roots of Black PovertyReferencesMbeki
16181573
The_People_of_Sand_and_Slag
The People of Sand and Slag is a fiction novelette published in 2004 by Bacigalupi. It was nominated for the 2005 Award for Best Novelette, the 2006 Award for Best Novelette and the 2005 Locus Poll.(The LOCUS Index to SF Awards)Plot summaryThe story follows three genetically modified humans who work as guards for a large mining conglomeration in a far future Montana.  It begins with the three of them being called out to track down an intruder on their employers property.  When they finally corner it they realize it is nothing more than a dog.  Fascinated by the fact that it could still survive in their day and age they decide to keep it as a pet, and then constantly struggle to keep it fed, clean, healthy and alive.FootnotesExternal links*The People of Sand and Slag at BestScienceFictionStories.com - review.* The People of Sand and Slag at windupstories.com - full story
16199590
Llorts
footnotes               Llorts (, ) is a village in Andorra, located in the parish of Ordino.Andorras Iron Route runs between Llorts and Cortinada, following the sites of Andorras historic mining and iron working industries that were active in the 17th19th centuries. On the edge of the village is a 19th-century iron mine, La Mina de Llorts, which is open as a tourist attraction.(Andorra iron route, Vallnord, Andorra.)Referencesca:Llortsit:Llorts
16219873
Germn_Larrea_Mota-Velasco
 website      Germn Larrea Mota-Velasco (born July 8, 1941) is a Mexican businessman.(Forbes biography) He is the CEO of Mxico, the largest mining corporation in Mexico and the third largest copper producer in the world.(Southern Copper Corporation Board biography) BiographyGermn Larrea has been Chairman of the Board of Directors, President and Chief Executive Officer of Grupo Mexico (holding) since 1994.( He was previously Executive Vice Chairman of Grupo Mexico and has been a member of the Board of Directors since 1981.(He has served as Chairman of the Board of the Copper Corporation since December 1999, CEO from December 1999 to October 2004 and as a member of the Board of Directors since November 1999.( He has been Chairman of the Board of Directors and CEO of Grupo Ferroviario Mexicano since 1997.( He is also Chairman of the Board of Directors and CEO of Industriales de Mexico, Perforadora Mexico, Compania Constructora, and Inmobiliario since 1992.(He founded Impresa, a printing and publishing company in 1978, remaining as the Chairman and CEO until 1989, when the company was sold.( He is also a Director of Nacional de Mexico, which forms part of Financiero Banamex, Mexicano de Hombres de Negocios, and Televisa.(According to Forbes, he is worth US$16 billion.( He lives in City, and he is married.( References  
16240551
Belo_sur_Mer
footnotes        Belo sur Mer is a town and commune () in Madagascar. It belongs to the district of Morondava, which is a part of Region. The population of the commune was estimated to be approximately 8,000 in 2001 commune census.(Primary and junior level secondary education are available in town. It is also a site of industrial-scale  mining. The majority 60% of the population of the commune are farmers.  The most important crop is maize, while other important products are potatos and beans.  Industry provides employment for 10% of the population. Additionally fishing employs 30% of the population.() References and notes sur Mersur Mer
16252377
Federal_law_enforcement_in_the_United_States
File:US Park Police at 2005 presidential inaugural.jpg|thumb|250px|right|Park Police officers awaiting deployment  during the 2005 DayThe federal government of the United States empowers a wide range of law enforcement agencies to maintain law and public order related to matters affecting the country as a whole.police possess enforcement authority as given to them under various parts of the States Code (U.S.C.). Federal law enforcement officers are authorized to enforce various laws generally only at the federal level. A few agencies have broad federal enforcement powers, but most enforce only narrow portions of federal law. In some cases, they may be empowered to enforce state and local law as well.These agencies have nationwide jurisdiction for enforcement of designated federal law. Federal agencies are limited by the U.S. Code to investigating matters that are explicitly within the power of the federal government. Some federal investigative powers have become broader in practice, since the passage of the PATRIOT Act in October 2001.The Department of Justice was formerly the largest but remains the most prominent collection of law enforcement agencies, and handled most law enforcement duties at the federal level.() It includes the States Marshals Service (USMS), the Bureau of Investigation (FBI), the Enforcement Administration (DEA), and the of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives (ATF), Bureau of Prisons (BOP), and others. In 2002, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) was created by an act of Congress.  DHS now includes the States Secret Service (USSS), which protects the president and vice president of the United States, their families and other dignitaries as well as investigating counterfeiting crimes involving U.S. currency and monetary instruments; and Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), which includes Enforcement Removal Operations (ERO) that handles interior immigration enforcement in the United States, and Homeland Security Investigations (HSI) which was created by the merger of the special agents of the former U.S. Immigration and Naturalization Service and the U.S. Customs Service; There is also Customs and Border Protection (CBP) which includes States Border Patrol (USBP), the CBP Office of Air and Marine (whose assets encompass the aviation and marine units of the old INS/Border Patrol and Customs Service), and which is the largest aviation/marine force in federal law enforcement; CBP officers are responsible for federal law enforcement at all U.S. Ports of Entry, including airports, sea ports, and the land border ports; USBP Agents are the primary enforcement unit along the U.S. international border between U.S. Ports of Entry; the Federal Protective Service (FPS) is responsible for federal law enforcement in federal buildings and properties. Including elements of the U.S. Guard and the U.S. Security Administration, DHS now has more sworn armed federal law enforcement agents and officers than any other department of the United States government.HistoryFederal law enforcement in the United States is well over two hundred years old. For example, the Postal Inspection Service can trace its origins back to 1772.()List of agencies and units of agenciesAgencies in bold text are LEAs (Law Enforcement Agencies)Executive branchDepartment of Agriculture (USDA)*Office of Inspector General (USDAOIG)*States Forest Service (USFS)**Forest Service Law Enforcement and Investigations (USFSLEI)Department of Commerce (DOC)*of Industry and Security (BIS)**of Export Enforcement (OEE)*Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST)**Institute of Standards and Technology Police (NIST Police)*Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA)**Marine Fisheries Service (NMFS)***Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration Fisheries Office for Law Enforcement (OLE)*of Commerce Office of Security (DOCOS)*of Commerce Office of Inspector General (DOCOIG)Department of Defense*Office of Inspector General (DODOIG)**Criminal Investigative Service (DCIS)*Force Protection Agency (PFPA)**States Pentagon Police (USPPD)*Logistics Agency (DLA) *Security Agency (NSA)*Intelligence Agency (DIA) *Geospatial-Intelligence Agency (NGA) *Special Inspector General for Afghanistan Reconstruction (SIGAR)*Special Inspector General for Iraq Reconstruction (SIGIR)Department of the Air Force*Force Office of Special Investigations (AFOSI)*Force Security Forces Center (AFSFC)*of the Air Force PoliceDepartment of the Army*States Army Criminal Investigation Command (CID)*States Army Military Police Corps*Department of the Army Police*States Army Corrections CommandDepartment of the Navy*Criminal Investigative Service (NCIS)*States Marine Corps Criminal Investigation Division (MC CID)*Department of the Navy Police (civilian police) *Marine Corps Provost Marshals Office (military police)*United States Marine Corps Police (civilian police)*Master-at-Arms (U.S. Navy military police)Department of Education*Office of the Inspector General (EDOIG)Department of Energy (DOE)*Office of Inspector General (DOEOIG)*Office of Health, Safety and Security (DOEHSS)*of Secure Transportation (OST)Department of Health and Human Services*United States Food and Drug and Administration (HHSFDA)**of Criminal Investigations (OCI)*Institutes of Health (NIH)**Institutes of Health Police (NIH Police)*Office of Inspector General (HHSOIG)Department of Homeland Security (DHS)*Law Enforcement Training Center (FLETC)*States Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS)*States Coast Guard (USCG)**Guard Investigative Service (CGIS)*United States Customs and Border Protection (CBP)**of Field Operations (OFO)**States Border Patrol (USBP)**of CBP Air and Marine (OAM)*Federal Protective Service (FPS)*United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE)**Enforcement Removal Operations (ERO)**Homeland Security Investigations (HSI)**Office of Intelligence**Office of Professional Responsibility (OPR)*States Secret Service (USSS)*Security Administration (TSA)**Office of Law Enforcement/Air Marshal Service (FAMS)*of Homeland Security Office of Inspector General (DHSOIG)of Housing and Urban Development*Office of Inspector General (HUD/OIG) http://www.hudoig.gov*Protective Service Division (HUDPSD)of the Interior (USDI)*of Indian Affairs (BIA)**of Indian Affairs Police (BIA Police)*of Land Management (BLM)**of Land Management Office of Law Enforcement (BLM Rangers and Special Agents)*of Reclamation (BOR)**of Reclamation Office of Law Enforcement (BOR Rangers)**Dam Police aka Bureau of Reclamation Police*Park Service (NPS)**Division of Law Enforcement, Security and Emergency Services (Law Enforcement Rangers)**States Park Police*Office of Inspector General (DOIOIG)*Office of Surface Mining Reclamation and Enforcement (OSMRE)*States Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS)**Office of Law Enforcement**Division of Refuge Law EnforcementDepartment of Justice (USDOJ)*of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and Explosives (ATF)*United States Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) (since 1973)*Bureau of Investigation (FBI)**Bureau of Investigation Police (FBI Police)*Bureau of Prisons (BOP)*Office of Inspector General (DOJOIG)*States Marshals Service (USMS)Department of Labor*Office of Inspector General (DOLOIG)Department of State (DOS)*Security Service (DSS)*Office of Inspector General (SDOIG)Department of Transportation*Aviation Administration (FAA)*Office of Inspector General (DOTOIG)*States Merchant Marine Academy Department of Public Safety (USMMADPS)Department of the Treasury*and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau*of Engraving and Printing (BEP)**of Engraving and Printing Police (BEP Police)*Crimes Enforcement Network (FINCEN)*Internal Revenue Service Criminal Investigation Division (IRS-CI)*Office of Inspector General (TREASOIG)*Inspector General for Tax Administration (TIGTA)*States Mint Police (USMP)*Special Inspector General for the Asset Relief Program (SIGTARP)Department of Veterans Affairs*Office of Inspector General (VAOIG)*Veterans Affairs PoliceStates Environmental Protection Agency*Criminal Investigation Division (EPACID)*Office of Inspector General (EPAOIG)States Congress*of Congress, Office of Security and Emergency Preparedness (LOC)*at Arms of the United States House of Representatives*at Arms of the United States Senate*States Capitol Police (USCP)*United States Printing Office Police*Office of Inspector General, United States Printing OfficeUnited States Supreme Court*of the United States Supreme Court**United States Supreme Court Police*Office of the U. S. Courts, Office of Probation and Pretrial Services (AOUSC)Other federal law enforcement agenciesIndependent Agencies and Quasi-official Corporations*Intelligence Agency Protective Service (CIASPS)*Aeronautics and Space Administration**Office of Inspector General (NASAOIG)**NASA Security Services*Regulatory Commission, Office of Inspector General (NRCOIG)*of Personnel Management, Office of Inspector General (OPMOIG)*Retirement Board, Office of Inspector General (RRBOIG)*Business Administration, Office of Inspector General (SBAOIG)*Deposit Insurance Corporation, Office of Inspector General (FDICOIG)*Services Administration, Office of Inspector General (GSAOIG)*Security Administration Office of Inspector General (SSAOIG)*States Postal Service (USPS)**Office of Inspector General (USPSOIG)**States Postal Inspection Service (USPIS)***U.S. Postal Police*Institution**Office of Protection Services (SI)**National Zoological Park Police (NZPP)** Office of the Inspector General (OIG)*Amtrak**Amtrak Office of Inspector General**Amtrak Office of Security Strategy and Special Operations (OSSSO)**Police*Reserve Bank: Reserve Police*Valley Authority**Valley Authority Office of Inspector General (TVAOIG)**Valley Authority Police (TVAP)*States Agency for International Development, Office of Inspector General (AIDOIG)Statistics* In 2004, federal agencies employed approximately 105,000 full-time personnel authorized to make arrests and carry firearms in the 50 states and the District of Columbia.  Compared with 2002, employment of such personnel increased by 13%.* Nationwide, there were 36 federal officers per 100,000 residents.  Outside the District of Columbia, which had 1,662 per 100,000, State ratios ranged from 90 per 100,000 in Arizona to 7 per 100,000 in Iowa.* As of 2004, about 3 in 4 federal law enforcement officers working outside the Armed Forces were employed within the Department of Homeland Security or the Department of Justice.* Federal officers duties included criminal investigation (38%), police response and patrol (21%), corrections and detention (16%), inspections (16%), court operations (5%), and security and protection (4%).* Women accounted for 16% of federal officers in 2004, an increase from 14.8% in 2002.* A third (33.2%) of federal officers were members of a racial or ethnic minority in 2004.  This included 17.7% who were Hispanic or Latino, and 11.4% who were black or African American.  In 2002, racial or ethnic minorities officers comprised 32.4% of federal officers.* Twenty-seven federal offices of inspector general (IG) employed criminal investigators with arrest and firearm authority in 2004.  Overall, these agencies employed 2,867 such officers in the 50 states and District of Columbia.(bjs.ojp.usdoj.gov Federal Law Enforcement States Bureau of Justice Statistics Publications & Products. Page last revised on 17 June 2010. Retrieved 2010-06-17.)See also*enforcement in the United StatesReferencesder Bundespolizeien in den Vereinigten Staatenver federala polismyndigheter i USA
16266126
TV_Santhosh
TV Santhosh (born 1968) is an artist based in Mumbai.Santhosh was born in Kerala, India.  His paintings are based on images taken from the news media which Santhosh renders in solarised colour schemes, in reference to photographic negatives.(GrosvenorGallery.com)  His images of choice document war, terrorism and violence.(ContemporaryArtNorwich.co.uk)Santhosh began as a sculptor but turned to painting after spending time at the Kanoria Centre for Arts in Ahmedabad.(SaffronArt.com)Born in Kerala, T.V.Santhosh obtained his B.F.A in painting from Santiniketan and Masters in Sculpture from MS University, Vadodara. T V. Santhosh has acquired a major presence in the Indian and International art scene over the last decade with several successful shows with many international art galleries and museums. Santhoshs recent sculptural installation from Passage to India is in the Frank Cohen collection at Initial Access. Some of his prominent museum shows are Aftershock at Sainsbury Centre, Contemporary Art Norwich, England in 2007 and Continuity and Transformation Museum show promoted by Provincia di Milano, Italy.He lives and works in Mumbai. Biography *1968	Born in Kerala*1994	B.F.A in Sculpture, Kalabhavan, Santiniketan, West Bengal.*1997	M.A. (Fine) in Sculpture, Faculty of Fine Arts, M.S.U, Baroda. Museum Shows *2011	4th Moscow Biennale of Contemporary Art Rewriting Worlds, curated by Peter Weibel*2011	In Transition New Art from India, Surrey Museum of Art, Canada*2011	Collectors Stage: Asian Contemporary Art from Private Collections, Singapore Art Museum, Singapore.*2011	Crossroads India Escalate, Prague Biennale 5, 2011.*2011	Collectors Stage: Asian Contemporary Art from Private Collections, Singapore Art Museum, Singapore.*2010	The Silk Road, New Chinese, Indian and Middle Eastern Art from The Saatchi Gallery at Tri Postal, Lille, France.  *2009	Vancouver Biennale*2009    Dark Materials curated by David Thorp, G S K Contemporary show, at Royal Academy of Arts, London.*2009	India Xianzai, MOCA, Shanghai, China.*2009	Passage to India, Part II: New Indian Art from the Frank Cohen Collection, at Initial Access, Wolverhampton, UK*2008    Passage to India, Part I: New Indian Art from the Frank Cohen Collection, at Initial Access, Wolverhampton, UK*2008	Where in the World, Devi Art Foundation, Delhi*2007	Continuity and Transformation, Museum show, exhibition promoted by Provincia di Milano Italy.*2007	Anupam Poddar Collection at Daimler Chrysler Contemporary, Berlin.*2007	After Shock, curated by Yasmin Canvin in collaboration with Sainsbury Centre Museum, Norwich.*2006	Lekha and Anupam Poddar collection at The Chrysler Museum, Germany.*2004	Zoom!, Art in Contemporary India, Curated by Nancy Adajania & Luis Serpa, Culturegest Lisbon.*2003	Crossing generations: diVERGE, curated by Kapur & Chaitanya Sambrani, presented by Chemould Gallery, NGMA Mumbai.*2003	NGMA Annual Show, NGMA Mumbai. Solo exhibitions *2011	The Land, Solo Show, Nature Morte, Berlin in collaboration with The Guild Mumbai.*2010 	Burning Flags Solo Show, Aicon Gallery, London in collaboration with The Guild.*2009 - 10 Blood and Spit. Solo Show, Jackshainman Gallery in collaboration with The Guild.*2009	Living with a Wound, Solo Show, Grosvenor Vadehra, London in collaboration with The Guild.*2008	A Room to Pray At Avanthay Contemporary, Zurich, in collaboration with The Guild, Mumbai.*2008	Countdown, Nature Morte Delhi, in collaboration with The Guild Art Gallery Mumbai.*2006	Scars of an Ancient Error, Singapore Art Fair presented by The Guild Art Gallery Mumbai.*2005	False Promises, Grosvenor Gallery London, in collaboration with The Guild Art Gallery Mumbai.*2004	Unresolved Stories, Nature Morte Delhi, in collaboration with The Guild Art Gallery Mumbai.*2003	One Hand Clapping/Siren, Jehangir Art Gallery Mumbai presented by The Guild Art Gallery Mumbai.*1997 At Faculty of Fine Arts Gallery, MSU, Baroda. Selected group shows *2011	Iconoclasts & Iconodules,curated by Ombretta Agro Andruff.  Religare Art Gallery, New Delhi.*2011 	Art Dubai, by The Guild, Mumbai.*2011	India Art Summit, New Delhi by The Guild, Mumbai.*2011	Art Stage Singapore, by The Guild, Mumbai.*2010 	Inside India, A journey through contemporary Indian Art,curated by Marco Marrone and Margherita Artoni, Palazzo Saluzzo.Torino and Luce Gallery*2010 	The 11th Hour: An Exhibition of Contemporary Art from India / Diaspora, curated by Shaheen Merali. Tang Contemporary, Beijing.*2010 The Empire Strikes Back: Indian Art Today, The Saatchi Gallery, London*2010 	Looking Glass, The Existence of difference curated by Gayatri Sinha, Religare Arts Initiative Ltd., New Delhi.*2010 	Indian (Sub) Way, curated by Yashodhara Dalmia, Grosvenor Vadhera, London.*2010 	I think therefore graffiti, The Guild, Mumbai.*2010  	Art Taipei, by The Guild, Mumbai.*2010 	ARTPARIS+GUESTS by The Guild, Mumbai.*2010 	41st edition of Basel Art Fair 2010 With Nature Morte+Bose Pacia.*2010 Size Matters or Does it?, Latitude 28, New Delhi*2009-10 Evidentia, Gallery Sumukha, Bangalore*2009-10 All That Is Solid Melts Into Air: Indian Contemporary Art in Global Times, Lakeeren, Mumbai*2009-10 Sculpture, The Guild, Mumbai*2009 Expressions at Tihar, Indira Gandhi National Centre for the Arts, New Delhi2009 Vicissitudes of the Constructed Image, Tangerine Art Space, Bangalore*2009 Recycled, Bose Pacia, Kolkata*2009 Mining Minds, Chaitanya Art Gallery, Kochi*2009 Re-Claim/ Re-Cite/ Re-Cycle, presented by Latitude 28 at Travancore Art Gallery, New Delhi; Bose Pacia, Kolkata*2009 Multitudes, Goethe-Institut / Max Mueller Bhavan, Bangalore in collaboration with Zen Studio Gallery and Artflute.com*2009 My Little India, Marella Gallery, Beijing*2009 Life is A Stage, Institute of Contemporary Indian Art (ICIA), Mumbai*2009 In The Mood For Paper, F2 Gallery, Beijing*2009 Threshold: Forging Narratives in South Asian Contemporary Art, Aicon Gallery, New York*2009 Spectrum curated by Saryu Doshi and Firoza Godrej, presented by ADACH with the Indian Embassy Abu Dhabi*2009 Failed Plot, curated by Gayatri Sinha, India Special Exhibition at KIAF 09, Korea International Art Fair.*2009 Purple Wall Project curated by Gayatri Sinha at India Art Summit, New Delhi.*2009	The Armory Show, New York*2009	ARCO 09, Madrid.*2009	Progressive to Altermodern: 62 Years of Indian Modern Art, Grosvenor Gallery, London*2009	In the Mood for Paper, F2 Gallery, Beijing*2008-09 Signs Taken for Wonders: Recent Art from India and Pakistan, Aicon Gallery, London*2008-09 Hot Shots, The Viewing Room, Mumbai*2008	Art Amsterdam 08.*2008	Basel Art Fair, with Nature Morte.*2008	ShContemporary, Shanghai.*2008	101 Tokyo: Contemporary Art Fair, Tokyo.*2008 Signs Taken for Wonders: Recent Art from India and Pakistan, Aicon Gallery, London*2007-08 Similarities, Lansdowne Gallery, Mumbai*2007	Year 07, London, presented by Grosvenor Vadehra*2007	Basel Art Fair, with Nature Morte.*2007	Kashi Art Gallery, 10th Anniversary show, Kochi.*2007	India 20, organized by Alekhya Foundation, Vadodara.*2007 Young Guns, Institute of Contemporary Indian Art (ICIA), Mumbai*2007 Year 07, London, presented by Grosvenor Vadehra, London*2007 India 20, a Group Show that Coincided With the Release of the Book India 20, at Rabindra Bhavan, Lalit Kala Akademi, New Delhi*2006	Here and Now: Young Voices From India, Grosvenor Vadehra London.*2005	Kaam, Arts India New York.*2005	Change of Address, The Guild Art Gallery Mumbai.*2005	Paths of Progression, Saffronart and Bodhi Art Delhi, Mumbai, New York and Singapore.*2005	Endless Terrain, Yashodhara Dalmia, Rabindra Bhavan New Delhi.*2005	Whose Space is it anyway? Curated by Gallery Espace Delhi in collaboration with The Guild Art Gallery, Mumbai*2005	Are We Like This Only? Vadehra Art Gallery Delhi.*2005 Ways of Seeing, Art Alive, New Delhi*2005 Endless Terrain, Rabindra Bhavan, Lalit Kala Akademi, New Delhi*2004	Bombay Boys, Palette Art Gallery Delhi.*2004	A Tribute to Bhupen Khakhar, Tao Art Gallery Mumbai.*2004	Generation I, Saffron Art Gallery in collaboration with The Guild Art Gallery Mumbai.*2004	Red at Palette Art Gallery Delhi.*2004 Viart Gallery, New Delhi*2004 Zoom!, Art in Contemporary India, Culturegest, Lisbon*2004 Looking Back, Looking Forward, Sarjan Art Gallery, Baroda*2003	The Dual Path of Indian Art Today, Galerie Mueller & Plate Munchen.*2003	Highlights, Sakshi Mumbai.*2003 Crossing Generations : diVERGE, presented by Gallery Chemould at National Gallery of Modern Art (NGMA), Mumbai*2003 Works on Paper, Saffronart Online Show*2002	Trans-Figuration, Curated by Yashodhara Dalmia, Presented by Art Inc, India Habitat Centre Delhi.*2002	Words and Images, by The Guild Art Gallery, NGMA Mumbai.*2002	The Contemporary Asian Art Fair, by The Guild Art Gallery in Singapore.*2002	Mela- A Carnival of Indian Art, Curated by Anupa Mehta, RPG Show, at Jehangir Art Gallery.*2002	Tribute to Picasso, The Guild Art Gallery, Mumbai*2002 Art Edge, presented by Fine Art Company, at National Gallery of Modern Art (NGMA), Mumbai and India Habitat Centre, New Delhi.*2002 Quotable Stencil, Tao Art Gallery, Mumbai.*2002 Cross Currents, Jehangir Art Gallery, Mumbai*2002 Creative Space, organized by Sakshi Gallery at India Habitat Centre, New Delhi.*2002 Tribute To Picasso, The Guild Art Gallery, Mumbai*2002	The Human Factor, by The Guild Art Gallery at Jehangir Art Gallery.*2001	Excerpts from my Diary Pages, Curated by Sasha Altaf, Fine Art Company Gallery.*2001	Engendering Images of Women, The Guild Art Gallery Mumbai.*2001- 2004 Harmony Show, at Nehru Center Mumbai.*2000	Exile and Longing, Lakeeren Art Gallery Mumbai.*2000	Kala Ghoda Show on Functional Objects, by The Guild Art Gallery Mumbai. Scholarships and awards *2009 Padmini Award, Kerala Lalit Kala Academy*1997	Kerala Lalit Kala Academy State Award*1997	Inlaks Foundation (Indian)*1997	National Scholarship*1997	Kanoria Scholarship*1994	Ramkinker Award*1990 to 94 Visva Bharati Merit ScholarshipReferencesThe Guild Art Gallery, MumbaiExternal links*TV Santhosh on ArtNet.com*Further information and images from the Saatchi Gallery*More information at ArtFacts.net* http://www.telegraph.co.uk/culture/art/artsales/4435563/Art-Sales-TV-Santhoshs-Living-With-a-Wound.html
16275999
Bailey_Willis
Bailey Willis (March 31, 1857, in Idle Wild-on-Hudson, York, States  February 19, 1949, in Alto, California) was a geological engineer who worked for the States Geological Survey (USGS), and lectured at two prominent American universities.  He also played a key role in getting Rainier designated as a national park in 1899.  After later focusing more on seismology, he became one of the worlds leading earthquake experts of his time.(Smith., Charles H. Willis, Bailey geology. Some Biogeographers, Evolutionists and Ecologists: Chrono-Biographical Sketches. Accessed 13 March 2008.)Early life and familyBailey Willis was born March 31, 1857, the son of poet and publisher Parker Willis and Cornelia Grinnell Willis. At the age of thirteen he was taken to England and Germany for four years of schooling. and thus acquired fluency in German at a time when many scientific texts were only available in that language. He entered Columbia University and in five years completed his studies with the degrees of mechanical (1878) and civil (1879) engineer. Willis married his cousin, Miss Altona Grinnell, in 1882, but she died in 1896. The couple had two children, Marion, who died in infancy, and Hope, later Mrs. Seward H. Rathbun. In 1898 he married Margaret Baker, daughter of Dr. Frank Baker of Georgetown University, who was also superintendent of the Zoological Park. The children of his second marriage are Cornelius G. Willis, Robin Willis and Margaret (Mrs. Donald F.) Smith. The family lived for many years on the University campus. Mrs.Willis died in 1941CareerAfter receiving degrees in mining engineering and civil engineering, Willis worked from 1881 to 1884 as a survey geologist for Pacific Railroad.  From 1884 to 1915, he worked for the USGS, being named director of the Appalachian division in 1889.  In 1893 he published The Mechanics of Appalachian Structure(The Mechanics of Appalachian Structure on books) in the Report of the United States Geological Survey.  From 1895 to 1902 he lectured on geology at Hopkins University.  In 1900 he was appointed as head of the Division of Areal Geology of the USGS.  In 1903 he accepted the invitation of the newly established Institution of Washington to lead an expedition to northern China, an experience which was later described in his book Friendly China.  From 1910 until 1914 he consulted for the government of Argentina(Geografa de Panam: Character and Resources on books) an experience later recorded in his book a Yanqui in Patagonia.  He led a vigorous public campaign in the 1920s to raise awareness of earthquake hazards and safe building practices. After finishing his work with the USGS, he was appointed as a professor and chairman of the geology department at University, where he served until 1922.  In 1920, he was elected to the Academy of the Sciences.  He was president of the Society of America from 1921 to 1926, during which time he published his Geologic Structures.  In 1932, he  published Isthmian Links in the Bulletin of the Geological Society of America.  Among the numerous honors which came to Willis during his long life, were an honorary Ph.D. degree from the University of Berlin and the Gold Medal of the de Gographie of France in 1910, the Legion of Honor, Belgium, in 1936, and in 1944 he was awarded the Medal by the Society of America.(ReferencesFurther reading* Blackwelder, Eliot. Bailey Willis: 18571949: A Biographical Memoir. Washington D.C.: National Academy of Sciences, 1961. http://books.nap.edu/html/biomems/bwillis.pdf* Wills, Bailey. Friendly China: Two Thousand Miles Afoot Among the Chinese. Stanford University Press, 1949.WillisWillisWillisja:Willis
16283577
Outline_of_Christmas_Island
image:Christmasisland.png|thumb|The location of Islandimage:Christmas island 76.svg|thumb|An enlargeable relief map of the Australian of Christmas IslandThe Australian Territory of Christmas Island is a small territory of Australia located in the Ocean, 2600 kilometres (1600 mi) northwest of Perth in Australia, 500 kilometres (300 mi) south of Jakarta, Indonesia, and 975 km ENE of the (Keeling) Islands.()Christmas Island supports about 1,600 residents who live in a number of settlement areas on the northern tip of the island: Fish Cove (also known as Kampong), Silver City, Saan and Drumsite.It has a unique natural topography and is of immense interest to scientists and naturalists due to the number of species of endemic flora and fauna which have evolved in isolation() and undisturbed by human habitation.While there has been mining activity on the island for many years, 65% of its 135 square kilometres (52 sq mi) are now National Park and there are large areas of pristine and ancient rainforest.The following outline is provided as an overview of and topical guide to Island:General referenceimage:Christmas Island-CIA WFB Map.png|thumb|An enlargeable basic map of Island* Pronunciation:* Common English country name:  Island* Official English country name:  The Australian of Christmas Island* Common endonym(s):  * Official endonym(s):  * Adjectival(s): Island* Demonym(s):* Etymology: of Christmas Island* rankings of Christmas Island* country codes: CX, CXR, 162* region codes: See 3166-2:CX* Internet code top-level domain: .cx Geography of Christmas Island image:Christmas Island Australia 76-fr.png|thumb|An enlargeable topographic map of Island* Christmas Island is: an island and territory of Australia* Location:** Hemisphere and Hemisphere** Eurasia (though not on the mainland)*** Asia**** Asia***** Southeast Asia** zone:  UTC+07** points of Christmas Island*** High:  Murray Hill *** Low:  Ocean 0 m** Land boundaries:  none** Coastline:  138.9 km* of Christmas Island: ** of Christmas Island: 135 km2* Atlas of Christmas Island Environment of Christmas Island * of Christmas Island* issues on Christmas Island* Ecoregions in Christmas Island* energy in Christmas Island* of Christmas Island* areas of Christmas Island** Biosphere reserves in Christmas Island** National parks of Christmas Island* of Christmas Island** of Christmas Island** of Christmas Island*** Birds of Christmas Island*** Mammals of Christmas Island Natural geographic features of Christmas Island * of Christmas Island* of Christmas Island* Islands of Christmas Island* Lakes of Christmas Island* Mountains of Christmas Island** Volcanoes in Christmas Island* Rivers of Christmas Island** Waterfalls of Christmas Island* Valleys of Christmas Island* World Heritage Sites in Christmas Island: None Regions of Christmas Island : Main article: of Christmas Island Ecoregions of Christmas Island : Main article: Ecoregions in Christmas Island Administrative divisions of Christmas Island None Municipalities of Christmas Island * Capital of Christmas Island: Flying Fish Cove* Cities of Christmas Island Demography of Christmas Island : Main article: of Christmas Island Government and politics of Christmas Island : Main article: of Christmas Island and of Christmas Island* of government: government area* Capital of Christmas Island: Flying Fish Cove* in Christmas Island** (specific elections)* Political parties in Christmas Island* scandals of Christmas Island* in Christmas IslandBranches of government Executive branch of the government of Christmas Island * of state: of Christmas Island* of government: Minister of Christmas Island* of Christmas Island Legislative branch of the government of Christmas Island * of Christmas Island (bicameral)** house: of Christmas Island** house: of Commons of Christmas Island Judicial branch of the government of Christmas Island * Court of Christmas Island Foreign relations of Christmas Island  International organization membership *none ( Law and order in Christmas Island : Main article: of Christmas Island* punishment in Christmas Island* of Christmas Island* in Christmas Island* rights in Christmas Island** rights in Christmas Island** of religion in Christmas Island* enforcement in Christmas Island Military of Christmas Island : Main article: of Christmas Island* Command** Commander-in-chief*** Ministry of Defence of Christmas Island* Forces** of Christmas Island** of Christmas Island** Force of Christmas Island** forces of Christmas Island* history of Christmas Island* ranks of Christmas Island Local government in Christmas Island  History of Christmas Island : Main article: of Christmas Island, of the history of Christmas Island, and Current events of Christmas Island* history of Christmas Island* history of Christmas Island Culture of Christmas Island : Main article: of Christmas Island* of Christmas Island* of Christmas Island* minorities in Christmas Island* in Christmas Island* in Christmas Island* of Christmas Island* in Christmas Island* symbols of Christmas Island** of arms of Christmas Island** of Christmas Island** anthem of Christmas Island* of Christmas Island* in Christmas Island* holidays in Christmas Island* Records of Christmas Island* in Christmas Island** in Christmas Island** in Christmas Island** in Christmas Island** in Christmas Island** in Christmas Island** in Christmas Island* World Heritage Sites in Christmas Island: None Art in Christmas Island * in Christmas Island* of Christmas Island* of Christmas Island* of Christmas Island* in Christmas Island* in Christmas Island Sports in Christmas Island : Main article: in Christmas Island* in Christmas Island* Island at the OlympicsEconomy and infrastructure of Christmas Island : Main article: of Christmas Island* Economic rank, by nominal GDP (2007):* in Christmas Island* in Christmas Island** Bank of Christmas Island* in Christmas Island** in Christmas Island* Companies of Christmas Island*Currency of Christmas Island: Dollar**4217: AUD* history of Christmas Island* in Christmas Island** policy of Christmas Island** industry in Christmas Island* in Christmas Island* in Christmas Island** Island Resort* in Christmas Island* Island Stock Exchange Education in Christmas Island : Main article: in Christmas IslandInfrastructure of Christmas Island* care in Christmas Island* in Christmas Island** Airports in Christmas Island** transport in Christmas Island** in Christmas Island* supply and sanitation in Christmas Island See also ***of Christmas Island-related articles*of Christmas Island-related topics*of international rankings*of Asia*of Australia*of geographyReferencesExternal links* Christmas Island Shire - official government website* Christmas Island Tourism Association - official tourism website* Christmas Island Act 1958* * * * Christmas Island Travel Guide from Travel a creative commons travel wiki
16299004
Forbestown,_California
footnotes               , Forbestown (formerly, Boles Dry Diggins and Forbes Diggins) is a place() in Butte County, California.(  It lies at an elevation of 2772 feet (845 m).( Its zip code is 95941 and its area code is 530. Forbestown had a population of 320 at the 2010 census.Forbestown is named for B.F. Forbes, who opened a store there in 1850.( The post office was established in 1854, closed in 1925, and re-opened in 1936.()Forbestowns heyday was the last half of the nineteenth century, when it was a large mining center.() By the late 1930s, it was nearly a ghost town.( The site has foundations and debris from its mining era.(DemographicsThe United States Census() reported that Forbestown had a population of 320. The density was 51.0 people per square mile (19.7/km). The racial makeup of Forbestown was 262 (81.9%) White, 4 (1.3%) African American, 15 (4.7%) Native American, 10 (3.1%) Asian, 0 (0.0%) Pacific Islander, 4 (1.3%) from other races, and 25 (7.8%) from two or more races.  Hispanic or Latino of any race were 23 persons (7.2%). The Census reported that 320 people (100% of the population) lived in households, 0 (0%) lived in non-institutionalized group quarters, and 0 (0%) were institutionalized.  There were 138 households, out of which 28 (20.3%) had children under the age of 18 living in them, 78 (56.5%) were opposite-sex married couples living together, 15 (10.9%) had a female householder with no husband present, 3 (2.2%) had a male householder with no wife present.  There were 10 (7.2%) unmarried opposite-sex partnerships, and 0 (0%) same-sex married couples or partnerships. 32 households (23.2%) were made up of individuals and 17 (12.3%) had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.32.  There were 96 families (69.6% of all households); the average family size was 2.71.The population was spread out with 57 people (17.8%) under the age of 18, 16 people (5.0%) aged 18 to 24, 53 people (16.6%) aged 25 to 44, 119 people (37.2%) aged 45 to 64, and 75 people (23.4%) who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 52.3 years. For every 100 females there were 105.1 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 97.7 males.There were 167 housing units at an average density of 26.6 per square mile (10.3/km), of which 109 (79.0%) were owner-occupied, and 29 (21.0%) were occupied by renters. The homeowner vacancy rate was 5.2%; the rental vacancy rate was 0%.  246 people (76.9% of the population) lived in owner-occupied housing units and 74 people (23.1%) lived in rental housing units.PoliticsIn the state legislature Forbestown is located in the 4th Senate District, represented by Republican LaMalfa, and in the 3rd Assembly District, represented by Republican Logue. Federally, Forbestown is located in 4th congressional district, which has a Cook PVI of R +11() and is represented by Republican McClintock.Referenceses:Forbestown
16334441
Steven_R._Schuit
Steven R. Schuit (born Haarlem, Netherlands, 9 October 1942) is a Dutch lawyer (advocaat) and also serves currently as a board member of several companies and institutions.BiographyProfessor Steven R. Schuit retired as partner of & Overy, a global law firm, in 2005. This allowed him to serve on the board of directors of several companies and institutions. As a lawyer he represented from 1975 onwards corporate clients in mergers, acquisitions, joint ventures, private equity transactions and public offerings. He has assisted in transactions in a variety of countries in Europe and Asia, in the United States, Australia and in several African countries. From 1980 through 1990 he was the resident partner of his law firm in York. As from 1998 he is a parttime professor at the post-graduate program of the Law Faculty of University, teaching International Commercial and Financial Law. From 2007 onwards he is also professor at the Strategic Center of Business Universiteit, teaching Corporate Governance and Responsibility in executive programs.Mr. Schuit published various professional books and articles. Currently he serves as a non-executive director of New World Resources NV (coal mining), as a supervisory director of Numico NV, Breevast BV, Amodo NV, ZBG Finance NV and of Scarlet Telecom BV (prospective). He chairs the board of De Baak Management Center VNO-NCW (Dutch training center for senior executives) and of Stichting Giving Back (a charity for talented disadvantaged children at senior high schools in The Netherlands and a governor of Stichting Grotius Academie (an institution for post graduate legal education). He also chairs The Law Firm School (an institution formed by the international law firms in The Netherlands for legal education to their trainees).Bibliography* Dutch Business Law, editor in chief, loose leaf publication (1989) (ISBN 9065449744) (ISBN 978-9065449740) (Kluwer Academic Publishers Group)* M&A in The Netherlands, co-author (1996) (ISBN / EAN: 9041103198) (Kluwer Academic Publishers Group)* Corporate Law and Practice of The Netherlands (2002) (ISBN 904111906X) (ISBN 978-9041119063) (Kluwer Academic Publishers Group)External links* Personal website of Steven R. Schuit* Allen & Overy* New World Resources NV* Numico NV* Breevast BV* Scarlet Telecom BV* De Baak Management Center VNO-NCW * Stichting Giving Back* Stichting Grotius Academie
16367431
David_Xiao
 occupation  entrepreneurDavid Xiao (born November 17, 1960) is a Canadian politician and current Member of the Assembly of Alberta, representing the constituency of Edmonton-McClung as a Progressive Conservative. Early lifeXiao was born in Guizhou Province in southwest China. His father was an accountant in the coal mining industry and his mother was a teacher. After graduating with a Bachelor of Arts in English literature from the Beijing Second Language Institute, Xiao began working as a translator and eventually got into business, which gave him the opportunity to travel to Canada. He moved his family to Edmonton during the Tiananmen protests in China, seeking freedom and opportunity.In Canada, Xiao was a successful entrepreneur before entering public life, working in consulting, international trade, publishing, commercial real estate and marketing. As a business consultant, Xiao worked with some of the worlds biggest companies, including Nortel, Bombardier, Motorola, and various Canadian publishing companies. In addition to the BA in English literature, Xiao has a diploma in geological science from the Beijing Institute of Mining. He has also studied business through NAIT and economics at the of Alberta.Political careerMr.Xiao has spent a great deal of time trying to get elected to the federal government.  He sought the Conservative Party nomination in several ridings on a number of occasions.  Having been unsuccessful in all his federal attempts, Mr. Xiao turned his attention to provincial politics.  Xiao first sought public office in the 2008 provincial election in the constituency of Edmonton-McClung. In that election, Xiao defeated first-term Liberal incumbent Elsalhy by 1216 votes to win the riding. After the election, he was named Parliamentary Assistant to the Minister of Employment and Immigration, Goudreau. Politically, Xiao has been a member of the federal Reform and Canadian Alliance parties, and served on the Edmonton-Leduc board of directors for the Party of Canada.Personal lifeXiao is married to Alice and together they have two sons, Allen and Andrew. He also considers himself a tea connoisseur. He collects tea pots and enjoys cooking.()Election resultsReferences
16403269
Maski
Maski is a village and an site in the district of the state of Karnataka, India.(Amalananda Ghosh (1990), p282) It lies on the bank of the Maski river which is a tributary of the Tungabhadra. The site came into prominence with the discovery of a minor rock edict of Ashoka by C. Beadon in 1915.(V. R. Ramachandra Dikshitar (1993), p41) It was the first edict of Ashoka that contained the name Asoka in it instead of the earlier edicts that referred him as Devanampiye piyadasi.(O. C. Handa (1994), p197)(Vincent Arthur Smith (1998), p5) This edict was important to conclude that many edicts found earlier in the Indian sub-continent in the name of Devanampiye piyadasi, all belonged to Ashoka.( The edict is etched on a rock-face of Durgada-gudda, one of the gneissic outcrops that are present in the site.Maski is also the place on the Raichur Doab which was also under the hegemony of the imperial Chola empire and it was here that Chola I defeated II, the Chalukya ruler in battle in 1019-1020 AD.( (2003), K.A.Nilakanta Sastri, p. 166) Excavation historyMaski was studied initially by Bruce Foote in 1870 and 1888. In 1915, C. Beadon, a mining engineer, discovered Ashokas rock edict here. In 1935-37, the archaeological department of state explored this region and in 1954, Amalananda Ghosh excavated this place on behalf of the Survey of India.(FindingsThe excavations indicated that the region was occupied across four different cultural periods; Period I: Neolithic-Chalcolithic, Period II: Megalithic, Period III: Early historical and Period IV: Medieval. In Period I, microliths and blades made of agate, chert, carnelian and opal are found.( Ornamental beads of agate, coral, shell and other materials are also found. Dull-grey ware and painted-buff ware pottery are found, some of which were painted with linear patterns. Animal remains of cattle, buffalo, sheep and goat are also found.( Period II saw the introduction of iron and five different forms of burials were discovered. Lances, ferrules, daggers and arrowheads were found, apart from beads of gold and terracotta objects.( The pottery of Period II consisted of the megalithic red-and-black ware, all-black ware and red-slipped ware, some of which had graffiti on them. Coins were discovered in the Period III which also saw the use of Russet-coated painted ware. The earliest specimens of Indian glass were also discovered at Maski.(Manfred G. Raschke (1978), p1029) A seal has also been found here.(E. C. L. During Caspers (1975), p64)Notes References******hi:
16452365
Yongseong
Baek Yongseong Jinjong (Korean:  , Hanja:  , 18641940) was an important Korean Buddhist master who helped propagate Buddhism in Korea. Primarily grounded in the Seon tradition, he also set about teaching others of Land Buddhism and undertook massive studies and translation efforts of the Buddhist Tripitaka. He was also one of thirty-three national representatives present at the 1 Movement of 1919, the representative of the Korean Buddhist community. The March 1 Movement is said to have marked the first significant beginning of the Independence Movement, which sought to reach autonomy from Japanese occupation.BiographyYongseong was born Baek Sanggyu in Namwon, Jeolla-do, Korea on May 8 of the calendar in 1864. As a boy he was very quiet and was educated from a young age, writing his first Chinese poem by age nine.(Chan-ju Mun, 249-251) He entered his first monastery in 1877 at Deokmil-am, but was withdrawn by his parents not long after entering. In 1879, at age fifteen, he was ordained a sunim by the Venerable Hwanwol at Haeinsa in Hapcheon in Gyeongsang and was given the ordination name Jinjong.( He then traveled to see Venerable Suwol, who instructed Yongseong on the practice of dharani. Not long after, it is said that he had an awakening experience following six days of Seon meditation at Bogwangsa in Yangju. Not satisfied with his own awakening, he began his investigation of the MU koan under master Muyung.((Yongseong Jinjong ( 1864 ~ 1940 ), koreanbuddhism.net. Retrieved on March 21, 2008.)In 1884, at age twenty, Yongseong received the Vinaya and Precepts under the Vinaya master Seongok at Tongdosa, becoming a fully ordained sunim. Yongseong attained enlightenment during this period at Songgwangsa. He spent the coming years practicing Seon meditation and studying the Korean Tripitaka at monasteries and temples throughout Korea, engaging many masters in combat. Beginning in 1903 he began leading discussions on Seon and Land Buddhism with various students, and also set about building meditation halls for temples and repaired the Tripitaka woodblocks housed at Haeinsa. From 1907 to 1908 he traveled through parts of China, where he visited various temples and masters.( According to the Order of Korean Buddhisms website, To a Chinese monk who arrogantly praised the superiority of Chinese Buddhism and disparaged Korean Buddhism, he replied, Is the Sun and the Moon in the sky your countrys alone? Buddhist dharma is a public truth of the world, so how can the public truth of the world be limited to China? In this way, he defended the legitimacy of Korean Buddhism.(In 1910 he became Master of Chilburam Meditation Hall on Jirisan mountain, and his congregation asked him to critique others religions from a Buddhist standpoint. This resulted in his writing of a treatise known as Gwiwon Jeongjong, a work which focused primarily on the flaws of Christianity.(( In 1911 he left for Seoul, where he found himself dismayed by the situation of Buddhism when contrasted with other religions. So he began teaching Buddhism to others while there, and established Daegaksa and other temples while there. He also managed a mining company to help fund some of his Buddhist missionary work. In 1919 he became involved in the Independence Movement, and was named one of thirty-three national representatives for the 1 Movementthe designated representative of the Buddhist community. He was arrested by the Japanese during this event and detained until 1921.(( Following his release, Yongseong doubled his efforts to propagate Buddhism in Korea, and in 1925 he established the Supreme Enlightenment Foundationan organization which sought to establish Buddhist educational movements. He spent the remainder of his life spreading Buddhism, and died in 1940 at age 76.(See also*in KoreaNotesReferences*Further reading*Patriarchal Seon and its historical developmentko:
16459063
Mining_in_Ethiopia
#REDIRECT of Ethiopia#Mining and minerals
16481895
Carl_Wilhelm_Welser_von_Neunhof
Wilhelm Welser von Neunhof00.jpg|thumb|Carl Wilhelm Welser von Neunhof by Bernhard Vogel (1683-1737)Carl Wilhelm Welser von Neunhof (31 December 1663 - 1 February 1711 Nuremberg), was a mayor of Nuremberg.He was the son of Carl Welser (born 6 April 1635) and Magdalena Barbara Schlssfelder (born c. 1645 Nuremberg). He was married to Clara Sabina Kress von Kressenstein (born c. 1665) on 12 August 1689 in Nuremberg, and had a son Christoph Carl Welser, born 1690 in Nuremberg.The Welser family were affluent merchants in Augsburg and Nuremberg since 1246, and were active in copper, silver and tin mining , owning and operating a large mercantile fleet and starting the spice trade with India. The family had agreements with the Spanish court, giving them a monopoly in the slave trade to Venezuela and the West Indies and the right to ship woods, dyes, gold and drugs back to Europe. These rights were lost with the abdication of Charles V in 1556.References
16512509
Fairbanks_mining_district
The Fairbanks mining district is a gold-mining area in the U.S. state of Alaska.  mining began near Fairbanks in July 1902, after Pedro (real name Felice Pedroni), an Italian immigrant and Tom Gilmore discovered gold in the hills north of the Tanana and Chena Rivers in 1901. Pedro died exactly eight years after finding the richest gold placer he would ever know. By 1903 a new rush started, and prospectors staked thousands of claims. However, mining results were disappointing during the summer of 1903, with little gold recovered. Then Dennis OShea struck it rich on Fairbanks Creek, No. 8 Above. This was one of the richest claims in the Fairbanks Mining District and paid as high as $136 to the pan (gold @ $20/ounce). Discoveries on Cleary and Ester Creeks followed, and almost two-thirds of the gold mined in the Tanana hills before 1910 came from these three creeks. Total production of gold was more than $ 30 million. Towns grew on every creek with a combined population of 1,600 residents.(http://www.uaf.edu/museum/exhibits/tog/opportunity.html UAF: Threads of Gold)The district was and is a major producer of gold from both placer and lode deposits: placers have produced over 8 million troy ounces (250 tonnes) of gold, lodes have yielded over 4 million ounces.(http://ardf.wr.usgs.gov/ardf_data/Fairbanks.pdf)Ft. Knox mine (operating)Today, the second largest gold producer in Alaska is the Knox mine, an open-pit mine 26 miles north of Fairbanks in the Fairbanks mining district. Gold occurs in a Cretaceous porphyritic granodiorite pluton as finely-distributed particles in and on the edges of small quartz veinlets and swarms. A NW structural fabric partially controls vein orientations. Sulfide content is low. Ore is low-grade, averaging only 0.024 ounces of gold per ton of ore. Creeks draining the pluton were among the many productive gold placers in the heart of the Fairbanks district, since the early 1900s; and bedrock occurrences of gold or bismuth/telluride minerals were found near the pluton by early miners. Bulk-tonnage potential of the pluton was not known until exploration in the 1980s. Mine construction began in 1995, gold production commenced in 1997 with 3.8 million ounces of gold resource estimated. In 2006 gold reserves equaled 2.7 million ounces with additional resources of 1.6 million ounces of gold. A heap-leaching component is being added to the original carbon-in-pulp vat leaching gold-recovery process. The mine and mill employ approximately 400 people on two shifts, 24 hours per day, 365 days per year. The Fort Knox mine produced 333 thousand troy ounces (10.3 tonnes) of gold in 2006.The True North mine is a recently developed, and now suspended, open pit operation that delivered its ore to the mill at Fort Knox. It is located 25 miles northeast of Fairbanks, on the northwest flank of Pedro Dome and approximately 11 miles from the Ft. Knox Mine. Both True North and Ft. Knox  are owned by Fairbanks Gold Mining Incorporated, a subsidiary of Gold Corporation.ReferencesSee also*Gold Rush*mining in Alaska
16549139
Andasibe,_Moramanga
footnotes        Andasibe is a town and commune () in Madagascar. It belongs to the district of Moramanga, which is a part of Region. The population of the commune was estimated to be approximately 12,000 in 2001 commune census.(Primary and junior level secondary education are available in town. It is also a site of industrial-scale  mining. The majority 60% of the population of the commune are farmers.  The most important crop is rice, while other important products are cassava and potatos.  Industry and services provide both employment for 20% of the population.() References and notes (Moramanga)(Moramanga)(Moramanga)
16567366
Assembly_(film)
 budget          Estimated:$16,000,000Assembly () is a 2007 Chinese war-film written by Heng and directed by Xiaogang. It stars Hanyu, Chao, Yuan Wenkang, Tang Yan, Baoqiang, Liao Fan, Jun, Ren Quan and Li Naiwen. The film was first released on December 20, 2007. It is among the first Mainland-produced films to portray the Civil War in a realistic style. The film is an adaptation of the novel Guan Si (A Legal Case), which is based on the real-life account of a veteran army captain upholding his companys honor.The film won the 2008 Flowers Awards and the 2009 Rooster Awards for Best Film.PlotThe story begins in 1948 during the Campaign of the Civil War.  Gu Zidi (), a PLA captain, commands his Ninth Company in siege to a town defended by KMT forces.  After being ambushed, the company captures the town with severe casualties.  The brutal death of his political officer to an enemy gun in the fight causes Gu to order the shooting of the surrendering KMT prisoners, though the command is met mainly with refusal.  As punishment, Gu is imprisoned, and he quickly befriends his cellmate: an army teacher and pacifist named Wang Jincun, who had been jailed for battlefield cowardice.  Gus commanding officer, Colonel Liu, soon sends Gu and his remaining 46 men off on a new assignment; to defend to the last man (with limited resources) the battalions flank   an old mine on the south bank of the Wen River  and not to retreat until he hears the call for assembly with the regiment.  Gu also receives permission to take Wang as his new political officer.Just as the 48-man platoon fortifies the position, the Kuomintang suddenly attack with superior artillery, infantry and tanks; the company fiercely fends off two waves of enemy assault, while Gu orders the dead and severely wounded to be carried into the mine.  Barely a handful are alive when his mortally burnt adjutant officer recalls hearing the bugle call in the distance.  The others begin to say that they heard the bugle as well, and allege that Gu, deafened by multiple explosions, was not able to hear it.  Duty-bound, Gu resolves to stay, which moves the remaining men to follow him and fight to their death.An undetermined amount of time later, Gu is seen in an army hospital as the only apparent survivor, but due to sudden changes in the Armys unit structure he is unable to find his regiment, thus leaving him unable to prove his accounts of the battle.  Guilt-ridden, Gu goes on to fight in the War as a soldier and is wounded by a landmine after saving his platoon commander, Zhao Erdou, during a spotting mission.  At the end of the conflict, he recovers and returns to the old battlefield, determined to restore glory to his lost men, only to find the mine reactivated and the old entrance buried under a ton of coal. Encountering Wang Jincuns widow and Zhao Erdou during his search, he convinces the two to marry.  Zhaos help would then allow him to uncover records of Gus old battalion, leading him to Colonel Lius grave and its keeper  his units former bugler, from whom he learns that the assembly call was never sounded at the Wen River battle; instead, Gus company was sacrificed to hold off the KMT so that Liu and the rest of the regiment could retreat.Realizing he is now his companys only living witness, he camps out in a mining hut near the old battlefield and starts to dig at the huge coal pile daily with a pick and shovel, despite protests from the miners.  A month into his ordeal, the old battalions political commissar is found, and the men are finally honored through an official notice, but Gu remains inconsolable, as he still cannot unearth the bodies.A memory then surfaces of the Wen River battle: Gu and a critically wounded Wang are the sole survivors, and after pulling the last of the dead into the mine, Gu orders Wang to blow it up to prevent the corpses from being captured.  Wang carries out this order before dying, as Gu is knocked unconscious in a final cannon shootout with enemy tanks.Years later, excavations for an irrigation project eventually unveils the hidden tomb containing Gus men; a large monument is erected and a formal burial performed, finally putting Gu at peace.Critical receptionThe film was a massive box office success, particularly in mainland China.Perry Lam, in Muse Magazine, gave a mixed review: There is a huge discrepancy between the sophistication of the filmmakers in their knowledge and application of state-of-the-art techniques, and the naivety and bad faith they place in the value of unquestioning obedience to authority and sacrifice as the highest manifestation of patriotism.()Kozo, reviewed the film at Hong Kong Asian Film Festival 2007, felt that Assembly is a safe commercial movie that doesnt offend anybody. In Assembly, war is never really portrayed as a cause. The human element is the main focus here, and the sacrifices made by soldiers are to be honored because theyre people, and not members of one side or the other. (http://www.lovehkfilm.com/panasia/assembly.htm)SequelSoon after the release of the film, a sequel named Assembly 2: The Cold Flame (2-) was already in the works: it was released in March 2008, and also starred actor Hanyu in a leading role.(http://www.chinadaily.com.cn/entertainment/2008-02/26/content_6485093.htm) This particular movie centers on the relationship between a wounded KMT soldier and an orphaned girl during the Sino-Japanese War (the Chinese theater of War II), but unlike the original the film distinctly contains very few war scenes, focusing more on the personal drama that occurs between the characters.Awards and nominations;45th Golden Horse Awards*Won: Best Actor (Hanyu)*Nominated: Best Feature Film*Nominated: Best Adapted Screenplay*Nominated: Best Visual Effects*Nominated: Best Action Choreography*Nominated: Best Sound Effects;2008 Flowers Awards*Won: Best Film;2009 Rooster Awards*Won: Best Film*Won: Best Film Director*Won: Best Cinematography*Won: Best Original Music Score;11th International Film Festival*Won: Best Picture*Won: Best DirectorReferencesExternal links****Assembly at Projector.tvde guerreja: zh:
16597367
Energia_Lunar_Expedition
The Energia Lunar Expedition was a project that was initiated by Glushko during 1988 to create a base using the Energia booster. The moon base was to be eventually used for mining 3 from the lunar surface.  Hardware The Energia expeditions involved at least two sections of hardware. which were placed into a earth orbit in separate Energia launches. Mission Profile  See also * Moonshot* race External links *Link to the space encyclopedia.
16623521
Evens_&_Howard_Fire_Brick_Co.
File:Evens and Howard firebrick.jpg|thumb|240px|An Evens & Howard fire brick found at the Joliet Iron Works ruins in Joliet, Illinois, USA.The Evens & Howard Fire Brick Company was a manufacturer of bricks in St. Louis, Missouri, USA. It was founded formally in 1855 as the Cheltenham Fireclay Works and achieved sales as far away as Quebec( and Africa. One source dates the beginning of the company back to 1837 but under different owners.() In 1855, the firm was owned by a man named Charles Chouteau.( The firm was incorporated in 1867 when Evens & Howard took possession of it.( At the time of its operation, it was one of the oldest manufacturers of fire bricks in St. Louis.()() At one point, its grounds covered 133 acres.() According to one report, the mining was done below ground by pick and blast and the company had an extensive equipment network of cars and tracks to bring clay to the plant.(Evens & Howard also produced sewer pipe beginning as early as 1858.()Richmond HeightsEvens & Howard were instrumental in the establishment of the American neighborhoods in Richmond Heights, Missouri in the early 1900s. segregation at the time restricted African Americans to specific portions of St. Louis County, and Evens & Howard needed workers for the nearby brickworks. They were able to convince officials to develop the neighborhoods, and many families moved in once the company built employee housing.()ReferencesExternal links* Bob Corbetts page on Evens & Howard* Historical sketch from Comptons* Magazine article circa 1904
16656998
Nuclear_density_gauge
A nuclear density gauge is a tool used in civil construction and the industry, as well as for mining and archaeology purposes. It consists of a radiation source that emits a directed beam of particles and a sensor that counts the received particles that are either reflected by the test material or pass through it. By calculating the percentage of particles that return to the sensor, the gauge can be calibrated to measure the density and inner structure of the test material.Different variants are used for different purposes. For density analysis of very shallow objects such as roads or walls, a gamma source emitter such as 137Cesium is used to produce gamma radiation. Those particles are effective in analyzing the top 10 inches (25 centimeters) with high accuracy. 226Radium is used for depths of 328 yards (300 meters). Such instruments can help find underground caves or identify locations with lower density that would make tunnel construction hazardous.Nuclear density gauges can also be used to measure the density of a liquid in a pipe.  If a source is mounted on one side of a pipe and a detector on the other, the amount of radiation seen at the detector is dependant upon the shielding provided by the liquid in the pipe.  Tracerco pioneered the use of radiation to measure density in the 1950s and determined that the law also applied to radiation as well as optics.  Gauges are normally calibrated using gas and a liquid of known density to find the unknowns in the equation.  Once it has been calibrated and as long as the source detector alignment remains constant, it is possible to calculate the density of the liquid in the pipe.  One factor is the life of the radioactive source, ( for  Cs137, 30 years) which means that the system needs to be recalibrated at regular intervals.  Modern systems incorporate correction for source decay.()  Another variant is to use a strong neutron source like 241Americium to produce radiation and then measure the energy of returning scattering. As hydrogen characteristically slows down neutrons,  the sensor can calculate the density of hydrogen - and find pockets of underground water, humidity up to a depth of several meters, moisture content, or asphalt content.  Neutron sources can also be used to assess the performance of (oil production) in the same way.  Gas, oil, water and sand all have different concentrations of hydrogen atoms which reflect different amounts of slow neutons.  Using a head which contains an Am241Be source and a slow neutron detector, by scanning it up and down a separator it is possible to determine the interface levels within the separator.  Nuclear density gauges are typically operated in one of two modes:Direct transmission:  The retractable rod is lowered into the mat through a pre-drilled hole.  The source emits radiation, which then interact with electrons in the material and lose energy and/or are redirected (scattered).  Radiation that loses sufficient energy or is scattered away from the detector is not counted.  The denser the material, the higher the probability of interaction and the lower the detector count.  Therefore, the detector count is inversely proportional to material density.  A calibration factor is used to relate the count to the actual density. Backscatter:  The retractable rod is lowered so that it is even with the detector but still within the instrument.  The source emits radiation, which then interact with electrons in the material and lose energy and/or are redirected (scattered).  Radiation that is scattered towards the detector is counted.  The denser the material, the higher the probability that radiation will be redirected towards the detector.  Therefore, the detector count is proportional to the density.  A calibration factor is used to correlate the count to the actual density.Many devices are built to measure both the density and moisture content of material. This is important to the Civil construction industry specifically as both are essential to creating suitable soil environments to support structures, streets, highways, and airport runways.ReferencesExternal linksNuclear Density Gauge http://training.ce.washington.edu/WSDOT/Modules/07_construction/nuclear_gauge.htm
16685091
Scranton,_Utah
Scranton is a town in Tooele County, Utah, States. Located in Barlow Canyon near the Juab County line, it was a short-lived mining town. Scranton has been uninhabited for nearly a century, but some of its ruins have survived relatively intact.HistoryScranton was founded in 1908 around the New Bullion Mine, a lead and zinc mine.() It was part of the North Mining District, organized in 1902 for the areas silver, lead, and zinc mines. The new town became the home of the Scranton Mining and Smelting Company, the owners naming it after Pennsylvania, their home town.()Some 90 miners lived in Scranton, a few with families. The town included homes, a house, store/office, and office. The large pocket of good ore at the New Bullion lasted only about two years, and the town began to dwindle.( Then in October 1914 a new company called the South Scranton was organized, and miners dug a long tunnel in search of other mineral resources. During War I Scranton produced tungsten, sending it by insured post due to its scarcity.( After the war the town quickly emptied.Four old buildings remained in fine condition as late as 1971, when a fire ignited by a National Guard exercise burned two of them to the ground. The other two buildings and some mine equipment continue to mark the site of old Scranton.(See also* Standard Reduction MillReferences(External links* Scranton at GhostTowns.com
16685227
List_of_proposed_power_stations_in_Australia
 Fossil Fuelled  Hydro  Biomass  Landfill Gas  Wind  See also * power in Australia* power in Australia* mining in Australia* policy of Australia* of global warming on Australia* of power stations in Australia
16700545
Richard_Davey_(MP)
Richard Davey (12 April 1799  24 June 1884) was one of the two MPs for the West Cornwall Constituency for eleven years (The Times, Saturday, 21 March 1857; pg. 12; Issue 22634; col A  and The Times, Wednesday, 1 April 1857; pg. 5; Issue 22643; col E The Elections.). He was a JP and a Lieutenant of the County of Cornwall (The Times, Friday, Jun 27, 1884; pg. 10; Issue 31171; col E Obituary)(Burkes Genealogical and Heraldic Dictionary of the Landed Gentry of Great Britain 1862, p345, Davey of Redruth.).His familyHe was a son of William Davey (d.1827), a solicitor of Redruth and Elizabeth Martyn (b.1756), his wife. His older brother, Stephen (17851864) was also a JP and a Deputy Lieutenant of the County. There was another brother, William, who was a solicitor and died in 1849. Stephen and Richard were adventurers in the development of Cornish mines, during the boom period. They acquired an ancient manor house and estate at Bochym in Cury (Bernard Deacon The reformulation of territorial identity: Cornwall in the late eighteenth and nineteenth centuries, Chapter 5 Institutionalising Cornwall: the role of a social elite, (Ph.D. thesis for Open University) on Univ. of Exeter online database of research papers: The Exeter Research and Institutional Content archive (ERIC). and Country Life, June 2008: Gentlemans manor house in Cornwall for sale: Bochym Manor (rebuilt 1699) has a wealth of architectural details with a stunning drawing room in French Empire style with ornate wall panels and ceiling cornices and stained glass windows, a library with exposed beams and hand-carved Italian walnut linenfold panelling and Jacobean drawing room with very early plaster relief ceiling and English walnut panelling.In all, the Grade II* listed house has 10 bedrooms, seven reception rooms, a staff flat, Gothic farmhouse, 13 cottages, outbuildings, historic landscaped walled and water gardens, bluebell wood and trout river.).EducationHe was educated at School and at the of EdinburghParliamentary serviceHe was elected to the House of Commons for one of the two seats of West Cornwall at the General Election of 1857, as a Liberal, following the retirement of Sir Lemon. Michael Williams, another Liberal, held the other seat. were elected without opposition on 2 April, John Tremayne, the Conservative, having stood down (. He was re-elected for this seat until 1868.DeathHe died 1884 (The Times, Thursday, Jun 26, 1884; pg. 1; Issue 31170; col A 24 June: Deaths), aged 85, unmarried. His nephew, Joshua Sydney Davey (18421909), son of Stephen inherited his estate at Bochym in the Parish of Cury(Bochym Manor House and Clock tower, illustrated at this site.)(Record Office holds archives and papers of the Davey Family for the period 1795 to 1908: Cornwall (Bochym in Cury, etc) estate and mining business accounts and papers and misc Davey family diaries.).References
16721343
Kappaphycus_alvarezii
Kappaphycus alvarezii (syn. K. cottonii) is a species of alga. It is one of the most important commercial sources of carrageenans, a family of gel-forming, viscosifying polysaccharides. Farming methods affect the character of the carrageenan that can be extracted from the seaweed.(Wong Hai Fatt, and Suhaimi Md. Yasir. 2008. Characterization of kappa-carrageenan from Kappaphycus alvarezii (Rhodophyta, Solieriaceae) for different types of cultivation techniques using FT-IR. In Analytical Chemical Malaysia, Kota Kinabalu, Sabah,  Malaysia. 65-68.)This alga grows to two meters long and is green or yellow in color.(Marine Algae of Hawaii) It is very fast-growing, known to double its biomass in 15 days.(Different carrageenan types differ in composition and conformation, resulting in a wide range of rheological and functional properties. Carrageenans are used in a variety of commercial applications as gelling, thickening, and stabilizing agents, especially in food products such as frozen desserts, chocolate milk, cottage cheese, whipped cream, instant products, yogurt, jellies, pet foods, and sauces. Aside from these functions, carrageenans are used in pharmaceutical formulations, cosmetics, and industrial applications such as mining.(Hayashi , E. J. D. Paula , and F. Chow. 2007b. Growth rate and carrageenan analyses in four strains of Kappaphycus alvarezii (Rhodophyta, Gigartinales) farmed in the subtropical water of SaoPaulostate,Brazil. J Appl Phycol. 19:393-399.)  Carrageenan is extracted from this seaweed in two ways. In native extraction, the seaweed is made into an solution, and the residue is filtered, leaving nearly pure carrageenan. The alkaline-modified method is less expensive and easier. The seaweed is mixed in an alkali solution, leaving a mixture of carrageenan and cellulose that can be sold as semirefined carrageenan.K. alvarezii is affected by ice-ice, a disease that severely reduces its yield.This alga is an species and a noxious aquatic weed in Hawaii.(However, recent molecular studies have revealed the most abundant species in Hawaii reported to caused an invasion on the coral reefs is actually Euchema denticulatum and not K. alvarezii.((see Zucarrello, et al. 2006 Journal Applied Phycology Vol 18 nr 3-5 pg 643-651).) K. alvarezii has been and will be introduced into many different tropical places, since it is the main source of carrageenan in the world. Several thousands coastal people can be benefit from its cultivation. Most notably, it is increasingly being cultivated on the coasts of Rameshwaram, India. The local people call it, Pepsi Paasi since it was the PepsiCo which started the cultivation of this alga here. References(External links*AlgaeBase
16749699
Brunner_Mine_disaster
Brunner Mine was on the West Coast of New Zealand.An explosion deep in the Mine at 9.30am on Thursday 26 March 1896 killed all 65 miners inside, and was the worst disaster of Zealands history.It seemed most likely that the explosion was caused by firedamp, a common hazard in coal mines when a pocket of methane gas is accidentally ignited and explodes. Firedamp is all the more hazardous because of the after effects of the explosion. Gases known as afterdamp  dioxide and monoxide produced by the explosion  often prove to be just as deadly and can kill miners unhurt by the explosion itself.(Cawte, H (2008). Case Studies In Archaeological Research: The Archaeology of Mining, Lecture 5: Safety, Clothing, Housing, University Of Otago, 10 March.)Joseph Scott, the Blackball Mine Manager.., believed that the majority (of miners) were killed by the explosion and not more than half a dozen by the afterdamp. Robert Russell, believing the explosion to be caused by firedamp, while acknowledging that the explosion force and coal dust flames contributed to the causes of death, believed that at the end it was the afterdamp gases that killed them (all). Dr. James McBreartys description of many victims frothing at the mouth, suggests asphyxiation by the predominant afterdamp gas, being carbon dioxide. The afterdamp gas carbon monoxide which presented such a problem for the recovery teams must also have contributed to death through poisoning. It was not then fully appreciated that only small quantities of carbon monoxide or white damp could be fatal.()Rescuers entering the mine after the explosion found themselves suffocating on the afterdamp gas and had to return to the surface, often unconscious, carried by other rescuers,( however the determination was such to find the bodies, and to find any survivors, that the rescuers  mostly miners from nearby mines  would insist on returning to the airless mine as soon as they had been revived on the surface.()Miners came from as far as Denniston to assist the rescue effort, albeit that it took the Denniston miners several days to arrive as they had to travel by sea from Westport. Wood explains this:The response of the West Coast miners in volunteering for the rescue parties was due to their occupational loyalties and social and kinship ties. Occupational bonding, especially of coal miners, requires obedience to the miners code that they come to each others assistance. Denniston miners and mine managers, like Blackball miners, included former workmates, relatives and friends belonging to the same generation of immigrants, particularly those arriving between 1875 and 1885.( According to Wood:  The tragedy helped to break down some old world differences and establish a West Coast identity especially in the mining community.(The bodies of all 65 miners from the Brunner mine were eventually accounted for, including a Mr. John Roberts and three of his sons who were all working that day(.See also*in New Zealand*accident*River Mine disasterReferencesExternal links*Brunner Mine disaster at Ara*Brunner Mine disaster at the City Libraries*Folk song on the Brunner Mine Disaster*Rootsweb page on the disaster Minen onnettomuus
16765840
Rosh_Pinah
footnotes                Rosh Pinah is a mining town() located in southern Namibia, close to the border with Africa. West of the town lies Diamond Area 1, the main diamond mining area of Namibia. Rosh Pinah belongs to the Oranjemund electoral constituency. The town is connected via road to Aus.()ReferencesPinahPinah
16785455
Novar_plc
Novar plc was an international group based in the United Kingdom with core activities in Security Systems, Aluminium Extrusion and Cheque Printing. It was bought by Honeywell in 2005, and its activities merged. Under its previous name, MB-Caradon plc, it was a constituent of the 100 Index.History of NovarNovar was the name adopted by Caradon in 2001 which had by that point acquired its character after a result of a complex series of mergers, acquisitions, and divestments. Caradon itself had been incorporated in 1985, but the company as a whole traces its origins to those of the giant of the British packaging and tinning industry, Metal Box. In 1989 MB Group (as Metal Box was by then known) had merged with Caradon to create MB-Caradon. In 1993 MB-Caradon divested itself of its packaging roots and given this dropped the MB element of the name to become Caradon. A change in the strategy of the company towards developing a profile for providing holistic building security and controls solutions led to another name change in 2001, when the company became known as Novar. In 2005, after a period of streamlining and divestment, the company was bought by Honeywell, previously one of its biggest competitors in the Building Security and Controls sector.1921  1945: Founding of Metal Box to World War IIIn 1921 the Allied Tin Box Makers was formed by four family firms of tin box makers, Hudson Scott, F. Atkins & Co., Henry Grant & Co., and Barclay & Fry, as a natural progression from the close cooperation they had participated in during the First World War. In that war, the British Tin Box Manufacturers Federation had been faced with dealing with government restrictions on tin whilst having to meet the needs of supplying the ration tin used by British troops. A year later they became Metal Box & Printing Industries. In the late 1920s Metal Box, to avoid a takeover by American Can, arranged a partnership with American Cans U.S. rival, Continental Can, giving Metal Box exclusive right in Great Britain to purchase canning machinery, technical advice, training, and patent licenses from Continental Can. A year later Metal Box bought out British Can, American Cans subsidiary. These deals were arranged by Robert Barlow who also wanted to bring all member companies under one authority and ignored those on the board who opposed him. In 1931 Barlow saw off an attempt by the managing director of Barclay & Fry to have him fired and by 1935 he was in complete control of Metal Box and had succeeded in centralizing sales and supplies, and rationalizing production functions. During the Depression the company purchased smaller canmakers and by 1937, Metal Box was selling 335 million cans a year. Where it encountered problems at suppliers it considered a takeover and grew in this fashion also.Metal Boxs income from security cheque printing was good, this business having been inherited from one of the four founding family firms, Barclay & Fry, which had been established in 1855 by Robert Barclay who had printed cheques for a distant relatives bank, Bank. The income from printing combined with turnover from machine manufacturing and interests in mining was double that of its income from the cans themselves. Profits rose from 103,480 in 1931 to 316,368 in 1939 for Metal Box. Throughout the decade interests internationally grew and Metal Box was to expand within Europe and the British colonies, while Continental Can would develop interests in the rest of the world. World War II changed Metal Boxs direction with it producing gas mask containers, casings for antitank mines, shell casings and ration tins by the millions. Even so, due to strict government controls, company profits fell to 242,428 in 1945.(Reader, W.J., Metal Box: A History, London: Heinemann, 1976.)1945  1970: DiversificationAfter the war Metal Box quickly moving toward paper, foil, and plastic container products as the postwar economy began to improve. It also still dominated the British can and carton market. By the 1960s, Metal Box was the leading packaging supplier to some of the largest companies in the world, including Unilever, Nestl, Heinz, Tobacco, BAT, ICI, Hoechst, and Shell. Throughout this period there were a number of Managing Directors although Barlow still maintained overall control until his retirement in 1961. In 1950, reacting to a Department of Justice investigation, cooperation between Continental Can and Metal Box was restricted to machinery and technical information with all mutual ventures and attempts at market controls being dropped. In 1967 the Board of Trade referred the British can industry to the Commission, which ruled that Metal Box was operating a monopoly(Metal Box was in 1967 supplying 77 percent of all metal containers, 63 percent of aerosols, and 80 percent of open-top cans.) However, the Commission concluded that this did not harm the public interest and even praised Metal Box for passing on savings to its customers. However, its exclusive arrangements with customers and with suppliers were ended. By 1970, through acquisition(In Britain Metal Box had acquired Wallis Tin Stamping Co., Brown Bibby & Gregory, and Flexible Packaging) Metal Box had widened its product line to include plastic film, aerosols, central heating, and engineering.(1970s - Movement away from packaging and the deal with CarnaudIn the 1970s, under the direction of Chairman and Chief Executive Page, the company diversified outside of packaging, primarily through acquisitions, into the manufacturing of radiators used in central heating systems as well as a machinery. In late 1975 a new diversified products group was created, alongside a packaging group that included Metal Boxs traditional businesses and the company relocated headquarters from central London to Berkshire.(Oates, David, Metal Box Re-Packages Its Operations, International Management, May 1976, pp. 10-13.) Sales reached the $1 billion mark in 1976. In 1978 the company abandoned its licensing deal with Continental Can, which resulted in increased competition at home and abroad. But in 1979 Metal Box opened a two-piece can plant in California, that eventually would supply Pepsi-Cola with 625 million cans a year.(Metal Box Aims to Kick Continental Can, World Business Weekly, September 1, 1980, pp. 10-11.) In Europe Metal Box sought to build on its existing operations in southern Europe and entered into a licensing agreement with Frances Carnaud(Whereby Metal Box provided equipment and expertise for a two-piece can plant near Brussels to be built by Carnaud. Cans from the plant were to be sold in the Benelux countries and parts of France and West Germany.) By the end of the 1970s revenues had reached $2.7 billion.(1980s - From recession to MB-CaradonBy the mid-1980s Dr. Brian Smith, the man who had turned around ICI, had been brought in as chairman to steady a company that had been rocked by the recession.(Foster, Geoffrey, The Remaking of Metal Box, Management Today, January 1985, pp. 43-51.) By 1988, the group was renamed the MB Group, and Murray Stuart, formerly the finance director, became chief executive. The name change emphasized the move away from the Metal Box tinning roots. The company was now Europes largest manufacturer of central heating radiators, through its Stelrad unit(Stelrad was boosted further in 1988 with the acquisition of the leading producer of radiators in continental Europe, Henrad Beheer of Belgium); the Stelrad Doulton brand in bathroom products was strong; and its Clarke Checks subsidiary had become the fourth largest printer of cheques in the United States. 1988 also saw the company become a 25.5% stakeholder in the third largest packaging company in the world, when, in October 1988 MBs packaging operations merged with those of Carnaud to form CMB Packaging SA, based in Brussels.(Campbell, Colin, MB Ties Up Packaging Interests with Carnaud, The Times (London), October 27, 1988, p. 25.) Although Carnaud gained management control, MB Group was able to used the 240 million in cash it received from the merger to further bolster its nonpackaging units which it did in September 1989, acquiring American Bank Stationery Co to enlarge its U.S. cheque printing operations.Previously, in 1985, a company called Caradon had been founded through a 61 million management buyout of the U.K. building products division of International. In 1987 this company went public to become Caradon plc. Caradon was brand driven having some of the most recognisable names in British plumbing, including Twyfords bathroom and sanitary products, Mira showers, Terrain plastic pipes, and Celuform plastic timber. This company was an obvious fit for the direction in which MB Group was moving, and in October 1989 MB acquired Caradon plc in a 337.6 million reverse takeover, with half the amount in cash and half in Caradon shares converted to those of MB.(Bowditch, Gillian, Caradon Agrees 337m Deal with MB Group, The Times (London), October 4, 1989, p. 31.) MB-Caradon plc was formed, Smith retired and MBs chief executive, Stuart, became chairman of the new company, with Peter Jansen, Caradons chief, becoming chief executive.1990s: MB-Caradon to Caradon to NovarIn April 1993 MB-Caradons sold its stake in Carnaud MetalBox (CMB). Within five months, MB-Caradon then paid 800 million for RTZ Corp.s RTZ Pillar industrial products group gaining construction, general engineering, automotive, and aviation operations. With the company now having divested itself of its Metal Box tinning roots, it was decided to drop the MB from the companys name, thus MB-Caradon became Caradon.(Urry, Maggie, Bold Deal Soothes Anxious Onlookers, Financial Times, August 26, 1993, p. 19.) The company was a leader in doors and windows, as well as plumbing and electrical products, structural and engineering operations, and security printing. In 1994, sales reached 1.61 billion, while operating profits were a record 205.4 million. In 1995, Caradon extended its reach further into Eyrope with the acquisition of a 43 percent stake in Weru Aktiengesellschaft, the German leader in doors and windows. The combined effect of a sharp fall in sales of US doors and windows, raw materials cost increases and a U.K. building industry general depression led to a fall in operating profits to 127.1 million. The resulting restructuring led to 1,600 jobs being eliminated and the directors of the five divisions now reporting directly to the CEO. Also, in December 1996, Caradon sold off 18 non-core businesses for a total of 220 million ($360 million), including most of its European engineering and distribution operations, whilst increasing its stake in Weru to almost 80 percent. By late 1997, a further collapse of the windows and doors business both in the USA and in the United Kingdom, led to a change in leadership. Hintz, former head of Carnaud MetalBox, was appointed CEO.(Taylor, Andrew, Caradon Signals Boardroom Shake-up: Building Products Group Poised to Name New Chief Executive, Financial Times (London), November 14, 1997, p. 17) Hintz set about trying to strengthen the companys corporate identity. The companys wide range of unrelated interests made this a difficult task and so he looked to selling off some of the companys less promising businesses. First to go were the door and window businesses, then the interests in plastic pipes and garage doors. In October 2000 it sold its plumbing business to HSBC Private Equity for 442 million. Hintz considered that the companys true strength lay in the various brands concerned with building security and controls, coined the intelligent building systems unit. Caradon was already the sole supplier of sprinkler systems to the Wal-Mart chain, as well as the lighting and temperature control units for Sainsburys. (Information on Novar plc)2000 - 2005: Novar and the Honeywell takeoverIn October 2000 Hintz was still forced to admit that in essence, Caradon has no real core business. and in December 2000 the UK Value Fund, an investment group that owned a 10 percent stake in Caradon, called for an emergency shareholder meeting to reevaluate the companys strategy. Active Value wanted to force the company to commit to a single core business as well as put a freeze on acquisitions of more than 10 million, and buy back 130 million of its own shares. Hintz repelled this action by promising to undertake a thorough restructuring.(Felsted, Andrea, Caradon Defends Acquisition Strategy, Financial Times (London), December 29, 2000, p. 18.) The first thing that happened was that the company considered its overall branding. Caradon as a name had been most associated with plumbing and bathroom products, businesses that had now been sold off. Therefore the time was ripe for a name change. The name adopted was Novar plc, in early 2001. Novar was in fact the name of one of the companys North American subsidiaries, Novar Controls Corporation. However, the name was picked because it conveyed a meaning of freshness and a new start. Almost immediately, the company posted strong full year results seemingly vindicating Hintz.(Telegraph - Hintz vindicated as Novar hits 186m) The company proceeded on three fronts with three divisions: IAS (Indalex Aluminum Solutions), concerned with aluminium Extrusion; SPS (Security Printing Services), concerned with cheque printing; and IBS (Intelligent Building Systems) being the most diverse, concerned with providing security and controls systems to businesses. This third division was brand led, with the name Novar taking a back seat to the more recognised names in the industry that were owned by Novar PLC, such as Trend, Gent, visiOprime, MK and Friedland, (this is with the obvious exception of Novar Controls in the United States. However, the company did not fulfill the hoped for stabilisation of its corporate profile, and issued a number of profit warnings to the London Stock Exchange(UK Active Value Funds Bryan Myerson, with 11.2% of Novar, said he was furious at the companys second profit warning and may call an EGM to force CEO Jurgen Hintz to resign. The Daily Telegraph Saturday 20 October 2001) in the years up to 2004.In 2004, Melrose, a tiny AIM-listed company led by a former Hanson executive that was set up specifically to look for companies to buy,(Independent On-line: Business Bid battle looms as Novar rejects Melrose (8 November 2004)) made two attempts to but Novar, the higher one being valued at 625m, both of which were rejected. Then in December 2004, Honeywell made a 1.2bn ($2.3bn) bid which the board of Novar recommended.(Honeywell offers 1.2bn for Novar  BBC News, 13 December 2004)(The offer was 798m or 1.85 per share for each Novar share, with another 331m for preference shares and debt.) The acquisition was finalised on 31 March 2005.  Dave Cote, Honeywell Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, said of the acquisition: Novar is a great investment for Honeywell. The IBS business fits perfectly with our ACS business and significantly strengthens our European fire detection, environmental controls, security, and services businesses. We are working hard to quickly and efficiently integrate this business into Honeywell.  However, he made it clear that IAS and SPS would be sold quickly because although strong businesses in their respective industries they did not fit with the Honeywell portfolio.(Honeywell Completes Acquisition of Novar plc; Final Clearance from European Commission Confirmed - Business Wire,  March 31, 2005)Principal subsidiaries prior to sale to HoneywellThe subsidiaries were:(Novar PLC Annual Report and Accounts 2002 to 2004)*Intelligent Building Systems Division**Electric Limited**Friedland Limited**Esser Security Systems GmbH (Germany);**Esser-effeff Alarm GmbH (Germany);**Gent Limited;**Eltek Fire and Safety Systems AS (Norway);**visiOprime Limited (UK);**Trend Control Systems Limited;**Controls Corporation (U.S.A.);**Innovex Controls Inc. (U.S.A.);**Brand-Rex Limited;**Albert Ackermann GmbH & Co. KG (Germany);*Indalex Aluminum Solutions Division**Indalex (U.S.A./Canada);**Mideast Aluminum (U.S.A.);**Indal Technologies Inc. (Canada);**Indalloy (Canada);**Brampton Foundries Limited (Canada);*Security Printing Services Division**Clarke American Checks, Inc. (U.S.A.);**Checks in the Mail, Inc. (U.S.A.)References(Further reading*Reader, W.J., Metal Box: A History, London: Heinemann, 1976.*Foster, Geoffrey, The Remaking of Metal Box, Management Today, January 1985, pp. 43-51.
16797497
Edna_Goodrich
Edna Goodrich (born Bessie Edna Stevens; December 22, 1883 &ndash; May 26, 1972) was an American Broadway actress, Florodora girl, author, and media sensation during the early 1900s.  At one point, she was known as one of Americas wealthiest and best dressed performers. She was married to Edwin Stacey of Cincinnati, Ohio, and later C. Goodwin.FamilyThe daughter of Nellie Goodrich and A.S. Stevens, Edna was raised by her great-grandfather, Abner Scott Thornton, a member of the influential Logansport Thorntons.  His brothers included William Patton Thornton, a noted physician; Henry Clay Thornton, a prominent lawyer and father of Henry Worth Thornton; and Dr. Joseph Lyle Thornton, a respected educator and manufacturer.  Judge Wheeler Thornton was his nephew(www.thorntonsoky.blogspot.com).  Among his influential cousins were Military Reconstruction Judge Johnston Thornton and Hon. W. Thornton, a member of the 1887 Nebraska State Legislature.Her grandfather, Justus Goodrich, died in an insane asylum in Illinois on June 3, 1896.  He long suffered from mental illness, derived from sunstroke received on the march to the of Gettysburg.  During the battle, on July 2, 1863, he was shot in the heel(See obituary: Logansport Pharos, June 4, 1896; page 8).Early careerUpon reaching her maturity, Edna and her mother moved to York City, where both found work as chorus girls.  Edna Goodrich joined the cast of the Florodora musical, as one of the famed sextets, all of whom were extremely beautiful, 54, and 130 lbs.  Out of more than 70 women who became a Florodora girl, Edna was one of a handful who achieved lasting fame(Aronson, Rudolph. Theatrical and Musical Memoirs; McBride, Nast, and Company, 1913).It was as a sextet that Edna Goodrich became involved in the Kendall Thaw murder trial, which was labeled of the Century by Randolph Hearsts newspapers.  Thaw killed architect White during a performance at Square Garden over Mr. Whites relationship to Nesbit. It was reported that Edna Goodrich had introduced fellow Floradora chorus girl Nesbit and White during an intimate meeting in Whites apartment. Edna Goodrich was served with several subpoenas during the trial, reportedly tearing one apart in front of the serving agent. She denied any knowledge of the affair(Reno Evening Gazette, Jan. 9, 1908; May 12, 1908).1905-1910After leaving Floradora, Edna Goodrich became the leading lady of the C. Goodwin comedic productions.  Mr. Goodwin was the most famous American comedian of his era and scion of a mining family that had made millions.  Their performances played to packed theaters across the States and Europe, making both fodder for early news sensationalism.In 1908 Goodrich and Goodwin became involved in a confusing sequence of events and news reports that would lead to their marriage.  First, the press linked Edna with millionaire H. McMillan; however, as the marriage date was continuously postponed, rumors began to circulate of discord.  Edna affirmed the engagement and then took off for Europe on a $20,000 spending spree.  Afraid of losing Edna, Nat Goodwin sailed to Europe to convince her that Mr. McMillanwas actually poor.  He hired private investigators to tail Ms. Goodrich; She hired private investigators to stay one step ahead of his investigators.(Trenton Evening Times, May 12, 1908.)  This chase across Europe so unsettled Mr. McMillan that he asked Edna if she would not rather marry immediately in Switzerland.  She said that she wanted to marry in her own country and set sail for the United States with her purchases.(Trenton Evening Times, April 16, 1906; September 9, 1908.)  Surprisingly, within short order, the wedding was called off- the press attributed this change to Mr. McMillans mother who had refused her consent after hearing of Edna Goodrichs involvement in the divorce of Nat Goodwin from his third wife, Elliott.  The press later reported that Ms. Elliot became engaged to Mr. McMillan.In the fall of 1908, Nat C. Goodwin and Edna Goodrich were married.  The bride reportedly wore more than $60,000 worth of jewelry(Trenton Evening News, Nov 9, 1908)  Also, Nat and Edna signed a prenuptial agreement, entitling her to half of his estate and an income for life.  At first, the press believed the amount conferred to be $400,000, but later, during divorce proceedings, it was revealed that the amount totaled more than $1.7 million.1911-1920By the summer of 1910, the press began to circulate rumors of the Goodwins impending separation amid rumors over Nat Goodwins flirtation with another actress(Trenton Evening Times, June 3, 1910.)  This began a two year press and court battle over the terms of the prenuptial trust, with both Goodrich and Goodwin filing repeated suits against one another.  The official divorce was granted in New York, with the judge allowing Ms. Goodrich to once again use her maiden name and barring Mr. Goodwin from ever marrying in the state again(The Washington Post, July 26, 1911).From 1914 to August 1915, Edna Goodrich served as a nurse of War I wounded for the British Army.  Her cottage was later turned into a home for soldiers returning from the front.(The Syracuse Herald, Aug. 15, 1915; Trenton Evening Times, Oct. 18, 1915)  Her mothers cousin, Henry Worth Thornton, was the highest ranking American-born officer in the British Army.For the rest of the decade, Edna worked in theater and appeared in several movies of the Silent Screen, although she never captured the same degree of success as she enjoyed on stage. Also, she reportedly developed an alcohol addiction that caused her to be fired on the set of The Golden Chance (1915) by B. DeMille(Birchard, Richard S. Cecil B. Demilles Hollywood, 2004 (pg. 72)).Edna Goodrich retired from making films in 1918.Theater and Movie ProductionsMovies*Treason (1918) .... The Wife,*Her Husbands Honor (1918) as Nancy Page,*Who Loved Him Best? (1918) as Doria Dane (aka His Inspiration)*Her Second Husband (1917) as Helen Kirby,*American Maid (1917) as Virginia Lee,*Daughter of Maryland (1917) as Beth Treadway,*Reputation (1917) as Constance Bennett,*Queen X (1917) as Janice Waltham, Queen X,*The House of Lies (1916) as Edna Coleman,*The Making of Maddalena (1916) as Maddalena,*Armstrongs Wife (1915) as May Fielding,TheaterBroadway:*The Runaways 1903,*Mamselle Napoleon 1903-4,*A Jolly Baron 1905,*The Rollicking Girl 1905-6,*The Genius 1906,*The Easterner 1908,Other prominent productions*Evangeline 1913-1914,*Floradora 1900-1904Author*Deynards Divorce 1912NotesExternal links*Edna Goodrich at IMDb.com*Edna Goodrich at IBDb.com*Edna Goodrich pics & textGoodrich
16817050
Sulfur_Springs
thumb|right|300px|Active sulfur vents in Sulfur Springs.Sulfur Springs is a popular tourist attraction found in Soufrire, Lucia. In fact, the town of Soufrire got its name from the sulfur mining in the 19th century.  Sulfur Springs was a formerly active dome volcano that had its last major eruption 40,000 years ago. Its last minor eruption occurred in 1780. The volcanos dome collapsed many years ago to form a  caldera. Although there has not been an eruption for over 200 years, sulfur still billows from the cracks in the caldera. Also, there are active boiling mud pits around the area. Sulfur Springs is currently the worlds only drive-in volcano.(Sulphur Springs Park - Drive-in Volcano, Soufriere) References  External links *A video clip of Sulfur Springs*Information on Sulfur Springs*Panoramic virtual tour of Sulfur Springs
16835723
Rigs-to-Reefs
Rigs-to-Reefs (RTR) is a nationwide program developed by the Management Service (MMS) () of the Department of the Interior to turn decommissioned offshore oil and petroleum rigs into reefs.OverviewThe United States began mining oil offshore in the early 20th Century;() yet the concern over abandoned oil rigs surfaced only in the 1980s. Today over 4,500 offshore oil and gas platforms have been installed supplying 25% of the United States production of gas and 10% of its oil.(http://www.wlf.louisiana.gov/fishing/programs/habitat/artificialreef.cfm Louisiana Department of Wildlife and Fisheries) These platforms continue to function as long as the reservoirs underneath them provide oil at a profitable rate. At the end of their productive lives they must be decommissioned and removed within one year.() An alternative to removal is to turn the rig into a reef through the Rigs-to-Reef (RTR) program. All coastal states have such reef programs in the interest of increasing ocean fisheries but not all participate in RTR.()(http://www.slc.ca.gov/Division_Pages/MRM/Rigs_to_Reef/Whitepaper.html State of California State and Lands Commission) The rigs steel structures are stable and durable.( They create shelter for marine life in open waters where there was none.Rigs-to-Reefs ProcessOnce a rig stops producing economic quantities of oil, the site is usually abandoned.() The Management Service (MMS) requires the operator to remove the rig within a year of abandonment (stopped production() and lease end.( MMS supports and encourages RTR as an alternative to total removal.( RTR recognizes that during a rigs productive years, significant marine life comes to live on and around its structure. RTR preserves much of that marine life and encourages further growth. The operator benefits by avoiding the substantial cost of removal. Cumulative costs of removal had reached an estimated $1 billion by the year 2000.()  The shape and complexity of the structure may lead to significant species diversity.Decommissioning a PlatformOfficially, decommissioning an oil rig is the act of removal according to regulatory requirements and includes flushing, plugging and cementing wells to make them safe.( Decommissioning is complicated by factors such as cost, safety, operational duration, environmental issues, risk, experience, and historical relationship between operator and state.( As part of decommissioning, the operator must deal with the mound that collects on the bottom surrounding the rig. The mound consists of shells that have fallen from the rig, material that has fallen and/or leaked from the platform, mixed with well seepage. Mounds can contain significant levels of toxic metals including, arsenic, cadmium, chromium, copper, nickel, PCBs, lead, zinc, and poly-nuclear hydrocarbons. Removing the rig structure does not eliminate the need to address the mound.()The method of decommissioning depends on water depth and structure type(Sector Notebook Project; Office of Enforcement and Compliance Assurance, October 2000) and is a three step process that includes planning, permitting, and implementation.() A party other than the operator usually administers the process. In Louisiana, costs as well as the risk involved are the primary factors in determining how to decommission rigs. If the savings are large enough, the operator typically chooses reefing and donates 1/2 the savings to maintain the reef.( Decommissioning a shallow water rig typically costs $1015 million() so the amounts can be substantial.(http://www.slc.ca.gov/Division_Pages/MRM/Rigs_to_Reef/Whitepaper.html CA.gov Rigs-to-Reefs Workshop) The Louisiana Artificial Reef program from its inception through 1998 received roughly $9.7 million in donations and has not taken taxpayer money.(http://findarticles.com/p/articles/mi_qa5281/is_199811/ai_n24344412 The Greater Baton Rouge Business Report 1998)Methods of ReefingSevering the rig from the bottom using explosives is the easiest approach, but has the potential to harm marine life. This potential is greatly reduced if the explosives are all placed deep below the seafloor. Current requirements place the explosives a minimum of  below the seafloor which eliminates the threat to all but the closest sea turtles. Oceanographic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) Marine Fisheries Service (NMFS) marine observers and helicopter surveys hours preceding the event keep most sea turtles away from the area. Alternatively, divers can use mechanical and abrasive cutters, which preserves marine life, but places the divers at considerable risk.( Reefing involves one of three methods.:* Tow and Place: Sever the structure from the sea floor and tow it to a state-approved location.*Partial Removal: Remove the top portion of the submerged platform and either place it on the sea floor or tow it to another site.( Partial removal can result in a loss of the shell mound community and fish that live in the top section but the rest (the majority) of the habitat remains intact.(* Toppling: Toppling involves uses explosives to sever the base of the structure below the mud line. Then it simply falls over. Toppling eliminates shallow and mid-ocean habitats. However, these portions of the rig are quickly occupied by other creatures.(HistoryIn the early 1900s coastal oil exploration and drilling began around the United States. Initially, no laws governed this activity. In 1979, Exxon relocated their experimental subsea production system from offshore Louisiana to a permitted artificial reef site off Florida.() The first platform jacket was donated by Tenneco and towed from Louisiana to Florida.(By 2000, companies had donated 141 platforms to the effort.(LegislationCongress passed the Lands Act in 1953 to clarify responsibilities between state and federal government.()(http://www.mms.gov/aboutmms/pdffiles/submerged.pdf) This was immediately followed by the Continental Shelf Lands Act (OCSLA)(www.mms.gov/aboutmms/OCSLA/ocslahistory.htm) used to control leasing of exploration rights in the Continental Shelf (OCS).( The OCSLA did not contain any real environmental provisions associated with drilling and in 1969 an explosion at a drilling location off of Californias coast triggered the Environmental Policy Act (NEPA).(www.epa.gov/oecaerth/basics/nepa.html) NEPA concluded that every major federal action (i.e.: oil exploration on the OCS) required an Environmental Impact Statement (EIS).( In 1982, The U.S. of the Interior created the Management Service (MMS) to monitor development on the Continental Shelf.( The MMS leases submerged federal lands and assesses the environmental effects of exploration and drilling (by issuing an EIS).( In 1984 Congress passed the National Fishing Enhancement Act (NFEA) which provided the basis for artificial reef programs.( The NFEA spawned the National Artificial Reef Plan of 1985. This plan cleared the way for government-endorsed artificial reef projects and subsequently the Minerals Management Services Rigs-to-Reef program.(TrendsRigs-to-Reefs was first explored in 1979 when the first oil rig was transported from Louisiana to a Florida site.(http://www.gomr.mms.gov/homepg/offshore/egom/rigsreef.html Mineral Management Service: History of Rigs to Reefs offshore Florida) This rig was the first of 5 Rigs-to-Reefs towed to Floridas coast. Louisiana was the first state to develop a program that allowed transfer of liability and ownership from the operator to the state.( Texas later followed this example. Rigs-to-Reef is now the core of both Louisiana and Texas artificial reef programs.( From 1987-1995, of the over 941 platforms removed from Louisiana and Texas waters, 90 became artificial reefs.(http://www.msi.ucsb.edu/msilinks/OCPC/OCPCtexts/sum_rep2.html Summary of The Political Economy of the Rigs-to-Reef Option for Decommissioning Oil and Gas Structures) By November 2000, 151 platforms had been recycled as artificial reefs in the Gulf of Mexico from states such as Texas, Louisiana, Mississippi, Alabama, and Florida.(http://www.api.org/aboutoilgas/sectors/explore/rigstoreef.cfm API Energy: Rigs to Reef Programs Create Valuable Fish Habitat)DebatesOpposition, and also support, for Rigs-to-Reefs came from environmentalists, fisherman, oil companies, and others. California and the North Sea are each debating RTR. In California, legislation was proposed during the 2010 session to clear legal hurdles for RTR; the Coastal Commission held hearings, but then the legislation was tabled.(Baine, Mark. Short Communication: The North Sea Rigs-to-Reef debate, Journal of Marine Science 59 (2002): S277-S280.) Even with the RTR successes in the Gulf of Mexico and Philippines,(Ranjith, M.W.; De Silva, N., The Coastal Resources Management Program in Brunei Darussalam. Ocean and Coastal Management 38 (1998) 147-160) differences in terrain, government entities, and concerned citizens generated conflict.FisheriesA 2000 MMS report lists research that shows fish densities 20 to 50 times higher around oil and gas platforms than in nearby open water.( Divers assess fish populations surrounding platforms.() The report encourages recreational fisherman, divers and others who benefit from the increased density. Opponents claim that the greater density comes from an influx of nearby fish rather than increased total population.( Research observing rockfish populations on oil rigs supports both theories.(LiabilityCommercial fisherman who trawl sometimes oppose RTR because their nets may snag a rig, creating a hazardous situation.(http://www.cdnn.info/news/article/a010927.html CDNN-California Rigs to Reefs Battle Creates Strange Alliances) Several fisherman have reported tangling their nets on submerged rigs.( Navigational mishaps and diving accidents may also occur around an artificial reef. Gulf of Mexico Rigs-to-Reefs participants have not yet reported any liability problems.(The MMS does not release an operator from liability unless another entity accepts ongoing liability for the rig.( If the reef is in state waters, the state typically accepts liability. In federal waters, liability typically goes to a private entity or to another MMS-approved agency.( Critics claim that the primary reason that operators support RTR is their desire to offload decommissioning costs and liability.(Liability is divisible, however. In 2001, the California legislature passed, although the governor then vetoed, a bill that would allow operators to transfer liability to another entity, while retaining liability for any pollution from the underlying well.(EthicsAs with cap-and-trade and ecotourism, RTR attempts to enlist the private sector in helping the environment. In the minds of many environmentalists, such efforts are fundamentally suspect. Environmental groups have long opposed oil companies and frame their critique around distrusting these parties.( No other industry is allowed to leave a toxic mess for the state to manage and maintain at taxpayer expense said Linda Krop, Chief council for the Santa Barbara based Environmental Defense Center.(See also* reef* bed* ships for wreck diving sitesReferences
16866375
Collapsible_tank
Collapsible tanks are used for storage of fuel, water, or chemicals and are manufactured using industrial fabrics.These tanks are manufactured in a variety of sizes and styles, with various fabrics available depending on the liquid being contained. They are assembled using fabric welding techniques such as hot air, hot bar, and radio-frequency (RF) welding.In contrast to steel tanks, collapsible fabric tanks can be relatively easily and quickly transported, unfolded, and deployedfeatures that make them a logical choice for applications in remote sites (such as mining exploration camps) and temporary installations (such as operations).Collapsible tanks have been used successfully in the Arctic, where challenges such as climate, location, and logistics costs make other tank types impractical.A number of manufacturers produce collapsible fabric tanks for general-purpose use.de:Falteimer
16887455
Bat_Cave_mine
The Bat Cave guano mine (), located in the western Canyon of Arizona at mile 266,  above Mead, was an unusual, expensive and noteworthy mining operation. The cave was apparently discovered in the 1930s by a passing boater. After several unsuccessful attempts by others to mine the nitrogen-rich guano for fertilizer, the U.S. Guano Corporation bought the property around 1957. Based on a reputable engineers estimate that the cave contained 100,000 tons of guano, the company constructed an elaborate plan to extract the guano. A small airstrip was built on a nearby sandbar in the River, and all supplies and machinery needed were then flown in. An tramway was built from the mine to Guano Point on the South Rim, with the cable headhouse built on land leased from the Hualapai tribe. The cableway crossed the river, with a main span of , and a vertical lift of . About  () of  steel cable were used, to support and pull a cable car large enough to transport  of guano. The same car was used to transport the miners to and from work. The guano was mined using a large industrial vacuum-cleaner with  ten-inch hoses. From the cablehead, the guano was hauled by truck to Arizona and packaged for retail sale.During construction of the cableway, which took 14 months, the first of several mishaps occurred. When first tensioning the main cable, a clutch-lever broke, dropping  of cable into the canyon. A new cable was ordered and strung, and mining began. The  pull-cable wore out after a few months use and had to be replaced, bringing the companys total investment up to $US 3,500,000.Unfortunately, the mining engineers estimate of the potential size of the guano deposit proved wildly optimistic: the cave contained only about 1,000 tons of minable guano, not the 100,000 tons of the engineers estimate. Most of the cave was filled with valueless limestone rubble.In 1959, the cableway was used for the film of Eternity, with the climax of the film involving a fight on a cable car suspended above the Grand Canyon.Mining ceased in early 1960. Guano sold for about $100 a ton then,(High Wire, construction of the tramway, by a former employee of the contractor) so this was not a profitable venture.A few months later, a Air Force jet, illegally hot-dogging down the canyon, clipped the cable, damaging the planes wing and severing the cable. The plane survived, and U.S. Guano successfully sued the Air Force for damaging their property, offsetting some of their losses.In 1975 the abandoned mine became part of Canyon National Park. The Park Service later proposed removing the tramway remnants within the park, but there was public protest against demolition of these interesting historic relics. As of 2007, some remnants of the old operation remain at Bat Cave,(Grand Canyon Maps) and on the South Rim in the Indian Reservation.Guano Point is still a popular stop for air tours from Las Vegas, Nevada.(Grand Canyon Tours - Las Vegas Tours - Papillon) Tourists can inspect the remnants of the old mining operation. Tour operators pay use fees to the Hualapai tribe, and the tribe offers a barbecue lunch near the old tramway headhouse, as part of their Canyon West business venture.References*The primary source of this article is the Bat Cave article in Billingsley et al., 1997, Quest for the Pillar of Gold: The Mines and Miners of the Grand Canyon, Grand Canyon Association, ISBN 0938216562. This book is available online; the Bat Cave article may be found in Chapter 3 part 1 and Chapter 3 part 2.External links*Historical sketch, largely from the Billingsley article*Photo of the old cable headhouse*More photos of the area*Grand Canyon Association e-publications, including Quest for the Pillar of Gold*IMDB entry for Edge of Eternity
16922026
Adventfjorden
thumb|350px|Adventfjorden lies on the southern side of Isfjorden on Spitsbergens west coast.Adventfjorden (Advent Bay) is a 7 km long and 4 km wide bay on the southern side of Isfjorden, on the west coast of Spitsbergen. The name is a corruption of Adventure Bay, which was probably named after the Hull whaleship Adventure, which resorted to Isfjorden in 1656. The fjord was originally known as Klass Billen Bay. At the head of Adventfjorden is Adventdalen.The former mining camp of Longyearbyen (now Svalbards main town) lies on the fjords southwestern shore, while another former mining camp, Hiorthhamn, is located on its northeastern shore.References *Conway, W. M. 1906. No Mans Land: A History of Spitsbergen from Its Discovery in 1596 to the Beginning of the Scientific Exploration of the Country. Cambridge: At the University Press. * Polar Institute Place Names of Svalbard Database de:Adventdaleneo:Adventfjordenes:Adventfjordenfr:Adventfjordenno:Adventfjordennn:Adventfjorden
16949607
Sado_bugy
 were officials of the shogunate.  This commissioner was responsible for administration of the mining operations at Sado.(Cullen, Louis M. (2003).  A History of Japan, 1582-1941: Internal and External Worlds, p. 112.)Appointments to this prominent office were usually fudai daimy, but this was amongst the senior administrative posts open to those who were not daimy.(Beasley, William G. (1955). Select Documents on Japanese Foreign Policy, 1853-1868, p. 325.)  Conventional interpretations have construed these Japanese titles as commissioner or overseer or governor.Sado island is the sixth largest in the Japanese archipelago.  It is located in the of Japan off the west coast of province in northwest Honshu.  For much of its pre-modern history, exiles were banished to the island.(Nussbaum, Louis-Frdric. (2005). Sado in ; n.b., Louis-Frdric is pseudonym of Louis-Frdric Nussbaum, see Deutsche Nationalbibliothek Authority File.)  The gold mineIn 1601, gold was discovered  at   This vein was mined vigorously; and Sados gold mine developed into a major source of revenue for the Tokugawa shogunate, producing approximately 100 tons of ore annually until the mid-18th century.(List of Sado bugy:* Nagayasu(See also* BugyNotesReferences* Beasley, William G. (1955).  Select Documents on Japanese Foreign Policy, 1853-1868. London: University Press. reprinted by RoutledgeCurzon, London, 2001.  10-ISBN 0-197-13508-0; 13-ISBN 978-0-197-13508-2 (cloth)* Cullen, Louis M. (2003).  A History of Japan, 1582-1941: Internal and External Worlds. Cambridge: University Press. 10-ISBN 0-521-82155-X (cloth) -- 10-ISBN 0-521-52918-2 (paper)* Nussbaum, Louis-Frdric and Kthe Roth. (2005).  Japan encyclopedia. Cambridge: University Press. 10-ISBN 0-674-01753-6; 13-ISBN 978-0-674-01753-5;  OCLC 58053128
16962491
Eduardo_Ayala
Eduardo Ayala (born 3 May 1937) was the first Chilean authority of Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (LDS Church).Ayala was born in Chile. He married Blanca Ester Espinoza in 1959. They eventually had three children: Patricio, Viviana and Ricardo. In 1969, Eduardo Ayala, his wife, and oldest son were baptized into the LDS Church.In Coronel, Eduardo had worked in industrial planning for a mining company.  In the early 1970s, he moved to Santiago to continue his work in industrial planning.  In 1974, LDS Church apostle K. Packer called Eduardo as president of a newly formed Santiago Chile Stake; at the same time, Ayala accept full-time employment in the Educational System.Eduardo later served twice as a regional representative and as a president in Uruguay. In 1990, Ayala became a member of the LDS Churchs Quorum of the Seventy. He was released as a general authority in 1995.(Report of the 165th Semiannual General Conference of The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints, Ensign, Nov. 1995, p. 1.) After his time as a general authority, Ayala served as president of the Chile Temple of the LDS Church.NotesReferences*Elder Eduardo Ayala Of the Seventy, Ensign, May 1990, p. 100*Michael R. Morris, Chiles Fruitful Vineyard, Ensign, Dec. 1995, p. 32External links*Grampa Bills G.A. Pages: Eduardo Ayala
16983671
Great_Cornish_families
Great Cornish families: a history of the people and their houses is a book by Crispin Gill, published in 1995.(Gill Great Cornish families: a history of the people and their houses, Tiverton, Cornwall Books (1995).  ISBN 1-871060-25-7. A4 landscape format, many illustrations, index, list of sources but no individual references.) The author Crispin Gill, at the time of the books publication lived in Plymouth and was Assistant Editor of the Morning News( .(Encyclopaedia of Plymouth History: article on Crispin Gill.) This article names many notable families that have featured prominently in Cornwalls history.Gills Great familiesGill chooses the following families:*The great Arundells of Lanherne, Arundells of Trerice*Bassets of Tehidy*Merchant princes, the Bolithos (The Bolitho familys growth to prominence started with Bolitho (1765-1868), they were initially tanners, who moved into lime-burning and tin smelting before becoming bankers. Their Bank eventually merged with Barclays in 1905. Gill cites the following references:*Cornish Magazine and Devon Miscellany*Matthews, W. P. History of Barclays Bank.*Pool, P. A. S. History of Penzance, 1974.)*Boscawens, the Lords Cornwall*Carew Poles of Anthony*Edgcumbes of Edgcumbe House*The Eliots, Earls of St Germans*The Foxes of Falmouth*Godolphins of Godolphin*The Gallant Grenvilles*The Piratical Killigrews, the Theatrical Killigrews*Molesworth St Aubyns of Pencarrow*Prideauxs of Padstow*Rashleighs of Menabilly, The Rashleigh baronets*Agar-Robarteses of Lanhydrock*St Aubyns of Michaels Mount*Treffrys of Fowey*Shall Trelawny die?*The romantic Trevanions (Trevanions: Gill cites as source: Rowse, A. L. The Byrons and Trevanions, 1978.)*Vivians of Glynn(Glynn of the Vivian family: an estate to the east of Bodmin. It later became a centre for biological research.)*Vyvyans of Trelowarren*The Mining WilliamsesAdditional familiesGills list of important families not included aboveIn the introduction to Great families . . .  ( , the following additional potentially great families are mentioned.  They were not included in the list as they failed to found a dynasty:*Buller family*Carminow family*Coryton family of Pentillie(Pentillie Castle described in Devonshire & Cornwall illustrated, from original drawings by T. Allom (1832) p.16-17, on Google Books.)*Fortescue family of Boconnoc*Harvey family of Hayle*Hawkins family of Trewithen*Kendall of Pelyn*Lemon family of Carclew*Roscarrock family of Endellion*Smith-Dorrien-Smith family of Tresco*Tangye family*Tremayne family of Heligan*Trevelyan familyDeacons list of important families Deacon in his History of Cornwall (2007)(Deacon, Bernard Cornwall: the Concise History, (The Histories of Europe series) of Wales Press, (November 2007) ISBN 978-0-70832032-7 (hardback) 978-0-7083-2031-0 (paperback))  suggests the following family names (merchant bourgeois who joined the gentry from the latter part of the 18th century): Williams, Bolitho, Fox, Davey of Redruth, Daniell of Truro, Harvey of Gwennap, Foster of Lostwithiel.LandownersTable of Principal Cornish Landowners, mid-nineteenth century (ranked)#Lord Falmouth#Lord Robartes#G. M. Fortescue#G. L. Basset#Earl of Mount Edgcumbe#C. H. T. Hawkins#Sir R. R. Vyvyan#Col. A. Tremayne#Augustus Coryton#F. Rodd#J. M. Williams#J. J. Rogers#Earl of St Germans#Revd A. Molesworth-St Aubyn#Sir J. Trelawney#C. P. Brune#Edward Coode#Col. S. M. GryllsSource: Returns of owners of land in England & Wales  House of Commons Sessional papers 1872-3: paper No. 1874 lixxii, quoted in Edwin Jaggard Cornwall politics in the age of reform 1790-1855, (1999) (Jaggard, Edwin (1999) Cornwall Politics in the Age of Reform 1790-1855. London: Historical Society/Boydell Press  ISBN 0-86193-243-9).*(Source: Who owns Britain ? by Kevin Cahill)See also*Lieutenant of Cornwall*Sheriff of Cornwall*gentry*representation from Cornwall*Cornish politiciansReferences
16987961
Maungatapere
Maungatapere is a settlement in Northland, Zealand. State Highway 14 runs through it. Whangarei is 11 km to the east, and Tangiteroria is 18 km to the south west. A hill called Maungatapere with a summit 359 m above sea level is southwest of the settlement.()() The population was 1278 in the 2006 Census, an increase of 225 from 2001.()HistoryThomas Elmsley bought  of land in Maungatapere and northern Wairoa from Tirarau in 1839, and in 1840 he and the brothers Henry and Charles Walton came with workers to establish farms in the area. Henry Waltons farm was on the slopes of Maungatapere hill and was called Maungatapere Park.() After the War, Walton employed former soldiers to build stone walls which are still a feature of the area. Henry Walton married Kohura, Te Tiraraus niece, in 1846. After she died in childbirth, he married her sister, Pehi, but she died in a measles epidemic in 1856. Walton built a road between Maungatapere and Whangarei in 1858. He also became involved in coal mining and shipbuilding, and was one of the partners in the timber mill at Kopuru. Walton was one of the founding shareholders in the of New Zealand. In 1863 became a member of the Zealand Legislative Council and two years later he was elected to the Provincial Council. However, in 1867 he left New Zealand and returned to England.(Pickmere, p 51-58. Maungatapere Park was eventually sold for subdivision into farms.)EducationSchool is a coeducational full primary (years 1-8) school with a decile rating of 9 and a roll of 193.() The school celebrated its 125th jubilee in 2004.(format &ndash; Scholar search)NotesExternal links* Maungatapere School websitemi:Maungatapere
17013310
List_of_attractions_in_Silicon_Valley
0778.jpg|thumb|right|220px|Circle of Palms, historical marker for Californias first state capitolImage:Plaza de Cesar Chavez.JPG|right|thumb|de Csar ChvezThis is a list of attractions in and around San Jose and Valley.Arboreta and GardensImage:Hakone Gardens Bridge.jpg|right|thumb|Gardens*Cactus Garden, Stanford University*Cultural Garden, San Jose*Prusch Farm Park, San Jose*Gardens, Saratoga*Japanese Friendship Garden at Kelley Park in San Jose*Gardens, East San Jose*Jose Municipal Rose Garden, downtown San Jose*University Arboretum, Stanford University*Montalvo Arboretum, SaratogaCulturalImage:San Jose Basilica.jpg|right|thumb|Basilica of St. Joseph0760.jpg|right|thumb|Circle of Palms and SJ Museum of Art*San Jose, downtown San Jose*Cathedral Basilica of St. Joseph, downtown San Jose*Choral Project, downtown San Jose*Saisset Museum, Santa Clara*Martin Luther King, Jr. Library, downtown San Jose*Sahib of San Jose, East San Jose*F. Brilliant Center for Beethoven Studies, downtown San Jose*Heritage Plaza, East San Jose*San Jose, downtown San Jose*Jose City Hall, downtown San Jose*Jose Flea Market, Berryessa (northeast San Jose)*Jose Improv, downtown San Jose*Jose Museum of Art, downtown San Jose*Jose Repertory Theatre, downtown San Jose*Jose Symphony, downtown San Jose*Museum, East San Jose*Montalvo, Saratoga*Youth Chorus of San Jose, San JoseEvent venuesPavilion (angle).jpg|right|thumb|300px|HP Pavilion (SJ Arena)thumb|right|375px|The San Jose Center for the Performing Arts*Shaw Stadium, Santa Clara*California Theatre (San Jose), downtown San Jose*Event Center Arena, downtown San Jose*Pavilion at San Jose, downtown San Jose*San Jose Center for the Performing Arts, downtown San Jose*Jose Civic Auditorium, downtown San Jose*Jose Convention Center, downtown San Jose*Jose Municipal Stadium, downtown San Jose*Jose Repertory Theatre, downtown San Jose*Clara Convention Center, Santa Clara*Amphitheatre, Mountain View*Spartan Stadium, downtown San JoseEventsJos Jazz IMG 2913.JPG|right|thumb|SJ Jazz Festival*BayCon, Santa Clara*Christmas in the Park, downtown San Jose*Film Festival, multiple venues*Systems Conference, Jose McEnery Convention Center*FanimeCon, downtown San Jose*Confusion, San Jose*Challenge bike race, San Jose*Francisco International Asian American Film Festival, downtown San Jose*Jose Holiday Parade, downtown San Jose*Jose Jazz Festival, downtown San Jose*Stanford Jazz Festival, Stanford UniversityHistoricalImage:Winchester House 910px.jpg|right|thumb|Mystery House*Almaden Quicksilver Mining Museum*of Palms Plaza, downtown San Jose*Anza Hotel, downtown San Jose*Hangar One, Mountain View*Park at Kelley Park, Willow Glen (south-central San Jose)*garage, Palo Alto*Adobe, downtown San Jose*Historical Museum, East San Jose*House, Mountain View*Egyptian Museum, downtown San Jose*Jose Museum of Quilts & Textiles, downtown San Jose*Mystery House, West San JoseParks and trailsImage:bigbasinredwoods.jpg|thumb|right|Basin Redwoods State ParkImage:Friendshipgarden.JPG|thumb|right|Friendship Garden (Kelley Park)Image:Lake Cunningham.jpg|right|thumb|CunninghamImage:Vasona park.jpg|thumb|right|Park Lake*Lake Park, South San Jose*Quicksilver County Park, South San Jose*Rock Park, East San Jose*Area Ridge Trail, surrounds and crosses the valley*Park and connected Heintz, and Santa Rosa open space preserves, Los Gatos*Basin Redwoods State Park, Santa Cruz Mountains*Castle Rock State Park, Santa Cruz Mountains*R. Levin County Park, Milpitas*Older Open Space Preserve, Saratoga*Ranch Park, East San Jose/Mount Hamilton*River Trail, downtown San Jose, Willow Glen and South San Jose*Cowell Redwoods State Park, Santa Cruz Mountains*Park, Willow Glen (south-central San Jose)*Cunningham, East San Jose*Los Alamitos Creek Trail, South San Jose*Gatos Creek Trail, West San Jose, Campbell and Los Gatos*de Csar Chvez, downtown San Jose*San Antonio Open Space Preserve, Santa Cruz Mountains*Park, downtown San Jose*Park, Saratoga and Santa Cruz Mountains*Francisco Bay Trail, Palo Alto, Mountain View, Sunnyvale, Santa Clara, San Jose and Milpitas*Park, Mountain View, Mountain View*Stevens Creek Trail, Cupertino, Sunnyvale and Mountain View*Park, Los Gatos*Villa Montalvo Arboretum, SaratogaSee additional hiking trails, and open space preserves at: Regional Open Space DistrictScience, technology and educationImage:Computer history museum.jpg|right|thumb|History MuseumFile:Google Campus3.jpg|right|thumb|GoogleplexImage:Stanford University Hoover Tower.JPG|right|thumb|University*Discovery Museum of San Jose, downtown San Jose*History Museum, Mountain View*Googleplex, Mountain View*Museum, Santa Clara*Quest, Mountain View*Observatory, Mount Hamilton*Ames Research Center, Mountain View*Jose State University, downtown San Jose*Clara University, Santa Clara*University, Palo Alto*Tech Museum of Innovation, downtown San JoseShopping*Center, East San Jose*Mall of the Bay Area, Milpitas*Shopping Center, Campbell*Antonio Shopping Center, Mountain View*Row, West San Jose*Shopping Center, Palo Alto*Shopping Mall (renamed Cupertino Square from 2007 until returning to Vallco in 2009)*Oakridge, South San Jose*Valley Fair, West San Jose*Westgate Mall, West San JoseTheme parks & Toursamerica.jpg|right|thumb|Great America*Ventures, Mountain View*Jones Wildcat Railroad, Los Gatos*Great America, Santa Clara*Gardens, Gilroy (formerly Bonfante Gardens)*Hollow Park & Zoo, Willow Glen (south-central San Jose)*Raging Waters, East San Jose*Camp and Big Trees Narrow Gauge Railroad, Santa Cruz MountainsVineyards and wineriesImage:SantaCruzMountains.jpg|thumb|right|Vineyards in the Cruz Mountains*Vineyard, Los Gatos*Bruce Winery, Los Gatos*Lohr Vineyards and Wines, downtown San Jose*Winery, Saratoga*Brothers Winery, Cupertino*Vineyards, SaratogaSee also* of tourist attractions worldwide External links *Entertainment at City of San Jose*Things to do at San Jose/Silicon Valley Convention & Visitors Bureau*list of attractions at SanJose.com*list of events at San Jose Mercury News*Nasa Ames Research Center/Moffet Field Tours*Moffet Field Museum and Tours
17045971
Workmens_Compensation_Act_1897
The Workmens Compensation Act 1897 was an Act of the of the United Kingdom which dealt with the right of workers for compensation for personal injury. It replaced the 1880 Liability Act, which required the injured worker the right to sue the employer and put the burden of proof on the employee. After 1897, injured employees had only to show that they had been injured on the job.(History of Workers Compensation, Florida AWC) These are roughly the same rights German workers got in their 1884 law.(ct.gov)A workman was defined as,any person who is engaged in an employment to which this Act applies, whether by way of manual labour or otherwise.(Workmens Compensation Act 1897, s.7)The employments to which the Act applied were stated to be railways, mining and quarrying, factory work and laundry work.However the courts took a restrictive interpretation in v. Ebbw Vale Steel, Iron & Coal Co. (Simpson v. Ebbw Vale Steel, Iron & Coal Co. (1905)) A widow claimed for the death of a colliery manager who had been killed in an underground accident. Lord Collins MR held that her dead husband was outside the Acts scope, because though the act extended to non-manual workers(unlike the previous law under the Liability Act 1880, from v. London General Omnibus Co. (1884) 13 QBD 832) the victim must still be a workman. He said the Act:presupposes a position of dependence; it treats the class of workmen as being in a sens inopes consilii, and the Legislature does for them what they cannot do for themselves: it gives them a sort of State insurance, it being assumed that they are either not sufficiently intelligent or not sufficiently in funds to insure themselves. In no sense can such a principle extend to those who are earning good salaries.(Simpson, 1905)See also*Compensation Act 1906*of Employment Act 1963*labour law*tort lawNotesReferences*Deakin, The historical process of wage formation, in Linda Clarke et al., The Dynamics of Wage Relations in the New Europe (2000) pp. 389*Deakin, Welfare State and Contract of Employment, in Noel Whiteside et al., Governance, Industry and Labour Markets in Britain and France (1998) pp. 212 ff.*Frankel, Lee K., and Dawson, Miles, M., Workingmens Insurance in Europe, New York: Charities Publication Committee, 1911.
17057524
Sahanivotry_Mandona
footnotes        Sahanivotry Mandona is a town and commune in Madagascar. It belongs to the district of Antsirabe II, which is a part of Region. The population of the commune was estimated to be approximately 10,000 in 2001 commune census.(Primary and junior level secondary education are available in town. It is also a site of industrial-scale  mining. The majority 80% of the population of the commune are farmers, while an additional 18% receives their livelihood from raising livestock. The most important crop is rice, while other important products are maize and cassava.  Industry and services provide both employment for 1% of the population.() References and notes MandonaMandona
17088297
Anson_P.K._Safford
footnoteAnson Pacely Killen Safford(Various sources give multiple variations for the spelling of Saffords two middle names. Among these are Peasley, Peacely, Keeler, and Killen.) (c. 14 February 1830( 15 December 1891) was the third Governor of Territory.  Affectionately known as the Little Governor due to his 5 foot 6 inch (1.68 m) stature, he was also Arizonas longest serving territorial governor. His work to create a education system earned him the name Father of the Arizona Public Schools.(Wagoner pp. 101)  Safford is additionally known for granting himself a divorce.(BackgroundSafford was born to Joseph Warren and Diantha P. (Little) Safford in Hyde Park, Vermont, on 14 February of either 1828 or 1830.  When he was eight, his family moved to Illinois, where they farmed. Safford was largely self educated, attending only five quarters at a county school followed later by six months at a different school. His father died in 1848 and his mother in 1849. Safford left the family farm in March 1850 as part of the Gold Rush.(Goff pp. 52)After his arrival in California, Safford began working a claim in Placer County that produced from five to twenty dollars per day. His leisure time was spent reading from a set of books he had purchased to further his education.(Goff pp. 53)  In 1854 he moved to a new claim and in 1855 was a Democratic party nominee for a seat in the State Assembly, losing his race to a Nothing candidate.  Safford won a seat as an assemblyman in 1857 and was reelected in 1859.(Goff pp. 54)Following his time in the state legislature, Safford moved to Francisco were he operated an earthworks business. When the Civil War broke out, he changed his political affiliation to the Unionist party and later became a Republican. Safford moved to Nevada in early 1862  and was elected commissioner for Humboldt County in November 1862. After a month in office, he resigned as commissioner and later served as a mining recorder and county recorder. Safford was secretary of the Nevada constitutional convention in November 1863 and President of Nevadas first Republican state convention. To add to his cultural experience, Safford took a two-year trip to Europe and then returned to Nevada. He turned down a nomination to the House of Representatives before being appointed surveyor-general of Nevada by President Johnson in March 1867. Safford served as surveyor-general for two years before health issues forced him to resign.((Safford married Jenny (or Jennie) L. Tracy in Arizona, on July 24, 1869. The couple had a son who was born July 2, 1870, and died August 28, 1871. The couple quickly became estranged and their dispute escalated to the point where Jenny Safford had notices printed claiming her husband had engaged in infidelity and was suffering from a disease. This marriage ended when Arizonas territorial legislature passed a bill granting a divorce to the couple. Governor Safford signing the bill into law in January 1873 and his ex-wife remarried on February 24, 1873.(Goff pp. 51)()  Saffords second marriage was to Margarita Grijalva on December 12, 1878. The couple had one daughter before Margarita Safford died in York City on January 7, 1880  Saffords third marriage was to Soledad Bonillas, sister of Bonillas, on September 10, 1881. During his life, Safford adopted two children.(GovernorshipOn March 13, 1869, the Nevada Congressional delegation of Thomas Fitch, W. Nye, and M. Stewartpetitioned President S. Grant to nominate Safford as Governor of Arizona Territory.( This nomination was supported by Arizonas Bashford, N. Goodwin, and C. McCormick along with political figures from California.  Safford was nominated on April 3, 1869, commissioned April 9, 1869, and sworn into office on July 9, 1869.(Goff pp. 55) His second term began in April 1873 and he declined a third term.(The Safford administration immediately faced the problem of hostile Indians. To counter this threat he called for the creation of volunteer militia and worked with Territorial Delegate McCormick to have General Stoneman replaced by Crook in June 1871.(Wagoner pp. 103)  Safford was also forced to assign a military force to guard the road between Bend and Yuma from Mexican outlaws.(Wagoner pp. 105) Other efforts to combat lawlessness included the governor petitioning the territorial legislature to make highway robbery a offense and the building of a territorial prison.(Wagoner pp. 113-4) As a result of these efforts Indian hostilities were largely eliminated, with only occasional outbreaks, and enough order was instilled into the territory to allow for ranching activities to move to Arizona.(Wagoner pp. 117)Saffords passion while in office was the creation of a public school system. This effort was initially opposed by the legislature, but the governor was able to win passage of a new tax on February 17, 1871, to finance creation and operation of schools.(Wagoner pp. 106)  As ex-officio superintendent of public instruction, the governor corresponded with educators across the nation and even used his personal funds to help build schools or bring new teachers to Arizona.(Goff pp. 56) Arizonas first public school opened during March 1872 in Tucson. The one room adobe structure had a single teacher and, at its peak, 138 students.(Wagoner pp. 107-8)  Other schools were built throughout the territory over the next few years. During his address to the territorial legislature in January 1877, Safford was pleased to report that at least 1450 of the 2955 children counted in the May 1876 census could read and write.(Wagoner pp. 113)After officeAfter leaving office Safford opened one of Arizonas first banks, with offices in Tucson and Tombstone. He was admitted to the bar in January 1875 but did not work as an attorney. Instead, with the assistance of his friend, John S. Vosburg, helped finance several mines. When the first claims were filed in Tombstone, the initial settlement of tents and cabins was located at Watervale near the Lucky Cuss mine. Safford offered financial backing for a cut of the Lucky Cuss mining claim, and Schieffelin, his brother Al, and their partner Richard Gird formed the Tombstone Mining and Milling Company and with Saffords backing built the first stamping mill. When the mill was built, the town site was moved to Goose Flats, a mesa above the Toughnut  above sea level and large enough to hold a growing town.()In early March 1881, the Tombstone Mining and Milling Company was sold to capitalists from Philadelphia, and Safford became president of the new Tombstone Gold and Silver Milling and Mining Company with Richard Gird was superintendent.( Ed and Al Schieffelin soon sold their one-third ownership in the Tough Nut for USD $1 million and moved on, although Al remained in Tombstone for sometime longer. Gird later sold off his one-third interest for USD $1 million, doubling what the Schieffelins had been paid. In 1880, Safford was a delegate to the Republican National Convention.(Goff pp. 59)In the early 1880s, Safford sold his business interests for roughly US$140,000 and moved to Philadelphia and then York City.(Wagoner pp. 118) By 1882 Safford had moved to Florida and become involved with building the new community of Tarpon Springs. He was a candidate for Arizona Territorial Governor again in 1889, with support coming from Quay, Stanford, and William M. Stewart, but was not nominated. Saffords later years were spent in Florida with his family and sister, Mary Jane Safford-Blake. He died on December 15, 1891, in Tarpon Springs and was buried at Cycadia Cemetery.(Goff pp. 59-61)See also*HouseFootnotes(ReferencesBibliography* * Safford
17101647
Cal_State_LA_Solar_Car_Team
The Cal State LA Solar Car Team is an engineering team from State University, Los Angeles. The team develops the Solar Eagle, a series of cars that have taken part in solar car races in the United States and in Australia.Solar Eagle*1990: Solar Eagle - GM Sunrayce USA: 4th place.*1990: Solar Eagle - Solar Challenge: 10rd place.  *Now on display at State LA.The Solar Eagle is a world-class, solar powered car designed and built by the Cal State L.A. School of Engineering & Technology students, faculty and staff.In July, the Solar Eagle placed fourth in the 1,643 mile GM Sunrayce. Californias number one solar car finished ahead of 28 other colleges and universities including such prestigious institutions as MIT and Stanford.The teams out-standing capabilities will be further demonstrated at the November 1990 World Solar Challenge in Australia.Results from the GM SunrayceOverall finish: Fourth placeDaily race results: First place (twice), Second place (once), Third place (3 times)Solar Eagle was the only car having no mechanical or electrical failures during the 1,643 mile race.Department of Energy Awards: First place for Best Artistic Design ($500), Second place for Innovation in Power Train Design ($800), Third place for Teamwork ($600)Society of Automotive Engineers Award: Fifth place for Engineering Design and SafetyOther HonorsEngineering Excellence Award: Unique Mobility, Inc.The Governors Energy Award: State of FloridaTeam Honored by Los Angeles City Council, August 10, 1990Nationally televised appearance on Into the Night, Starring Rick Dees, August 15, 1990Team Honored by Department of Water and Power Board of Commissioners, August 23, 1990City of Los Angeles, Mayor Tom Bradley: CommendationBoard of Directors, City of Pasadena: CommendationCity of Alhambra, Mayor Barbara Messina: CommendationCity of Monterey Park, Mayor Judy Chu: CommendationU.S. Senator Pete Wilson: CommendationU.S. Congressman Matthew G. Martinez: Congressional AwardCar Specifications Length: 6 metersWidth: 2 metersHeight: 1 meterWeight: 459 pounds (without driver)Drag Coefficient: 0.123Frame: Welded 6061 T6 aluminum alloy tubing (Weight23 pounds)Body: Carbon fiber/NOMEX composite sandwichSolar panel: Fiberglass/NOMEX composite sandwichSolar cells: 8,945 Spectrolab K7 single-crystal silicon space quality cellsMotor: Unique Mobility, Inc. DC brushless motorBatteries: Eagle-Picher silver-zinc batteries; 120 volt nominal buss voltage; 4 kW-hr total capacity at C20 rateWorld Solar Challenge Start: Darwin, AustraliaFinish: Adelaide, Australia Distance: 1,900 milesDate: November 11, 1990Entries: 40 cars from 9 countries (13 Australia, 11 Japan, 9 United States) Image:SEITeam.jpg|Solar Challenge State LAImage:Solar_Car_Sunset.jpg|Solar Challenge  AustraliaImage:SEITeamAust.jpg|Solar Challenge  Darwin AustraliaImage:SEIAust.jpg|Solar Challenge  AustraliaSolar Eagle II*1993: Solar Eagle II - GM Sunrayce USA: 3rd place;*1993: Solar Eagle II - Solar Challenge: 13th place.*Now on display at the Science Center in Los Angeles.In June of 1993, the Solar Eagle II placed third in the 1000 mile SUNRAYCE 93  a cross-country race from Dallas, Texas to Minneapolis, Minnesota. The Solar Eagle II started the race in the pole position having qualified with the fastest time. Solar Eagle II finished ahead of 33 other universities including such prestigious institutions as Stanford, George Washington University and UC Berkeley. The car and team were honored with a second place award in Technical Innovation for Chassis Design, Propulsion and Aerodynamic Systems by the SUNRAYCE 93 judges and they received a third place award from the Society of Automotive Engineers (SAE) for Design Excellence in Engineering Safety.  In November of 1993, the Solar Eagle II gained international recognition by placing thirteenth out of a fifty-four car field, and became the fourth U.S. team to cross the finish line at the 1993 World Solar Challenge, a grueling 1,882 mile race across the Australian outback.Cal State L.A. was selected as one of 30 universities granted entry in the SUNRAYCE 95 competition and work will soon begin revamping the Solar Eagle II for that event. Major Corporate and Government Agency Sponsors AB2766 - Mobile Source Air Pollution Reduction Review Committee Automobile Club of South-ern California Caltrans Hewlett-Packard Company Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority (MTA) Los Angeles Department of Water and Power MacNeal-Schwe-Corporation NASA Langley: Center Optical Coating Laboratory, Inc. Society for the Avancment of Materia Process Engines. (SAMPE) South Coast Air Quality Management District Southern California Edison TRWVehicle Technical SpecificationsLength: 16 feetWidth:	6.1 feetHeight: 3.3 feetWeight: 360 pounds (without driver and batteries)Structure: Welded aluminum space frame with carbon fiber composite battery box and underneath pan to provide shear and torsional strength.Body: Carbon fiber skin with Rohacell structural foam core.Solar power system: 754	single crystal BP Saturn cells (3.7 x 3/8) on top; 824 quarter-size cut cells on vehicle sides. Cerium doped and antireflective Image:SEIIPoster800H.jpg| GM Sunrayce USAImage:SEIITeam2.jpg| GM Sunrayce USAImage:SEIICalPoly.jpg| GM Sunrayce USAImage:SEIITeam.jpg| GM Sunrayce USAImage:SEIISunrayceFinish.jpg| GM Sunrayce USA  Image:SEIIAustFinish.jpg|Solar Challenge Adelaide, AustraliaImage:SEIIQual.jpg|Phoenix  Phoenix, ArizonaSolar Eagle III*1997: Solar Eagle III - GM Sunrayce USA: 1st place.*Now on display at State LA.Solar Eagle III is the third chapter in Cal State L.A.s exciting trilogy of solar-powered electric vehicle design projects. Engineered by students under the guidance of faculty and staff, the Solar Eagle III represents the culmination of learning, trial and redesign gleaned from the Universitys first two solar race cars, the Solar Eagle and the Solar Eagle II.On Saturday, June 28, 1997, the Solar Eagle III won the prestigious Sunrayce 97, the national intercollegiate solar car race, crossing the Colorado Springs finish line under fittingly sunny skies. Setting a Sunrayce record for average speed of 43.29 mph, Cal State L.A. finished nearly 20 minutes ahead of second-place Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT). The combined team of Stanford University/UC Berkeley finished third. Texas A&M, whose team used the molds from Cal State L.A.s Solar Eagle II to build their entry, the MACH V, finished fourth.Solar Eagle IIIs first-place finish at Colorado Springs marked the end of ten days of exciting intercollegiate solar car racing. Throughout the competition, Cal State L.A., MIT and Stanford/ UC Berkeley jockeyed in the top three positions. In the end, good design and solid engineering won the race: the beautifully built Solar Eagle III never broke down during the entire 1,230 mile course the only competitor in the Sunrayce to earn this distinction. (The car never even had a flat tire.)The Solar Eagle IIIs technical specifications, described below, give the blueprint for a national champion  a world-class, space-age solar vehicle, meticulously refined and built on the successes of its first two solar cars, Solar Eagle and Solar Eagle II.Technical Specifications* Weight: 427 pounds (without driver and batteries)* Length: 19.2 feet* Width: 6.3 feet* Height: 3.1 feet* Rolling Chassis: carbon fiber monocoque structure* Body and Solar Panel: carbon fiber skin with Nomex honeycomb core Solar Cells: 762 terrestrial grade silicon cells (4.05 x 3.94) by Siemens wired in four parallel strings* Panel Voltage: 85-volts peak string voltage* Tire Rolling Resistance: .0045* Drag Coefficient: .15* Wheel Base: 104 inches* Wheels and Tires: wheels have composite centers with aluminum rims; tires are Bridgestone Ecopia* Brakes and Suspension: front brakes are mechanical hydraulic; regenerative rear brakes. Suspension is double A-arm in the front and swing arm in the rear* Batteries: 108-volt system with nine 12-volt batteries by U.S. Battery Manufacturing Company; weight-307 lbs* Motor System: two interchangeable motor systems: 1.) Wheel motor (NGM-SC-M100) and controller (NGM-SC-C100) by New Generation Motor Corporation and 2.) DC Brushleiss motor (BRLS8) and controller (110H) by Solectria Corporation with belt drive Overall standings for Sunrayce 97# Cal State L.A.# Massachusetts Institute of Technology# Stanford University/UC Berkeley# Texas A&M University# Rose-Hulman Institute of Technology University of Michigan# University of Waterloo, Canada# University of Missouri-Columbia# Yale University# Queens University,, Canada# University of Minnesota# Messiah College# The University- of Western Ontario, Canada# University of Illinois# University of Pennsylvania# Western Michigan University# University of Missouri-Rolla# Ohio State University# University of North Dakota# Mankato and Winona State Universities# New Mexico Institute of Mining & Technology# United States Military Academy# McGill University, Canada# Kansas State University# Columbus State Community College# Iowa State University# California State University, Long Beach# Drexel University# Ecole de Technologie Superieure, Canada# Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University# Principia College# South Dakota School of Mines and Technology# Auburn University# Purdue University# University of New Orleans# George Washington University Image:SEIIITeam800H.jpg| GM Sunrayce USAPublicationsThe team has been featured in the following local, national, and international media:*News & Documentary Video*Cal State University Los Angeles Record onlineBooks*Sunracing Richard James King, Melissa King, J. Ward Phillips*Studying Engineering A Road Map to a Rewarding Career, Raymond B. LandisExternal links*Hot Wheels*Members Facebook page
17120251
Tennessee_Coal,_Iron_and_Railroad_Company
The Tennessee Coal, Iron and Railroad Company (18521952), also known as TCI and the Tennessee Company, was a major American steel manufacturer with interests in coal and ore mining and operations. Originally based entirely within Tennessee, it relocated most of its business to Alabama in the late nineteenth century. With a sizable real estate portfolio, the company owned several Birmingham satellite towns, including Ensley, Fairfield, Docena, Edgewater and Bayview.At one time the second largest steel producer in the USA, TCI was listed on the first Jones Industrial Average in 1896. However, in 1907, the company was merged with its principal rival, the States Steel Corporation. The Tennessee Coal, Iron and Railroad Company was subsequently operated as a subsidiary of U. S. Steel for 45 years until it became a division of its parent company in 1952.HistoryEarly historyThe Tennessee Coal, Iron and Railroad Company was founded as the Sewanee Furnace Company,() a small mining concern established in 1852 by Nashville entrepreneurs( seeking to exploit Tennessees rich coal reserves and the 19th century railroad boom. After losing money, the business was sold to New York investors in 1859 and reorganized as the Tennessee Coal and Rail Company,( but the outbreak of the Civil War the following year saw the fleeting company repossessed by local creditors. It became Tennessees leading coal extractor over the next decade,( mining and transporting coal around the towns of Cowan and City in the Mountains,( and soon branched out into coke manufacture.( This practice of both extracting and moving coal to market by building private rail tracks was not unusual at the time, as by owning the tracks that served their mines, businesses could undercut rivals at market by saving money on transportation. A Thomas OConnor purchased the company in 1876 and expanded the business into iron manufacture in order to stimulate coke sales, building a blast furnace near Cowan.( The business was subsequently renamed the Tennessee Coal, Iron, and Railroad Company. TCI never again changed its name, despite a later expansion into Alabama following the 1886 purchase of the Birmingham-based Pratt Coal and Iron Company. Such was the industrial importance of Alabama to TCI that in 1895, the company relocated its offices to Birmingham,( relegating its native state to relative unimportance.thumb|left|A coking plant of Pratt Co., TCIs first purchase in Alabama and the catalyst for its ultimate relocation thereCanny investments and the purchase of major competitors in 1888 and 1892 under the direction of financier Bond, TCI Corporate General Superintendent, saw the firm grow rapidly. The corporation was for several decades one of the few major heavy industries based in the largely agricultural United States,( by a wide margin the largest blast furnace operator in the South and at one time the second largest steel producer on the continent.()() Its 1900 asset sheet listed 17 blast furnaces, 3256 beehive coke ovens, 120 Solvay coke ovens, 15 red ore mines,( as well an extensive network of railroads, although following the of 1893 the company shifted its primary interests from railroads to steel.( TCIs largest industrial plant was located in Ensley, a company town founded in 1886 on the outskirts of Birmingham, Alabama, by company president Enoch Ensley. Ensley (map of) was served by the sizable Southern Railroad, one of TCIs early acquisitions, and from 1899 contained four 200-ton furnaces. In 1906 two more furnaces were constructed, and 40,000 tonnes of steel were produced that year, feeding Ensleys integrated rail, wire and plate mills. The company was fiercely competitive with the larger Pittsburgh steel businesses to the north, owing to the remarkable fact that all the natural resources required to produce steel were located in abundance within a relatively small radius of the Birmingham mills.()From forced labor to paternalismThe Tennessee Coal, Iron and Railroad Company was one of the largest users of leasing for coal mining labor in Alabama following Reconstruction.(Blackmon, Douglas A. (2009) Slavery by Another Name: The Re-Enslavement of Black Americans from the Civil War to World War II. Anchor Books) The number of convicts employed increased after Steel acquired TCI in 1907, as did the brutality of the conditions in which they labored. In 1908, the first full year of U. S. Steels ownership of TCI, almost 60 convict workers died from workplace-related accidents.(In the 1910s, TCI undertook a comprehensive program to stabilize its labor force by developing rigorously-planned model villages, thereby improving worker health, welfare and loyalty. This paternalistic approach carried with it obvious benefits for workers and their families, but also drew criticism for limiting the free movement and organization of labor.(Rikard, Marlene Hunt (November 1981) Take Everything You Are  And Give It Away: Pioneer Industrial Workers at TCI. The Journal of the Birmingham Historical Society, Vol. 7, No. 2)(Rikard, Marlene Hunt (1983) An Experiment in Welfare Capitalism: The Health Care Services of the Tennessee Coal, Iron and Railroad Company. Ph.D. Dissertation, University of Alabama)Listing on the Dow Jones Index and merger with U. S. Steelthumb|1899 Certificate for 100 Shares in TCI issued to FW Gilley Jr. & Co.The Tennessee Coal, Iron and Railroad Companys status was bolstered when it became one of the first 12 companies to be listed on the inaugural Jones Industrial Average, compiled in May 1896.() However, it was not long before TCI was eclipsed by its principle competitor, the United States Steel Corporation, a huge conglomerate formed in 1901 out of the enormous Carnegie and Federal steel empires. By the time of the of 1907, U. S. Steel felt confident enough to launch a takeover bid of its Southern rival. On the morning of Saturday November 2, banker and tycoon J. P. Morgan, one of the founders of U. S. Steel, convened a meeting in his library and there suggested that U. S. Steel purchase the stock of an insolvent Wall Street brokerage firm, and Schley, which had secured huge loans against 6 million TCI shares.() This was not an entirely selfish gesture, as Morgan recognised that the failure of Moore and Schley would send investor confidence in the markets into a nose-dive. E. H. Gary, president of U. S. Steel, agreed in principle to this transaction, yet argued that without careful political maneuvering the deal would be seen by Congress as an effort to create a monopoly and thereby encounter troublesome federal anti-trust litigation. Morgan himself had been burnt by crusading Washington trust-busters in 1902 when his Securities Company had been forcibly broken up by the government in a landmark test case.()In response to his concerns, Morgan sent Gary on an urgent mission to Washington that Sunday so that the deal might be vetted by President Roosevelt himself before the stock exchange opened the next day. Convinced by Gary that U. S. Steel only wished to purchase Moore and Schleys stock in order to inject liquidity into the firm and thereby shore up investor confidence in the wider economy, Roosevelt granted the transaction antitrust immunity in November 1907, a decision for which he was later derided by critics as a hypocrite.( Indeed, in 1911 the federal government sought to undo what it perceived to be Roosevelts mistake and (without success) sued U. S. Steel. In the mean time, Moore and Schley was saved from collapse, the panic soon subsided and U. S. Steel was rewarded with a valuable prize - a controlling stake in TCI. U. S. Steel immediately replaced the Tennessee Coal, Iron and Railroad Company on the Dow Jones Index, where it remained until 1991.()U. S. Steelthumb|Ensley iron furnaces, 1908TCI was not fully incorporated into U. S. Steel, and continued to operate as an extremely profitable( subsidiary of its parent company well into the 20th century. Immediately following the merger, a venture was launched to create a new, larger TCI plant to the west of Ensley and at the center of a new company town, and so in 1910 work on the planned community of Corey, Alabama began.( Named after an executive who later committed suicide, Corey was soon renamed Fairfield,( and the steel works there opened in 1917. With the discovery of new coking coal and ore deposits in the region, and with the aid of U. S. Steels enormous capital, the Fairfield works were quickly expanded with the construction of new steel mills and rail links. Several rolling mills were completed in 1917,( which produced ship materials for the nearby shipbuilding plants in Alabama, in support of Americas sudden entry into War I. In 1920 a direct rail line between Fairfield and Birmingport, the new port of Birmingham on the River was opened.( This was followed by the completion of the High Ore Line Railroad,( which connected the Red Mountain and the Fairfield works; trains literally rolled down the hill from mine to mill. In 1923 a merchant steel mill was completed,( followed by the opening of a sheet products mill in 1926.(TCI proved to be so efficient at making cheap steel that a post-merger internal tariff (the Pittsburgh Tariff) was levied by U. S. Steel from 1909 on all steel coming out of the Birmingham region. This was an effort to negate the competitive edge of Birmingham steel over U.S. Steels own Pittsburgh product.(TCIs independence as a separate legal entity from its parent corporation ended in 1952, a century after the founding of the Sewanee Furnace Company, when the it became the Tennessee Coal & Iron Division of U. S. Steel.( The memory of the historic importance of TCI was not lost when a short book to celebrate the Tennessee Companys centenary was published by U. S. Steel in 1960: Biography of a Business.( Stagnation and decline began in 1962 when a majority of the mines in the Birmingham region were closed( as domestic ores and coal were superseded by cheaper foreign products, especially from Venezuela. The 1970s and 80s brought about a downsizing and eventual consolidation of the Fairfield and Ensley works,( mirroring the general decline of heavy industry in the USA throughout those decades.Current operationsthumb|Three furnaces of the Fairfield Plant since superseded by the currently used No. 8 Furnace. Photo of unknown early dateThe last relic of the Tennessee Coal, Iron and Railroad Company, the Fairfield Plant, continues to be operated by U. S. Steel as one of its five integrated steel mills in the USA. It is the largest steel-making plant in Alabama,() employing 2000() workers as of September 2006, down from a peak of 45000 during World War II. With a single blast furnace and three basic oxygen process furnaces,( amongst other various mills and production facilities, the plant produces 2.4 million tons of raw steel per annum() and 640,000 tons of seamless tubular and sheet products, mainly for purchase by the booming oil industry in the region.(ReferencesFurther reading**Birmingham Rails: Yesterday and TodayCoal, Iron and Railroad Company
17146118
Kosmaj
 easiest_route  Kosmaj (Cyrillic: , ) is a mountain south of Belgrade, the capital of Serbia. With an elevation of 626 meters, it is the highest point of the entire Belgrade City area (Statistical Yearbook of Belgrade 2007 - Topography, climate and environment) and is nicknamed one of two Belgrade mountains (the other being the mountain of Avala). Location The Kosmaj, is located 40 kilometers south-east of Belgrade. Entire area of the mountain belongs to the Belgrade City area, majority of it being in the municipalities of Mladenovac and Sopot, with eastern slopes being in the municipality of Grocka, and northern and north-western extensions in the municipalities of Barajevo and Vodovac. Etymology It is speculated that the mountain was named after the Celtic word cos meaning woods, and maj pre-Indo-European word meaning mountain.(Serbian Wikipedia article on Kosmaj) Alternative explanations suggest the connection to the ancient mountain-dwelling Slavic pagan deity Kozmaj/Kasmaj, the protector of woods, animals and the cosmos. The mountain has never been known under any other name, until it was forcefully molded by the Romans into Casa Maias, house of Maia, in order to promote worship of their goddess of spring among the locals. Geography The mountain is 5.5 kilometers long and built of flysch, serpentine, and rocks.(Jovan . Markovi (1990): Enciklopedijski geografski leksikon Jugoslavije; Svjetlost-Sarajevo; ISBN 86-01-02651-6) The highest peak is also named Kosmaj. It is a low, island mountain, the second northernmost in umadija region (after Avala). Until 600,000 years ago, when the surrounding low areas were flooded by the inner Sea, the Kosmaj was an island, just as the neighboring mountains (Avala, Gora to the north, etc), thus earning its geographical classification. The Kosmaj remains an island mountain as the plateaux around it are low and mostly flat. In the north it extends into the direction of Trenja, the southernmost extension of the Avala, while in the north-west it extends into Parcanski vis (Parcani rising), 408 meters high ending senction of the Kosmaj, which extends into the woods of uma.In Roman period, Kosmaj was an important mining center, but today the mining activities ceased completely. Evidence suggest that the ore was extracted even in the pre-Roman period.(The Kosmaj is source of several rivers. Turija river (and several of its tributraries, incluiding Sibnika reka), which springs right below the mountain and flows to the west into the River. Other originate below the Parcanski vis: Lug (or Veliki Lug) which flows to the east into the Kubrnica, Ralja also flows to the east into the Jezava, outflow of the Morava, and  Topiderka which flows to the north, into the urban center of Belgrade. Settlements Except Mladenovac  (23,653 inhabitants by the 2002 census of population) on the south-eastern slopes, other settlements, though numerous, are smaller, barely exceeding 2,500 inhabitants. They include Rogaa (1,046), Drlupa (590), Duina (736), Sopot (1,752), Ropoevo (2,363), Nemenikue (2,058), Stojnik (642), Babe (332), Guberevac (646), Ralja (2,858), Parcani (657) (in the municipality of Sopot), Ameri (807), Koraica (1,924), Ivana (1,796), Pruatovac (835) (in the municipality of Mladenovac), Barajevo (8,325) and Lisovi (1,057) (in the municipality of Barajevo). Wildlife Together with the Avala,  the island of Ratno Ostrvo and the wood of Lug (and with forests of Koutnjak and Topider to be added soon), the Kosmaj is a part of the circle of the protected green areas of Belgrade.() The Kosmaj remained forested, mostly by the deciduous (beech and oak), and to the lesser extent, coniferous woods. Altogether, 600 plant and 300 fungi species inhabits the mountain, including the endangered larkspur (Delphinium phissum) () which is on the List. Cleared areas are mostly used as pastures or are being cultivated as orchards and vineyards. Animals inhabiting the mountain include 50 mammal and 100 bird species, including the more common hares, roes, pheasants, foxes, partridges and quails but also in Serbia rare, Red Listed crake and 17 newly discovered species of Sesiidae. Wolves, once living on Kosmaj, are extinct from the mountain. Tourism The Kosmaj is touristicly well prepared. It has a hotel, mountaineering camp, villas, etc. Proximity of Belgrade and mountains gentle slopes, glades and woods are a basis for the touristic economy. Latest addition, since the mid 2000s is a modern, vast resort complex of Babe, near the village of the same name. Hunting tourism is also an opportunity, because the mountain is rich in game. Several monasteries are located in the mountains downhill: Tresije (from the 15th century), Kasteljan (in ruins) and Pavlovac. There is a spa on the southern slopes, near the village of Koraica (Koraika banja). There are two monuments on the top of the mountain, one dedicated to the fallen soldiers of the War I, the other to the soldiers of the Partisan Kosmaj Partisan detachment from the War II. See also * of mountains in Serbia Footnotes  References * Mala Prosvetina Enciklopedija, Third edition (1985); Prosveta; ISBN 86-07-00001-2* Markovi, Jovan . (1990): Enciklopedijski geografski leksikon Jugoslavije; Svjetlost-Sarajevo; ISBN 86-01-02651-6* Turistiko podruje Beograda, Geokarta, 2007, ISBN 86-459-0099-8de:Kosmaj(montagne)nn:Kosmajsr:sh:Kosmaj
17163509
Wilderness_Land_Trust
Image:Private lake.jpg|right|thumb|300px|Inholding in Californias Alps WildernessThe Wilderness Land Trust is a 501(c)(3) non-profit organization based in Carbondale, Colorado, whose mission is to acquire private lands (inholdings) in current and proposed wilderness areas and transfer them to the federal government so that they will be kept forever wild as wilderness.(About The Wilderness Land Trust) Since the Trust was founded in 1992 it has purchased over  in 70 wilderness areas.(Orion Grassroots Network)Private land inside wilderness areasAbout  of inholdings remain within the Wilderness Preservation System, mostly the legacy of 19th-century land disposal practices such as the Mining Act of 1872, the Act, and Railroad Land Grants. Under the Act of 1964, private land inside wilderness areas may be mined, logged, and otherwise developed. In some cases roads and utilities may be extended through surrounding wilderness, and houses may be constructed. By acquiring inholdings as they become available, the Trust keeps these areas free from development.References(External links*The Wilderness Land Trust website
17169979
Wild_fisheries
A fishery is an area with an associated fish or aquatic population which is harvested for its commercial value. Fisheries can be marine (saltwater) or freshwater. They can also be wild or farmed. This article is an overview of the habitats occupied by the worlds wild fisheries, and the human impacts on those habitats.Wild fisheries are sometimes called capture fisheries. The aquatic life they support is not controlled in any meaningful way and needs to be captured or fished. Wild fisheries exist primarily in the oceans, and particularly around coasts and shelves. They also exist in lakes and rivers. Issues with wild fisheries are overfishing and pollution. Significant wild fisheries have collapsed or are in danger of collapsing, due to overfishing and pollution. Overall, production from the worlds wild fisheries has levelled out, and may be starting to decline.As a contrast to wild fisheries, farmed fisheries can operate in sheltered coastal waters, in rivers, lakes and ponds, or in enclosed bodies of water such as tanks. Farmed fisheries are technological in nature, and revolve around developments in aquaculture. Farmed fisheries are expanding, and Chinese aquaculture in particular is making many advances.  Nevertheless, the majority of fish consumed by humans continues to be sourced from wild fisheries.  As of the early 21st century, fish is humanitys only significant wild food source.Marine and inland productionImage:World catches 1950 2005.png|right|thumb|300px|FAO catch statistics, world catches 1950-2005 in million tonnes.According to the and Agriculture Organization (FAO), the world harvest by fisheries in 2005 consisted of 93.2 million tonnes of animals captured in wild fisheries, plus another 1.3 million tons of plants (seaweed etc). This can be contrasted with 48.1 million tonnes harvested in farms and 14.8 million tons of aquatic plants produced by aquaculture.(FAO: Fisheries and Aquaculture)Marine  fisheriesTopographyOcean currentsGyres and upwellingBiomassHabitatsCoastal watersContinental shelvesCoral reefsOpen seaSeamountsMaritime speciesFreshwater fisheriesLakesWorldwide, freshwater lakes have an area of 1.5 million square kilometres.(Shiklomanov, I A, (1993) World fresh water resources in Glick, P H, ed., Water in Crisis: Oxford University Press, p 13-24.) Saline inland seas add another 1.0 million square kilometres.(OSullivan, Patrick E and Reynolds, Colin S (2005) The Lakes Handbook. Blackwell Publishing. ISBN 0632047976) There are 28 freshwater lakes with an area greater than 5,000 square kilometres, totalling 1.18 million square kilometres or 79 percent of the total.(U.S. Geological Survey Fact Sheet FS-058-99)RiversPollutionPollution is the introduction of contaminants into an environment. Wild fisheries flourish in oceans, lakes, and rivers, and the introduction of contaminants is an issue of concern, especially as regards plastics, pesticides, heavy metals, and other industrial and agricultural pollutants which do not disintegrate rapidly in the environment. Land run-off and industrial, agricultural, and domestic waste enter rivers and are discharged into the sea. Pollution from ships is also a problem.Plastic wastedebris is human-created waste that ends up floating in the sea. Oceanic debris tends to accumulate at the centre of gyres and coastlines, frequently washing aground where it is known as beach litter. Eighty percent of all known marine debris is plastic - a component that has been rapidly accumulating since the end of World War II.() Plastics accumulate because they dont biodegrade as many other substances do; while they will photodegrade on exposure to the sun, they do so only under dry conditions, as water inhibits this process.()Discarded bags, pack rings and other forms of plastic waste which finish up in the ocean present dangers to wildlife and fisheries.(Algalita.org) Aquatic life can be threatened through entanglement, suffocation, and ingestion.(UNEP.org)(Six pack rings hazard to wildlife)(Louisiana Fisheries - Fact Sheets)Nurdles, also known as mermaids tears, are plastic pellets typically under five millimetres in diameter, and are a major contributor to marine debris. They are used as a raw material in plastics manufacturing, and are thought to enter the environment after accidental spillages. Nurdles are also created through the weathering of larger plastic debris. They strongly resemble eggs, only instead of finding a nutritious meal, any marine wildlife that ingests them will likely starve, be poisoned and die.()Many animals that live on or in the sea consume flotsam by mistake, as it often looks similar to their natural prey.()  Plastic debris, when bulky or tangled, is difficult to pass, and may become permanently lodged in the digestive tracts of these animals, blocking the passage of food and causing death through starvation or infection.( ) Tiny floating particles also resemble zooplankton, which can lead feeders to consume them and cause them to enter the ocean chain. In samples taken from the Pacific Gyre in 1999 by the Algalita Marine Research Foundation, the mass of plastic exceeded that of zooplankton by a factor of six.(() More recently, reports have surfaced that there may now be 30 times more plastic than plankton, the most abundant form of life in the ocean.()Toxic additives used in the manufacture of plastic materials can leech out into their surroundings when exposed to water. Waterborne hydrophobic pollutants collect and magnify on the surface of plastic debris,() thus making plastic far more deadly in the ocean than it would be on land.( Hydrophobic contaminants are also known to bioaccumulate in fatty tissues, biomagnifying up the food chain and putting great pressure on predators. Some plastic additives are known to disrupt the system when consumed, others can suppress the immune system or decrease reproductive rates.(ToxinsApart from plastics, there are particular problems with other toxins which do not disintegrate rapidly in the marine environment. Heavy metals are metallic chemical elements that have a relatively high density and are toxic or poisonous at low concentrations. Examples are mercury, lead, nickel, arsenic and cadmium. Other persistent toxins are PCBs, DDT, pesticides, furans, dioxins and phenols.Such toxins can accumulate in the tissues of many species of aquatic life in a process called bioaccumulation. They are also known to accumulate in benthic environments, such as estuaries and muds: a geological record of human activities of the last century.Some specific examples are* Chinese and Russian industrial pollution such as phenols and heavy metals in the River have devastated fish stocks and damaged its estuary soil.(Indigenous Peoples of the Russian North, Siberia and Far East: Nivkh  by Arctic Network for the Support of the Indigenous Peoples of the Russian Arctic)* Lake in Alberta, Canada, once the best whitefish lake in the area, now has unacceptable levels of heavy metals in its sediment and fish.* Acute and chronic pollution events have been shown to impact southern California kelp forests, though the intensity of the impact seems to depend on both the nature of the contaminants and duration of exposure.(Grigg, R.W. and R.S. Kiwala. 1970. Some ecological effects of discharged wastes on marine life. California Department of Fish and Game 56: 145-155.)(Stull, J.K. 1989. Contaminants in sediments near a major marine outfall: history, effects and future. OCEANS 89 Proceedings 2: 481-484.)(North, W.J., D.E. James and L.G. Jones. 1993. History of kelp beds (Macrocystis) in Orange and San Diego Counties, California. Hydrobiologia 260/261: 277-283.)(Tegner, M.J., P.K. Dayton, P.B. Edwards, K.L. Riser, D.B. Chadwick, T.A. Dean and L. Deysher. 1995. Effects of a large sewage spill on a kelp forest community: catastrophe or disturbance? Marine Environmental Research 40: 181-224.)()* Due to their high position in the chain and the subsequent accumulation of metals from their diet, mercury levels can be high in larger species such as bluefin and albacore. As a result, in March 2004 the States FDA issued guidelines recommending that pregnant women, nursing mothers and children limit their intake of tuna and other types of predatory fish.()* Some shellfish and crabs can survive polluted environments, accumulating heavy metals or toxins in their tissues. For example, crabs have a remarkable ability to survive in highly modified habitats, including polluted waters.() The farming and harvesting of such species needs careful management if they are to be used as a food.()()* Mining has a poor environmental track record.  For example, according to the States Environmental Protection Agency, mining has contaminated portions of the headwaters of over 40% of watersheds in the western continental US.() Much of this pollution finishes up in the sea.* Heavy metals enter the environment through spills - such as the oil spill on the Galician coast - or from other natural or anthropogenic sources.(Perez-Lopez et al. (2006))Eutrophicationeutrophication-en.svg|thumb|right|Effect of eutrophication on marine benthic lifeEutrophication is an increase in chemical nutrients, typically compounds containing nitrogen or phosphorus, in an ecosystem. It can result in an increase in the ecosystems productivity (excessive plant growth and decay), and further effects including lack of oxygen and severe reductions in water quality, fish, and other animal populations.The biggest culprit are rivers that empty into the ocean, and with it the many chemicals used as fertilizers in agriculture as well as waste from livestock and humans. An excess of oxygen depleting chemicals in the water can lead to hypoxia and the creation of a dead zone.(Gerlach: Marine Pollution, Springer, Berlin  (1975))Surveys have shown that 54% of lakes in Asia are eutrophic; in Europe, 53%; in America, 48%; in America, 41%; and in Africa, 28%.(ILEC/Lake Biwa Research Institute Eds. 19881993 Survey of the State of the Worlds Lakes. Volumes I-IV. International Lake Environment Committee, Otsu and United Nations Environment Programme, Nairobi.) Estuaries also tend to be naturally eutrophic because land-derived nutrients are concentrated where run-off enters the marine environment in a confined channel. The Resources Institute has identified 375 hypoxic coastal zones around the world, concentrated in coastal areas in Western Europe, the Eastern and Southern coasts of the US, and East Asia, particularly in Japan.(Selman, Mindy (2007) Eutrophication: An Overview of Status, Trends, Policies, and Strategies. World Resources Institute.) In the ocean, there are frequent tide algae blooms() that kill fish and marine mammals and cause respiratory problems in humans and some domestic animals when the blooms reach close to shore.In addition to runoff, atmospheric anthropogenic fixed nitrogen can enter the open ocean. A study in 2008 found that this could account for around one third of the oceans external (non-recycled) nitrogen supply and up to three per cent of the annual new marine biological production.(Duce, R A and 29 others (2008) Impacts of Atmospheric Anthropogenic Nitrogen on the Open Ocean Science. Vol 320, pp 89389) It has been suggested that accumulating reactive nitrogen in the environment may have consequences as serious as putting carbon dioxide in the atmosphere.(Addressing the nitrogen cascade Eureka Alert, 2008.)AcidificationThe oceans are normally a natural carbon sink, absorbing carbon dioxide from the atmosphere. Because the levels of atmospheric carbon dioxide are increasing, the oceans are becoming more acidic.()()The potential consequences of ocean acidification are not fully understood, but there are concerns that structures made of calcium carbonate may become vulnerable to dissolution, affecting corals and the ability of shellfish to form shells.(Raven, J. A. et al. (2005). Ocean acidification due to increasing atmospheric carbon dioxide. Royal Society, London, UK.)A report from NOAA scientists published in the journal Science in May 2008 found that large amounts of relatively acidified water are upwelling to within four miles of the Pacific shelf area of North America. This area is a critical zone where most local marine life lives or is born. While the paper dealt only with areas from Vancouver to northern California, other continental shelf areas may be experiencing similar effects.()Effects of fishingHabitat destructionnets that have been left or lost in the ocean by fishermen are  called nets, and can entangle fish, dolphins, turtles, sharks, dugongs, crocodiles, seabirds, crabs, and other creatures. Acting as designed, these nets restrict movement, causing starvation, laceration and infection, andin those that need to return to the surface to breathsuffocation.()OverfishingSome specific examples of overfishing.* On the east coast of the States, the availability of bay scallops has been greatly diminished by the overfishing of sharks in the area.  A variety of sharks have, until recently, fed on rays, which are a main predator of bay scallops.  With the shark population reduced, in some places almost totally, the rays have been free to dine on scallops to the point of greatly decreasing their numbers.* Chesapeake Bays once-flourishing oyster populations historically filtered the estuarys entire water volume of excess nutrients every three or four days.  Today that process takes almost a year,() and  sediment, nutrients, and algae can cause problems in local waters. Oysters filter these pollutants, and either eat them or shape them into small packets that are deposited on the bottom where they are harmless.* The Australian government alleged in 2006 that Japan illegally overfished bluefin tuna by taking 12,000 to 20,000 tonnes per year instead of the their agreed 6,000 tonnes; the value of such overfishing would be as much as USD $2 billion.  Such overfishing has resulted in severe damage to stocks. Japans huge appetite for tuna will take the most sought-after stocks to the brink of commercial extinction unless fisheries agree on more rigid quotas stated the WWF.(Japan warned tuna stocks face extinction Justin McCurry, guardian.co.uk, Monday January 22, 2007. Retrieved 2008-04-02.)(TheAge.com.au) Japan disputes this figure, but acknowledges that some overfishing has occurred in the past.(IHT.com)* Jackson, Jeremy B C et al. (2001) Historical overfishing and the recent collapse of coastal ecosystems Science 293:629-638.Loss of biodiversityEach species in an ecosystem is affected by the other species in that ecosystem. There are very few single prey-single predator relationships. Most prey are consumed by more than one predator, and most predators have more than one prey. Their relationships are also influenced by other environmental factors.  In most cases, if one species is removed from an ecosystem, other species will most likely be affected, up to the point of extinction.Species biodiversity is a major contributor to  the stability of ecosystems. When an organism exploits a wide range of resources, a decrease in biodiversity is less likely to have an impact. However, for an organism which exploit only limited resources, a decrease in biodiversity is more likely to have a strong effect.Reduction of habitat, hunting and fishing of some species to extinction or near extinction, and pollution tend to tip the balance of biodiversity. For a systematic treatment of biodiversity within a level, see neutral theory of biodiversity.Threatened speciesThe global standard for recording threatened marine species is the IUCN Red List of Threatened Species.(The 2008 IUCN Red List of Threatened Species) This list is the foundation for marine conservation priorities worldwide. A species is listed in the threatened category if it is considered to be endangered, endangered, or vulnerable. Other categories are threatened and deficient.MarineMany marine species are under increasing risk of extinction and marine biodiversity is undergoing potentially irreversible loss due to threats such as overfishing, bycatch, change, species and coastal development.By 2008, the IUCN had assessed about 3,000 marine species. This includes assessments of known species of shark, ray, chimaera, reef-building coral, grouper, marine turtle, seabird, and marine mammal. Almost one-quarter (22%) of these groups have been listed as threatened.(IUCN:  Status of the worlds marine species)* Sharks, rays, and chimaeras: are deep water pelagic species, which makes them difficult to study in the wild. Not a lot is known about their ecology and population status. Much of what is currently known is from their capture in nets from both targeted and accidental catch. Many of these slow growing species are not recovering from overfishing by shark fisheries around the world.* Groupers: Major threats are overfishing, particularly the uncontrolled fishing of small juveniles and spawning adults.* reefs: The primary threats to corals are bleaching and disease which has been linked to an increase in sea temperatures. Other threats include coastal development, coral extraction, sedimentation and pollution. The coral triangle (Indo-Malay-Philippine archipelago) region has the highest number of reef-building coral species in threatened category as well as the highest coral species diversity. The loss of coral reef ecosystems will have devastating effects on many marine species, as well as on people that depend on reef resources for their livelihoods.* Marine mammals: include whales, dolphins, porpoises, seals, lions, walruses, otter, otter, manatees, dugong and the bear. Major threats include entanglement in nets, targeted harvesting, noise pollution from military and seismic sonar, and boat strikes. Other threats are water pollution, habitat loss from coastal development, loss of food sources due to the collapse of fisheries, and climate change.* Seabirds: Major threats include longline fisheries and gillnets, spills, and predation by rodents and cats in their breeding grounds. Other threats are habitat loss and degradation from coastal development, logging and pollution.* Marine turtles: Marine turtles lay their eggs on beaches, and are subject to threats such as coastal development, sand mining, and predators, including humans who collect their eggs for food in many parts of the world. At sea, marine turtles can be targeted by small scale subsistence fisheries, or become bycatch during longline and trawling activities, or become entangled in nets or struck by boats.An ambitious project, called the Global Marine Species Assessment, is under way to make IUCN Red List assessments for another 17,000 marine species by 2012. Groups targeted include the approximately 15,000 known marine fishes, and important habitat-forming producers such mangroves, seagrasses, certain seaweeds and the remaining corals; and important invertebrate groups including molluscs andechinoderms.(IUCN:  Status of the worlds marine species factsheet)FreshwaterFreshwater fisheries have a disproportionately high diversity of species compared to other ecosystems. Although freshwater habitats cover less than 1% of the worlds surface, they provide a home for over 25% of known vertebrates, more than 126,000 known animal species, about 24,800 species of fish,molluscs, crabs and dragonflies, and about 2,600 macrophytes.(IUCN:  Freshwater biodiversity a hidden resource under threat factsheet)Continuing industrial and agricultural developments place huge strain on thesefreshwater systems. Waters are polluted or extracted at high levels, wetlands are drained, rivers channelled, forests deforestated leading to sedimentation, invasive species are introduced, and over-harvesting occurs.In the 2008 IUCN Red List, about 6,000 or 22% of the known freshwater species  have been assessed at a global scale, leaving about  21,000 species still to be assessed. This makes clear that, worldwide, freshwater species are highly threatened, possibly more so than species in marine fisheries.(IUCN:  Freshwater biodiversity a hidden resource under threat) However, a significant proportion of freshwater species are listed as deficient, and more field surveys are needed.(Fisheries managementA recent paper published by the National Academy of Sciences of the USA warns that: Synergistic effects of habitat destruction, overfishing, introduced species, warming, acidification, toxins, and massive runoff of nutrients are transforming once complex ecosystems like coral reefs and kelp forests into monotonous level bottoms, transforming clear and productive coastal seas into anoxic dead zones, and transforming complex food webs topped by big animals into simplified, microbially dominated ecosystems with boom and bust cycles of toxic dinoflagellate blooms, jellyfish, and disease.(Jackson, Jeremy B C (2008) Ecological extinction and evolution in the brave new ocean Proceedings of The National Academy of Sciences of the USA.)See also* by country* fisheries* dynamics of fisheries* fish productionNotesReferences* World Ocean Atlas (2005) World ocean database. Retrieved 19 April 2008.* The Columbia Electronic Encyclopedia (2007) The World Ocean. Retrieved 19 April 2008.* Jacques, Peter (2006) Globalization and the world ocean Rowman Altamira. ISBN 0759105855* Pauly, Daniel; Watson, Reg and Alder, Jackie (2005) Global trends in world fisheries: impacts on marine ecosystems and food security Philosophical transactions of the Royal Society, Volume 360, Number 1453.External links* International Nitrogen Initiative: Web site* Population Distribution within 100 km of Coastlines (2000) Resources Institute.* NOAA: Carbon cycle science
17194978
Homestake_Mining
#REDIRECT Mining Company
17208725
Vermilion_Lake_(Sudbury)
Vermilion Lake (disambiguation)Lake Vermilion (disambiguation) frozen  Vermilion Lake is a lake in the city of Sudbury, Ontario which is situated approximately 33 km west of downtown, in Fairbank Township. The lakes primary inflow and outflow is the Vermilion River. There is also a small creek that flows into Vermillion Lake, Cameron Creek. This creek connects Cameron lake and and the Vermillion. The creek is unpassable except for canoe as the water level can only be a few inches. There is also a small set of rapids along the creek. The main access road to residential and recreational properties on the lake is Vermilion Lake Road, near the neighborhood of Chelmsford. Vermilion Lake Road was voted as the worst road in Ontario in the Automobile Associations annual Ontarios Worst Roads survey in 2007.()Vermillion Lake provides a home for about 300 familys. Minimal services are provided but the city, with fire hydrant service ending a few kilometers for Hwy 144. Primarily each residence has an independent fresh water system that is serviced by drilled wells the deepest of which can be 400 feet. Sewer systems are also independent with each home being serviced by a private septic systems. Garbage and recycling pick up is provided by the city on a weekly basis. Mail is delivered to most residences at the end of the their respective driveways. Volunteers provide fire service with one hall servicing the area, also Dowling fire hall will respond to fire calls in the area. Since no hydrants are available water is drafted from the lake or is trucked in by tanker to fight fires. Ambulance service is provided by the City of Greater Sudbury with the nearest ambulance being in Chelmsford and a Rapid Response paramedic responding from Levack. A certified landing pad for the air ambulance is located at the Vermillion Lake Park along Vermillion Lake Road. Police Service is provided also by the city, with patrols originating from Azilda. Many families enjoy the idea of the lake life living in the area. Many homes have docks in the summer as fishing and swimming are a normal occurrence. Many groups travel up the Vermillion River to one of many sand bars to swim. During the winter many ice huts dot the lake as people from near by communities as well as residences of the lake place the huts they may fish in comfort. Most properties are close to an hector large with many being much larger.Vermillion Lake is also a recreational playground for many of the local communities. The D Trail of the OFSC runs on the south shore and and can be accessed off the lake throw a closed mining site. Vermillion lake was created when the logging company now known as Domtar placed a dam at the outflow portion of the Vermillion river. This created a stop flow of water flooding the area and creating the lake. The logging company used the lake to float timber to a collection station. Logging no longer occurs near the lake.  References External links*Vermilion Lake water quality*Vermilion Lake detailed information*Vermilion Lake Park
17227613
Campaigning_for_Zimbabwean_presidential_election,_2008
Campaigning for the first round of the presidential election held in Zimbabwe on March 29, 2008 took place from February to March. There were three major candidates: President Mugabe of the ruling African National Union - Patriotic Front (ZANU-PF), Tsvangirai of the opposition Movement for Democratic Change (MDC, Tsvangirai faction), and the independent candidate Makoni.Beginning of campaigningMugabe declared on February 12 that he was raring to go and raring to fly.(Mugabe raring to go for election, Reuters (IOL), February 12, 2008.) Speaking at a rally in Beitbridge on February 23, he likened Makoni to a frog trying to inflate itself up to the size of an ox that was sure to burst, while calling Tsvangirai a Western puppet. Predicting an easy victory for ZANU-PF, he vowed that change would never occur in Zimbabwe.(Mugabe lambasts challengers, Al Jazeera, February 24, 2008.) Mugabe launched his re-election campaign on February 29 in Harare(Mugabe vows to defeat two-headed political creatures in Zimbabwe election, Associated Press (International Herald Tribune), February 29, 2008.) and presented ZANU-PFs election manifesto.(Mugabe partially admits failing Zimbabweans, SABC News, February 29, 2008.) He promised increased agricultural production and the reform and improvement of the mining sector,(Mugabe dubs poll rivals witches, BBC News, February 29, 2008.) and he urged the party to acknowledge past failures, such as in the area of infrastructure development.( He said that ZANU-PF was united under his leadership: the struggles within the party that have taken place, and in some cases little wars, have been settled. At the end of the day, we have this congregation with me at the head.(Tsvangirai launched his campaign and presented the MDCs election manifesto on February 23 in Mutare. Promising to deliver economic recovery, he said that the MDC had studied this economy comprehensively and we know what is wrong with it, and that he could put this economy back on its feet with 100 days of forming a democratic government. Mugabe and ZANU-PF, according to Tsvangirai, belonged to the past, had run out of ideas, and could not rescue the economy. Tsvangirai also said that he would place a priority on the creation of a new constitution. He argued that the people wanted total change and not merely partial reform, comparing the former to new clothes and the latter to patching up tattered clothes; this was viewed as a critical reference to Makonis candidacy.(Fikile Maphala, Tsvangirai launches campaign, economic revival tops agenda, newzimbabwe.com, February 24, 2008.)Speaking at a press conference in Bulawayo on March 1, prior to the launch of Makonis campaign, former Interior Minister Dabengwa and former Speaker of Parliament Ndebele announced their support for Makoni.(Zanu-PF veterans side with Makoni, AFP (IOL), March 1, 2008.)Events during the campaignWhile U.S. Ambassador D. McGee pointed to ominous signs that the election would not be free and fair in an open letter in late February, Zambian Foreign Minister Pande said that signs were encouraging and that regional leaders believed the election would be free and fair. Zambian President Mwanawasa suggested that the West might not be willing to acknowledge the legitimacy of the election unless Mugabe was defeated.(The Herald, Zimbabwes state-owned daily newspaper, reported on February 29 that Retired Major General Zimondi, the head of the prison service, gave his officers an order to vote for Mugabe.(Vote Mugabe, thats an order!, Reuters (IOL), February 29, 2008.)(Vote Mugabe, prison staff ordered, BBC News, February 29, 2008.) He said that Tsvangirai and Makoni would reverse land reform if they were elected, and he vowed to resign from his post and return to his farm to protect it if Mugabe were defeated. Makoni has said that he would continue land reform and would not take back any redistributed land unless it was improperly gained.( Subsequently, Defence Forces Commander Chiwenga said that the army supported Mugabe and would not support or salute sell-outs and agents of the West before, during and after the presidential elections.(Nqobani Ndlovu, Ill only salute Mugabe, not sell-outs: Chiwenga, The Standard (Zimbabwe).)On March 4, The Herald reported that several important foreign corporations, including Citigroup, African Breweries-Miller, and Africa, were providing financial assistance to Makonis campaign; the newspaper called this proof that Makonis election bid was part of the Western regime change agenda.(UK, SA firms fund Zims Makoni: report, Sapa (IOL), March 4, 2008.)Makoni said in an interview with France-Presse in early March that he anticipated getting at least 72% of the vote and that he was only interested in the concerns of Zimbabweans, not those of the West. According to Makoni, Mugabe has a very special place in our history and would receive the due respect that our African culture and African standards demand of us if Makoni won the election, stressing that he was not about retribution and victimisation.(No backlash against Mugabe, says challenger, Sapa-AFP (IOL), March 4, 2008.) In an interview with the Financial Times published on March 17, he repeated that he would not seek retribution against Mugabe if he won the election, although he said that Mugabe had a lot to answer for and would still be subject to the law. According to Makoni, he wanted to form a national unity government that would include both ZANU-PF and the MDC.(Mugabe has a lot to answer for - Makoni, Sapa-AFP (IOL), March 17, 2008.)On March 5, The Herald reported that Mugabe told a rally in Bridge that the British had identified people within Zanu-PF to work with in causing divisions in the party because it realised the ruling party was a united revolutionary liberation movement that had to be destroyed from within. He distributed over 200 computers to Manicaland schools and said that food and farm equipment would also be sent.(Makoni presidency a ploy by Britain - Mugabe, IOL, March 5, 2008.) On the same day, Mugabe said at a rally in Mahusekwa that some businesses were raising prices with the intent of causing the people to suffer, hoping that they would blame the government for their suffering and vote for the opposition as a result.(Mugabe says price hikes undermine him, AFP (IOL), March 5, 2008.)The Union expressed concern on March 10 that the humanitarian, political and economic situation in Zimbabwe and conditions on the ground might endanger the holding of free and fair parliamentary and presidential elections. It said that European observers had not been invited.(EU fears Zim elections wont be free or fair, Reuters (IOL), March 10, 2008.) While not inviting any observers from the EU or the United States, Zimbabwe has invited 47 observer teams, including observers from the African Development Community (SADC), the Union, China, Russia, and Iran. On March 11, the arrival of the first 50 observers from SADC was reported, with more expected.(SADC observers arrive to monitor Zim poll, AFP (IOL), March 11, 2008.) SADC Secretary-General Salomao said in a press conference in Harare on March 12 that SADC was confident that the tradition of peace encapsulated in the unquestionable political maturity and tolerance shall, once again guide Zimbabweans as they go to the polls.(SADC shrugs off election fears, Sapa-AFP (IOL), March 12, 2008.)In light of Zimbabwes dramatic rate, Mugabe massively raised the salaries of members of the security forces in February, and on March 10 he approved raises for teachers and civil servants.(Is Mugabe wooing workers?, Sapa-AFP (IOL), March 12, 2008.) At around the same time, he signed the Indigenisation and Economic Empowerment Bill, which requires all businesses to be majority owned (at least 51%) by black Zimbabweans.(Basildon Peta, Mugabe approves indigenous ownership law, The Star (IOL), March 10, 2008, page 5.) Mugabe subsequently accused business of raising prices to nullify the benefit of the pay raises, demanding that the price increases be reversed and warning that profiteering white-owned businesses would be taken over by the government.(Zim gets rid of profiteers, Sapa-DPA (IOL), March 20, 2008.)Rights Watch stated that the Electoral Commission was inadequately prepared for the polls and that the opposition was not being treated equally to the governing ZANU-PF by the authorities.(Zimbabwe election run-up flawed, BBC News, March 19, 2008.) The government rejected these accusations; Deputy Information Minister Matonga said that both ZANU-PF and the MDC were represented on the Electoral Commission and that Human Rights Watchs report reflected an agenda.(Zimbabwe rejects free poll fears, BBC News, March 19, 2008.) In a report issued on March 19, Rights Forum claimed strong media bias in favor of Mugabe and the use of intimidation and threats against opposition supporters; it also alleged that the Electoral Commission is merely a front for the Registrars Office, which it said is partisan in favor of ZANU-PF.(Poll run-up a dogs breakfast, Cape Argus (IOL), March 22, 2008, page 12.)Mugabe has used the campaign slogan vote for the fist, reflecting ZANU-PF militancy; the MDC replied to this slogan by saying that we cannot feed people with clenched fists, while Makoni has said that the fist has become a hammer smashing the country.(Vote for the Fist - Mugabe, Reuters (IOL), March 22, 2008 (Saturday Argus, March 22, 2008, page 13).)The Electoral Court ruled against an MDC petition asking for electronic copies of the voter rolls to be made available, saying that this was out of the Courts jurisdiction, on March 13. An application requesting electronic copies was subsequently filed at the Harare High Court on March 17. An electronic list would facilitate searching the rolls for discrepancies. The presence in the voter rolls of Lardner-Burke, a Rhodesian Minister of Law and Order who died decades before, has been pointed to as an example of flaws in the voter rolls.(Angus Shaw, Opposition demand electronic voters roll, Sapa-Associated Press (IOL), March 18, 2008.) On March 20, Tsvangirai held a news conference at which he claimed that, in 28 rural constituencies, there were 90,000 names on the voter rolls that could not be accounted for. He said that he based this claim on the work of independent analysts. He also protested a plan by the Electoral Commission to have votes in the presidential election counted separately, at the national level, while votes for the parliamentary and local elections would be counted locally at the polling stations. According to Tsvangirai, who demanded that all votes be counted at the polling stations, this was illegal, and he said that he would not participate in such a process. Furthermore, he said that while only 20,000 postal ballots were necessary, the Electoral Commission had ordered 600,000 of them.(Voters register filled with ghost names, AFP (IOL), March 20, 2008.) MDC Secretary-General Biti claimed on March 23 that correspondence had been discovered indicating that the Electoral Commission had requested the printing of nine million ballots, far more than the number of registered voters. According to Biti, this demonstrated an intention to rig the election in favor of Mugabe. Biti also said that 600,000 postal ballots had been ordered for police, soldiers,(Mugabe accused of election-rigging plan, CNN, March 23, 2008.)(Vote-rigging fears in Zimbabwe, Cape Times, March 24, 2008, page 1.) civil servants working away from home, and diplomats and their families who are posted in other countries.( According to Biti, this was wildly disproportionate to the actual number of postal ballots needed; he said that the number of police and soldiers combined was 50,000 at most.( Electoral Commission Deputy Chairwoman Joyce Kazembe rejected the allegation that extra ballots were being printed to facilitate fraud, saying that only a small number of extra ballots had been printed in order to account for spoilt ballots.(Mugabe looks East for economic aid, Al Jazeera, March 25, 2008.)On March 23, Mugabe held a rally in Bulawayo, the countrys second largest city, which is considered a stronghold of the MDC. At the rally, he accused the MDC of seeking the reversal of land reform and urging other countries to intensify sanctions on Zimbabwe, and he said that ZANU-PF had not been split by Makonis candidacy and Dabengwas decision to back Makoni. For his part, Tsvangarai rejected the idea that he was hostile to land reform, saying that he made land reform proposals as early as 1995. He did, however, say that he wanted to establish an independent commission to confiscate farms from individuals who owned more than one.(Moshoeshoe Monare and Agiza Hlongwane, Mugabe on the offensive, Daily News (IOL), March 24, 2008, page 4.)According to the South Africa-based Solidarity Forum at a media briefing on March 20, Zimbabweans living outside the country would not be able to vote because of a constitutional requirement that a voter have lived within a constituency for at least one year prior to the election.(Zim in diaspora cannot vote - ZSF, Sapa (IOL), March 20, 2008.)Opinion polls and conclusion of campaignAccording to a March 2008 poll by the Mass Public Opinion Institute, Mugabe stands at 20% support, with 28% for Tsvangirai and 9% for Makoni. The remaining, undecided voters were deemed more likely to vote for the opposition than for Mugabe. Tsvangirai claimed Mugabe could not win the election due to the state of the economy, a record of alleged repression, and his age, but would try to steal it. He said that the MDC hoped to pre-empt the Electoral Commission by conducting its own count and releasing results first.(Christina Lamb, Robert Mugabe cannot win election  but he can still steal it, The Sunday Times, March 23, 2008.) On March 23, he claimed that most members of the police and the Intelligence Organisation were behind the people and committed to defend the new Zimbabwe, despite the statements from leading figures in the security forces expressing support for Mugabe. He said that members of the security forces had nothing to fear if he won the election, as long as they protected the national voices of Zimbabweans and were committed to the constitutional order in this country.(Marwick Khumalo, the head of the observer group of the AUs Parliament, said in an interview published in The Herald on March 24 that his group was concerned only with the electoral process itself, not with the outcome. He said that his group had not come to prescribe to Zimbabwe how they should conduct their elections and that the purpose of our mission here is to ensure that the elections meet the standards of the African Union Charter on Democracy, Elections and Governance and the African Union Declaration on Elections, Democracy and Governance in Africa.(Were not interested in Zim poll outcome - AU, Sapa-DPA (IOL), March 24, 2008.)Another survey, conducted by Dr Joseph Kurebwa, a lecturer in the department of political science at the University of Zimbabwe, as an independent consultant was reported by The Herald on March 28 as predicting that Mugabe would win a first round majority with 56% of the vote, followed by Tsvangirai with 26&ndash;27%, Makoni with 13&ndash;14%, and Towungana with 0.2%. The survey was based on the views of 10,322 participants, and all of the countrys wards were represented in the survey.(Mugabe tipped to win, Sapa (IOL), March 28, 2008.) Interestingly, Dr Kurebwa is seen by many as a ZANU PF functionary in the mold of Professor Claude Mararike, who has been making the same predictions since 2000 based on what he terms a simulation of voting patterns in Zimbabwe on a sample selected by him. Opponents claim that the Herald, seen by observers as a government mouthpiece,(BBC NEWS | Africa | UK, US caused Zimbabwe droughts) has misrepresented the universitys position.CNN was denied permission to cover the election, according to an official at the Ministry of Information and Publicity on March 25, 2008.(CNN denied permission to cover elections in Zimbabwe, CNN, March 25, 2008.) Many other foreign media outlets, such as South Africas e.tv, were also denied accreditation by the government.(Zimbabwe election complaints mount, Sapa-AFP (IOL), March 26, 2008.)A few days before the election, Makonis spokesman said that his campaigns advertisements were being excluded from the state media.( His campaign manager, Nkosana Moyo, said on March 26 that, in addition to a national unity government, Makoni would establish some sort of truth and reconciliation process if he won the election. He also said that Makoni would take a different approach to land reform and would review any unjustified confiscations of land. Furthermore, Moyo made it clear that if Makoni placed third and was excluded from a potential second round, he would back Tsvangirai.(Zim needs a truth commission, says Makoni, Sapa (IOL), March 26, 2008.) At around the same time, the States State Department urged the government and the Electoral Commission to take concrete actions to address  significant shortcomings, and International criticized what it alleged was intimidation of the opposition by the police.(The governments Look East policy, based on deepening economic relationships with a number of countries in Asia and the Middle East, was touted by Mugabe as the solution to Zimbabwes economic problems. According to Mugabe, the Zimbabwean economy had not yet recovered because it was linked too closely to the West, but he said during the campaign that continuing the Look East policy would soon lead to economic recovery. He also said that Zimbabwe was learning from economic policies in some Asian countries that focused on the development of small and medium enterprises, arguing that these policies, unlike those favored by the West, empowered people locally.(Bayano Valy, Look East Policy Pays Dividends - President, The Herald (allAfrica.com), March 27, 2008.)On March 27, Mugabe dissolved his Cabinet ahead of the election. Regarding the composition of a new Cabinet following the election, he said that the good performers will return, the poor performers will drop.(Zimbabwe: Cabinet Dissolved Ahead of Historic Polls, The Herald (allAfrica.com), March 28, 2008.)The MDC said that if Mugabe was declared the winner of the election, the result could be violence of the sort seen in Kenya following that countrys December 2007 presidential election, although Tsvangirai told his supporters to not engage in violence.(Mugabe fires broadside amid poll countdown, AFP (IOL), March 28, 2008.) At a rally in District, Mugabe responded to the suggestion of violence by saying: Just dare try it. We dont play around while you try to please your British allies. Just try it and you will see. We want to see you do it. He stressed the importance of having a peaceful atmosphere and said that the losing side must be prepared to acknowledge defeat.(Just try it and you will see, warns Mugabe, Sapa-AFP (IOL), March 27, 2008.) On March 28, the security forces were placed on full alert. At a press conference on that day, National Police Commissioner Chihuri warned the opposition to avoid violence, saying that violence is a monster that can devour its creator, as it is blind and not selective in nature.(In a joint statement on March 27, Tsvangirai, Makoni, and Mutambara said that independent analysis of the voter lists demonstrated that there were major discrepancies and alleged the existence of a very well thought out and sophisticated plan to steal the election from us.(Zimbabweans vote in tense election, Al Jazeera, March 29, 2008.) They said that, in the period from December 2007 to February 2008, the number of voters on the voter registration list had increased by 11% in rural areas but by only 2% in urban areas.(Polls close in Zimbabwe elections, Al Jazeera, March 29, 2008.) Tsvangirai said that officials and election workers should ignore any instructions to falsify the results, and he called on voters to stay at their polling stations after voting so that they could prevent fraud.(Mugabe concluded his campaign on March 28 with a rally near Harare, vowing to win a victory that would deal a final blow to the British, who he described as the puppeteers of Tsvangirai and Makoni.(References
17236819
Mount_Bisoke
Mount Bisoke (also Visoke) is an volcano in the Mountains of the Rift Valley. It straddles the border of Rwanda and the Republic of the Congo, but the summit is located in Rwanda. It is located approximately 35 km northeast of the town of Goma and adjacent Kivu.GeologyBisoke, like all of the peaks in the Virunga Mountain Range, is a volcano created by rift action on the forming boundary which is slowly bisecting the plate (see: Rift Valley).  The mountain reached a height of  before becoming extinct.  Bisoke has the largest lake of the range.GeographyThe mountain is located within Rwandan National Park and Congolese National Park. The steep slopes of the peak are densely covered with equatorial rainforest and meadows.  The summit does not gather snow, but is often shrouded in fog. Bisoke is one of the mountains considered a habitat for the Endangered gorilla, and the Research Center founded by Fossey is located in the valley to the west.Industry/TourismBeing located within two national parks, it is by law off-limits to most standard wilderness industries such as logging, farming, or mining.  Aside from visitors to the  parks searching for gorillas or other wildlife, the peak is popular with mountaineers.  It can be climbed in a day from the Rwandan side, and the Rwandan Tourist Board (ORTPN) leads two-day excursions to it and nearby Karisimbi, most often out of the nearby city of Ruhengeri.  The climb is considered steep, but walkable.(http://www.peakware.com/peaks.html?pk2133 Peakware World Mountain Encyclopedia- Mount Bisoke)The local tourism industry was devastated during the 1990s due to several bloody uprisings and wars in central Africa including the Civil War (19901993), Genocide (1994), First (19961997) and Second (19982003) Congo Wars, and Civil War (19932005).  During this time, military action and refugee relocation wreaked ecological havoc (including deforestation and poaching of species) upon the Volcanoes and Virunga National Parks, as well as the surrounding area.  In recent years, both parks have been somewhat secured, and the tourism industry of the area has been recovering, despite ongoing conflicts.(http://www.dailycamera.com/news/2008/apr/07/from-war-zone-to-vacation-destination/?partneryahoo_headlines DailyCamera.com Article Rwanda: from War Zone to Vacation Destination)Referencesde:Visokefr:Visokeit:Visokecya Bisokehu:Bisokeru:sk:Visokezh:
17249709
Hazardous_waste_in_the_United_States
Under United States environmental policy, a waste is a waste (usually a solid waste) that has the potential to:*cause, or significantly contribute to an increase in mortality or an increase in serious irreversible, or incapacitating reversible illness; or*pose a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment when improperly treated, stored, transported, or disposed of, or otherwise managed.Many types of businesses in the United States generate hazardous waste. Some are small businesses that may be located in a community. For example, dry cleaners, automobile repair shops, hospitals, exterminators, and photo processing centers all generate hazardous waste. Some hazardous waste generators are larger companies like chemical manufacturers, electroplating companies, and oil refineries. In the United States, hazardous wastes generated by commercial or industrial activities may be classified as listed hazardous wastes or characteristic hazardous wastes by the States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).  Under the 1976 Conservation and Recovery Act, a facility that treats, stores or disposes of hazardous waste must obtain a permit for doing so. Generators of and transporters of hazardous waste must meet specific requirements for handling, managing, and tracking waste. Through the RCRA, Congress directed the EPA to create regulations to manage hazardous waste. Under this mandate, the EPA developed strict requirements for all aspects of hazardous waste management including the treatment, storage, and disposal of hazardous waste. In addition to these federal requirements, states may develop more stringent requirements or requirements that are broader in scope than the federal regulations. EPA authorizes states to implement the RCRA hazardous waste program in lieu of the federal program.  For states to receive authorization, they must maintain standards that are equivalent to and at least as stringent as the federal program.  Implementation of the authorized program usually includes activities such as permitting, corrective action, inspections, monitoring and enforcement.Regulatory historyResource Conservation and Recovery Act Modern hazardous waste regulations in the U.S. began with the Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA) which was enacted in 1976. The primary contribution of RCRA was to create a cradle to grave system of record keeping for hazardous wastes.  Hazardous wastes must be tracked from the time they are generated until their final disposition. RCRAs record keeping system helps to track the life cycle of hazardous material and reduces the amount of hazardous waste illegally disposed. Regulators can monitor hazardous waste by following the trail of the waste as is transferred from one entity to another from the time it is generated until it is disposed.Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act The Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA), was enacted in 1980.  The primary contribution of CERCLA was to create a Superfund and provided for the clean-up and remediation of closed and abandoned hazardous waste sites.Characteristic wastesCharacteristic Hazardous Wastes are defined as wastes that exhibit the following characteristics: ignitability, corrosivity, reactivity, or toxicity.Toxicity Characteristic Leaching ProcedureToxicity of a hazardous waste is defined through a laboratory procedure called the characteristic leaching procedure (TCLP). The TCLP helps identify wastes likely to leach concentrations of contaminants into the environment that may be harmful to human health or the environment.Listed wastesListed hazardous wastes are generated by specific industries and processes and are automatically considered hazardous waste based solely on the process that generates them and irrespective of whether a test of the waste shows any of the characteristics of hazardous waste. Examples of listed wastes include:* many sludges leftover from electroplating processes.* certain waste from iron and steel manufacturing* wastes from certain cleaning and/or degreasing processes   Hazardous wastes are incorporated into lists published by the Environmental Protection Agency. These lists are organized into three categories:* The F-list (non-specific source wastes). This list identifies wastes from common manufacturing and industrial processes, such as solvents that have been used in cleaning or degreasing operations. Because the processes producing these wastes can occur in different sectors of industry, the F-listed wastes are known as wastes from non-specific sources.* The K-list (source-specific wastes). This list includes certain wastes from specific industries, such as petroleum refining or pesticide manufacturing. Certain sludges and wastewaters from treatment and production processes in these industries are examples of source-specific wastes.* Discarded Wastes: P-List and U-List wastes are actually sublists of the same major list applying to discarded wastes.  These wastes apply to commercial chemical products that are considered hazardous when discarded and are regulated under the following U.S. Federal Regulation: 40 C.F.R. 261.33(e) and 261.33(f). P-List wastes are wastes that are considered acutely hazardous when discarded and are subject to more stringent regulation.  oxide is an example of a P-list waste and carries the number P076. U-Listed wastes are considered hazardous when discarded and are regulated in a somewhat less stringent manner than P-Listed wastes.Universal wastesUniversal wastes are hazardous wastes that:* generally pose a lower threat relative to other hazardous wastes* are ubiquitous and produced in very large quantities by a large number of generators.Some of the most common universal wastes are: light bulbs, batteries, ray tubes, and mercury-containing devices.Universal wastes are subject to somewhat less stringent regulatory requirements and small quantity generators of universal wastes may be classified as conditionally-exempt small quantity generators (CESQGs) which releases them from some of the regulatory requirements for the handling and storage hazardous wastes. Universal wastes must still be disposed of properly.  (For more information, see Fact Sheet: Conditionally Exempt Small Quantity Generator)Other hazardous wastesThe Environmental Protection Agency has other ways of regulating hazardous waste. These rules include:* The Mixture Rule (40 CFR Section 261.3(a)) applies to a mixture of a listed hazardous waste and a solid waste and states that the result of a mixture of these two wastes is regulated as a hazardous waste. Exemptions may apply in some cases.* The Derived-from Rule (40 CFR Section 261.3(b)) applies to a waste that is generated from the treatment, storage or disposal of a hazardous waste (for example, the ash from the incineration of hazardous waste).  Wastes derived in this manner may be regulated as hazardous wastes.* The Contained-in Rule (40 CFR Section 261.3(f)) applies to soil, groundwater, surface water and debris that are contaminated with a listed hazardous waste.Exempted hazardous wastesEPA regulations automatically exempt certain wastes from being regulated as hazardous wastes.  This does not necessarily mean the wastes are not hazardous nor that they are not regulated. An exempted hazardous waste simply means that the waste is not regulated by the primary hazardous waste regulations. Many of these wastes may by regulated by different statutes and/or regulations and/or by different regulatory agencies. For example, many hazardous mining wastes are regulated via mining statutes and regulations. Exempted hazardous wastes include:* Household hazardous waste (HHW); (see below)* Agricultural wastes which are returned to the ground as fertilizer;* Mining overburden returned to the mine site;* Utility wastes from coal combustion to produce electricity;* Oil and natural gas exploration drilling waste;* Wastes from the extraction of beneficiation, and processing of ores and minerals, including coal;* kiln wastes;* Wood treated with arsenic preservatives.* Certain chromium-containing wastes (See Code of Federal Regulations Section 261.4(b))* Recycled hazardous wastes: Some hazardous wastes that are recycled may also be exempted from hazardous waste regulations.Household Hazardous WasteHousehold Hazardous Waste (HHW) (also referred to as domestic hazardous waste) is waste that is generated from residential households. HHW only applies to wastes that are the result of the use of materials that are labeled for and sold for home use and that are purchased by homeowners or tenants for use in a residential household.The following list includes categories often applied to HHW. It is important to note that many of these categories overlap and that many household wastes can fall into multiple categories:* Paints and solvents* Automotive wastes  (used oil, antifreeze, old gasoline, etc.)* Pesticides (insecticides, herbicides, fungicides, etc.)* Mercury-containing wastes (thermometers, switches, lighting, etc.)* Electronics (computers, televisions, phones)* Aerosols / Propane cylinders* Caustics / Cleaning agents* Refrigerant-containing appliances* Batteries* Ammunition* waste (some home detectors are classified as radioactive waste because they contain very small amounts of a radioactive isotope of americium (see: Disposing of Smoke Detectors).Disposal of HHWBecause of the expense associated with the disposal of HHW, it is still legal for most homeowners in the U.S. to dispose of most types of household hazardous wastes as solid waste (MSW) and these wastes can be put in your trash.  Laws vary by state and municipality and they are changing every day.  Be sure to check with your local environmental regulatory agency, solid waste authority, or health department to find out how HHW is managed in your area. Modern landfills are designed to handle normal amounts of HHW and minimize the environmental impacts. However, there are still going to be some impacts and there are many ways that homeowners can keep these wastes out of landfills.(USEPA Household Hazardous Wastes) Laws regulating HHW in the U.S. are gradually becoming more strict.  As of 2007, radioactive detectors are the only HHW that are managed nationally.  While it is still legal in the United States to dispose of smoke detectors in your trash in most places, manufacturers of smoke detectors must accept returned units for disposal as mandated by the Nuclear Regulatory law 10 CFR 32.27.  If you send your detector back to a manufacturer then it will be disposed in a nuclear waste facility. In the U.S., states are regulating various HHW waste disposal in MSW landfills on a state by state basis.  Some commonly regulated wastes in some (but not all) states include restrictions on the disposal of:  * Recyclables (especially source-separated recyclables or recyclables that have already been separated from waste). In this case this would only apply to household hazardous wastes that have been separated for recycling.* batteries* Mercury-containing wastes* batteries* ray tubes (CRTs) from older computer monitors and televisions* phones and computers* Refrigerant containing appliances such as a refrigerator, conditioner or dehumidifier.(Note: Yard waste or green waste (particularly source-separated yard waste such as from a city leaf collection program) is not hazardous but may be a regulated household waste)Local solid waste authorities and health departments may also have specific bans on wastes that apply to their service area.Solid Waste Haulers and HHW - One catch-22 that residents often encounter is that while it may be legal to dispose of some HHW in their regular trash,  the waste hauler that collects the trash can choose not to haul the waste.  It is not uncommon for a waste hauler to refuse to pick up solid waste that contains things like paint and fluorescent light bulbs.  There is often little recourse for residents in this case.  In these cases the resident may have to make their own arrangements to dispose of the waste by taking it directly to a landfill or solid waste transfer station.Final disposition (disposal) of hazardous wasteHazardous wastes (HWs) are typically dealt with in five different ways:RecyclingMany HWs can be recycled into new products. Examples might include lead-acid batteries or electronic circuit boards where the heavy metals can be recovered and used in new products.NeutralizationSome HW can be processed so that the hazardous component of the waste is eliminated making it a non-hazardous waste. An example of this might include a corrosive acid that is neutralized with a basic substance so that it is no-longer corrosive. (See acid-base reactions.)Incineration, destruction and waste-to-energyA HW may be destroyed for example by incinerating it at a high temperature. Flammable wastes can sometimes be burned as energy sources.  For example many kilns burn HWs like used oils or solvents.Hazardous waste landfill (sequestering, isolation, etc.)A HW may be sequestered in a HW landfill  or permanent disposal facility. In terms of hazardous waste, a landfill is defined as a disposal facility or part of a facility where hazardous waste is placed in or on land and which is not a pile, a land treatment facility, a surface impoundment, an underground injection well, a salt dome formation, a salt bed formation, an underground mine, a cave, or a corrective action management unit (40 CFR 260.10).(Hazardous Waste Landfills)See also* for Toxic Substances and Disease Registry* Convention* waste (radioactive/hazardous)* Hazardous Waste* of Superfund sites in the United States* waste* remediationReferencesExternal links* The Household Chemical Encyclopedia - Over 1000 Potential Sources of Household Hazardous Wastes* Agency for Toxic Substances and Disease Registry* The EPAs hazardous waste page* The U.S. EPAs Hazardous Waste Cleanup Information System* What Did We Know About Hazardous Waste and When Did We Know It, a February 2002 essay by William Sanjour* The hazardous waste professional information source
17260282
Carlin_Unconformity
File:Sedimentary-rock hosted gold deposits in Nevada.gif|thumb|350px|Carlin Trend, shown with other alignments of sediment-hosted gold deposits in Nevada. Source: USGS. The Carlin Unconformity or Carlin Trend is a geologic feature in northeastern Nevada which represents a period of erosion or non-deposition likely associated with a collision between a tectonic crustal block called a terrane and the American Plate.  The collision occurred during the Mississippian Period, about 350 million years B.P.  The collision is associated with the Orogeny.()The collision induced higher crustal temperatures and pressures which produced numerous hot springs along the suture zone.  Several episodes of subsurface magmatism are known to have occurred subsequent to the collision, associated with tectonic forces affecting the entire and Range.  During each of these episodes, and particularly during the Eocene epoch, hot springs brought dissolved minerals toward the surface, precipitating them out along fissures.()  Among these minerals were gold and silver.The Carlin Gold trend is one of the worlds richest gold mining districts. It is a belt of gold deposits, primarily in Paleozoic limy sediments, that is about 5 miles wide and 40 miles long, extending in a north-northwest direction through the town of Nevada. Gold was first discovered in the area in the 1870s, but there was very little production until 1909, and only about 22,000 ounces was produced through 1964. By 2008, mines in the Carlin Trend had produced over 70 million ounces of gold, worth around US$85 billion at 2010 prices.()See also* gold deposit* Livermore* Ralph J. Roberts* mining in NevadaReferences* Basin and Range, by John McPhee, published 1981 by Farrar, Straus and Giroux, New York.* Assembling California, by John McPhee, published 1993 by Farrar, Straus and Giroux, New York.* 
17280459
Petatln
footnotes               Petatln is a city and municipality located along the Pacific Coast of the state of Guerrero in Mexico.  It is part of the Costa Grande region between Zihuatanejo and Acapulco.  The city is known for the Sanctuary of the Padre Jess de Petatln, a 17th century image of Christ that is claimed to have performed religious miracles. The city is the seat of a large municipality, which faces the Pacific Ocean to the south and is bounded by the Madre del Sur to the north. It contains the La Soledad de Maciel archeological site. The areas recent history has been marked by violence related to the drug trade and to struggles between business and local farmers and environmental groups.The cityThe city is located just off Federal Highway 200 east of the tourist attraction of Zihuatanejo. It has a population of about 21,000 people (2005).() The center of the city has a traditional plaza which is surrounded by gardens and a basketball court. Around this plaza area are the Casa de Cultura (cultural center) and the municipal palace. It is known for markets and stores selling gold and gold items. A local dish is tamales with goat meat wrapped in banana leaves.(  )The city is best known as the home of the Sanctuary of the Padre Jess de Petatln. The image is of Christ during one of the times he fell while carrying the Cross. The image dates to the 17th century. This image has been accredited with many miracles, with devotees referring to it as Tata Chuy or Papa Chuy. (Tata means grandfather, and Papa means dad. Chuy is a common diminutive for Jess.)( )( )( The image is housed in a large white church with very large wooden doors, whose official name is Santuario Nacional del Santo Seor de Petatln. Just outside the atrium, vendors selling gold and religious items congregate.( It is a regional pilgrimage site, which is particularly visited during Week, when as many as 30,000 people come into the city.( During this week, the city holds a fair, called Fexpo, but the highlight of the week is a Play in which 60 area residents are chosen to play Jesus and the other principal characters. The Play begins at the sanctuary, and then proceeds along a five-kilometer path, reenacting the of the Cross, on the way to a hill in the Colonia Benito Juarez neighborhood, which simulates Calvary.( )( However, in 2006, there was a grenade attack during the Fexpo in which two people were killed and about 50 wounded; since then, the crowds during Holy Week and the rest of the year have been much smaller.((The municipalityGeography, climate, natureAs municipal seat, the city of Petatln is the local governing authority for over 730 named communities, with a combined territory of 2,071.7 km2 (inegi).( ) About half of the municipalitys population of 44,485 people live in the city proper.(inegi) Outside the seat, the most populous are San Jeronimito, Coyuquilla (norte), Palos Blancos and El Mameyal. The municipality borders the municipalities of de Cataln, de Galeana and Teniente Jos Azueta with the Pacific Ocean on the south side.( The geography of the area consists of rugged mountains, semi-flat areas and flat areas, which are part of the Costa Grande region. Rugged mountains cover about 70% of the surface, mostly in the north and center, formed by the Sierra Madre del Sur and reach a height of 2,500 masl. Semi-flat areas cover about 20% of the surface and are mostly located just north of Highway 200 and are mostly rolling hills. Flat areas cover the rest and are concentrated in the west, southeast and the coastline. Major rivers are the Coyuquilla, Petatln and San Jeronimito, with a number of arroyos such as the Camotal, La Morena, El Comalate and Coyuca. There are small lakes and lagoons such as the Santiago, Estero Valentn, Salina el Cuajo and Tular. The variations in altitude lead to three types of climate: semi-humid, semi-hot and hot. The first is mostly located in the north along the border with Coyuca de Cataln. The second is in the center and the last is along the coast. In all these climates, there is a rainy season, which lasts from June to October. There are also rains in November and December.(Most of the vegetation is low- and medium-altitude rain forest, whose trees often lose their leaves in the late fall. At the highest elevations, there are forests of pine and holm oak. Wildlife include deer, iguanas, rabbits, armadillos, tejon, raccoons, opossums, skunks, wild cats, buzzards, various types of parrots and other birds. The forests contains harvestable species such as sapote, ceiba, white oak, mahogany and red cedar. The municipality has a number of beaches including El Mirador, El Cayatal, Valentn, La Barrita and Juluchuco. El Valentin has a lagoon.(Population and infrastructureAs of 2005, there were 178 people who spoke an indigenous languages, principally Maya or Nahuatl, down from 300 in 2000. From 1995 to 2000, the municipality had a negative population growth of -.55%. The population decreased again from 2000 to 2005 from 47,630 to 46,328. The municipality has 54 preschools, 186 primary schools, 15 middle schools and three high schools. It has one public library. The municipality has over 10,000 homes, almost all of which are single family structures. There are 34 km of paved road and 119,3 km of dirt road.(ArcheologyThe municipality is home to the La Soledad de Maciel archeological site. This site has had pieces recovered from it since the first half of the 20th century, but formal excavation has only occurred in the past decade. The excavated portion is a large ceremonial center with a very large Mesoamerican ball court and a large pyramidal platform. The site may extend much farther than the currently excavated area. Archeological work has found a link between this area and the Teotihuacan civilization. A site museum was opened in 2010.( )( )EconomyTraditionally, Petatlan has been noted for its cattle, production of copra and gold sales.( Agriculture and livestock constitutes about 36% of the economy. Mining, petroleum and industry account for about 14.5%. Commerce and services, mostly through small and medium-size enterprises, constitute about half of the economy. Principle crops include corn, beans and chili peppers. Livestock include, in order of importance, cattle, pigs, goats, sheep, horses and domestic fowl. Industry is limited to a soap factory in San Jeronimito and small establishments which dry coconut kernels (copra). Other crafts include wood items, hats made with palm fronds and hammocks.(The municipality has about 60 km of coastline, two lagoons and three rivers from which a wide variety of fish and other seafood is extracted. There are two main fishing cooperatives called El Cayacal and Coyuquilla. Seafood figures prominently in the local diet, especially crab, fish and preparations of ceviche. Another local specialty is tamales with goat meat wrapped in banana leaves. Iguana meat is used either with chili pepper or in a tomato sauce.(HistoryThe name derives from two Nahuatl words petatl (straw mat) and tlan (next to), meaning next to the straw mat.(By the 11th century, the Petatln area was inhabited by three ethnic groups: the Cuitlatecos, the Chumbias and the Pantecas. First Aztec presence in the Costa Grande region came in 1497. In 1504, Xocoyotzin established the tribute province of Cihuatln, with included the Petatln area.(After the conquest of the Aztec Empire, Petatln was part of an encomienda belonging to Gins de Pinzn. Evangelization was carried out under Augustinian Juan Bautista Moya. This same friar gathered the dispersed peoples to found the modern town in 1550. This town became a dependency of the subdelegation of Zacatuna in 1786.(During the War of Independence, Petatln was made part of the Tecpan province, which was created by Mara Morelos y Pavn in 1811. During the reign of de Iturbide, it became part of the Capitana General del Sur. When Mexico became a republic, it became part of the district of Acapulco, in the of Mexico. When Guerrero was made an independent state, Petatln became part of the district of Galeana.(It became an independent municipality for the first time in 1870, combining territory from the municipality of De la Union and some communities from Tecpan. It was for a short time in 1871 and then reconstituted. In 1913, the town was besieged by the Zapatistas. In 1953, some of its western territory was lost in the formation of the Jos Azueta (Zihuatanejo) municipality.(The citys and municipalitys recent history has centered on violence related to drugs and the environment. Drug-related violence of the past several decades has taken its toll as tourism is down, fewer come to shop in the city and many residents stay indoors for fear of a stray bullet. The violence and threats of violence have left streets empty after 7 pm. Pickups and SUVs with darkened windows are a common sight. These vehicles are associated with the many shootings and even grenade attacks that have taken place in and around the city in recent years.( The violence is not limited to the city of Petatln; it also occurs in its small rural communities such as La Morena, El Camalote and Las Humedades. A number of these have been partly or fully abandoned as drug-related violence grows. The violence is among local drug lords over turf.( )Other disputes are centered more in the rural areas over protected wildlife and natural resource rights. In 2004, there were problems with the illegal hunting of sea turtles and the collection of their eggs on beaches such as Playa San Valentin.(  ) In 2010, residents of Juluchuca and other nearby communities staged a sit-in near an arroyo where their rights to extract water were revoked to allow for drilling for petroleum.(  )The most serious conflict has been between the campesinos (peasant farmers) and local caciques (bosses) over logging and drug crop growing/transport in the mountain areas of the municipality and other parts of the Costa Grande of Guerrero. In the 1990s, the logging company Boise Cascade Corp. made efforts to establish itself in this part of Guerrero state, making arrangements with national and local leaders to log forests located on ejido land in the area.( ) The logging quickly began to exceed legal limits and began seriously damaging the ecology of the area, such as causing rivers and streams like the Coyuquilla River to dry up.( ) Local farmers depend on these resources and, in the late 1990s, banded together to form the Campesino Environmentalist Organization of Petatlan and Coyuca de Catalan (OCEP).( ) The group is best known for blocking logging roads, which had an effect on the industry. In 1998, two of the movements leaders, Rodolfo Montiel and Teodoro Cabrerea, confessed to charges. With the support of International, Greenpeace and others, the two were released in 2001.((  )( Since then, there has been continued sporadic violence, including killings, leading to human rights condemnations.( Another activist, Felipe Arriaga Sanchez, was detained on charges of murder and criminal association in 2004. Amnesty International believes that it is politically motivated.( The OCEP continues to exist and fight deforestation mostly through legal channels, although some are still accused by authorities of drug trafficking and membership in a guerrilla group. The group states the charges come from local caciques when the group pushes for new legal actions. The group has had more success in the Petatlan Valley than in Coyuquilla Valley, but in both areas there continues to be large-scale illegal cutting, with cleared areas then being used for pasture or to grow drugs. The environment destruction forces many local farmers to become part of the drug production to survive.( )References
17311946
Astrid_Cleve
Astrid M. Cleve von Euler (22 January 1875 - 8 April 1968) was a Swedish botanist, geologist, chemist and researcher at University. She was the first female in Sweden to obtain a degree of science.LifeAstrid Cleve was born into academic life. She was daughter of the chemist and professor Teodor Cleve and Alma hbom. She received her education at home and entered University in 1891 to study history. She obtained her degree on 27 May 1898 at University on a thesis entitled Studies on the time of germination and the juvenile stage of some Swedish plants. She was the third Swedish woman to do so, and the first in a scientific discipline. From 1898 to 1904, she was employed at the Chemical Institution at Stockholms hgskola (later University), which at that time was a private institution that could hire women, in contrast to the state universities in Uppsala and Lund. There she met the German- Swedish biochemist and later laureate von Euler-Chelpin. They married in 1902 and she took the name Astrid Cleve von Euler. She worked as her husbands assistant (they published together on chemistry) and raised five children, one of them being the later physiologist and laureate von Euler. The marriage was broken in 1912. From 1911 to 1917, Astrid Cleve acted as a teacher in Stockholm and from 1917-1923 she was head of a mining laboratory. She then moved to the countryside, managed a farm and educated private students. In the 1930s, she returned to University and the Institution of Quaternary Geology. In 1955 she was appointed a titular professor by the Swedish government.As a scientist, she worked on diverse topics of biology, geology and chemistry. She became a world-leading expert on diatoms and published her magnum opus on them - Die Diatomeen von Schweden und Finnland in five volumes. This monumental work contains information on systematics and ecology of diatoms of brackish and freshwater, both extant and fossil. Another important research topic was post-glacial sea level changes and land uplift. Her  now refuted  theory was strongly criticized by contemporary geologists, e.g. von Post. Her publications of empirical investigations were gradually met with obstacles in standard vehicles of scholarly communication, so she let many papers print at her own risk.References*Florin, Maj-Britt (1968) Astrid Cleve von Euler. 22 January - 8 April 1968. Svensk Botanisk Tidskrift 62(4): 549-564.*Espmark, Kristina (2005) Vetenskapskvinna utanfr ramarna: Astrid Cleve von Euler och viljan att forska. Stella Arbetsrapporter (Uppsala) ISSN 1650-2272 vol. 28. 87 pp.Selected scientific works* On recent freshwater diatoms from Lule Lappmark in Sweden (1895)* Studier fver ngra svenska vxters groningstid och frstrkningsstadium (1898) Dissertation* Bidrag till knnedomen om ytterbium (1901)* Cyclotella bodanica i Anclussjn: Skattmansprofilen nnu en gng (1911) * Frsk till analys av Nordens senkvartra nivfrndringar (1923), Freningens i Stockholm Frhandlingar* The diatoms of Finnish Lapland (1934)* Sundets plankton: sammansttning och frdelning (1937)* Bacillariaceen-assoziationen im nrdlichsten Finnland (1939)* Natur und Alter der Strandflchen Finnlands: Eine sptquartre Rekonstruktion (1943)* Die diatomeen von Schweden und Finnland I-V (1951-1955)* Was war der Svea lv? (1957)External links*Biography at the Swedish Natural History Museum*Biography and portrait at Gothenburg University LibraryCleveCleveCleve
17328047
Energy_Resources_Conservation_Board
The Energy Resources Conservation Board (ERCB) is an independent, quasi-judicial agency of the of Alberta. It regulates the safe, responsible, and efficient development of Albertas energy resources: oil, gas, oil sands, coal, and pipelines. Led by eight Board members, the ERCBs team of engineers, geologists, technicians, economists, and other professionals serve Albertans from thirteen locations across the province.The ERCBs mission is to ensure that the discovery, development, and delivery of Albertas energy resources take place in a manner that is fair, responsible and in the public interest.The ERCB adjudicates and regulates matters related to energy within Alberta to ensure that the development, transportation and monitoring of the provinces energy resources are in the public interest. The Board provides this assurance of the interest through its activities in the application and hearing process, regulation, monitoring, and surveillance and enforcement.The information and knowledge responsibility of the Board includes the collection, storage, analysis, appraisal, dissemination and stakeholder awareness of information. Open access to information develops awareness, understanding and responsible behavior and allows the Board and stakeholders to make informed decisions about energy and utility matters. This responsibility will result in the Board discharging its advisory role with respect to matters under the jurisdiction of the Board.The of Alberta owns about 80 per cent of the provinces rights, such as oil, gas, coal, and the sands. In other words, most resources are owned by the people of Alberta through their government. While private companies can develop these resources, the ERCB is authorized by the government to protect the publics interest relating to the discovery, development, and delivery of these resources. Regulation is needed so that resources are produced in a safe, responsible, and efficient manner, without waste.The ERCB also ensures that everyone affected by development has a chance to be heard. When conflicts regarding development remain unresolved between companies and landowners, the ERCB works to settle the issues in a fair and balanced manner.In 1996, the Geological Survey (AGS) joined the ERCB. AGS assists the ERCB by providing data, information, knowledge and advice about the geology of Alberta.HistoryAlbertas first energy regulatory body was created in 1938. A succession of agencies led to the new ERCB being established January 1 2008, as a result of the realignment of the Alberta Energy and Utilities Board (EUB) into the ERCB and the Alberta Utilities Commission. The ERCB also includes the Alberta Geological Survey.In October 2008, ERCB was named one of Top Employers by Mediacorp Canada Inc., which was announced by the Herald() and the Journal.()()ScopeThe ERCB regulates the safe, responsible, and efficient development of oil, natural gas, oil sands, and coal, and as well as the pipelines to move the resources to market.Regulation is done through two core functions: adjudication and regulation, and information and knowledge. ERCB approval must be given at almost every step of an energy projects life.GovernanceTo maintain its autonomous structure, the ERCB answers directly to the Executive Council (Cabinet) of Alberta through the Minister of Energy, but it makes its formal decisions independently in accordance with the six statutes it administers.Organization structureThe ERCB is led by a Board of eight people: a Chairman and Board Members. Supporting the Chairman and Board Members are the Executive Committee, and approximately 900 staff who work in eight main branches:  ;ApplicationsThis branch, made up of three groups, provides a streamlined approach to processing some 40 000 energy development applications each year. The Facilities Group handles project reviews, audits, and approvals related to new or modified oil and gas facilities, such as wells, pipelines, batteries, and gas plants. The Resource Group deals with applications and issues related to development and conservation projects for oil, gas, and coal. The Business Operations and Development Group manages the coordination of administrative support, approvals development, planning, objections, and hearings.   ;Field Surveillance and Operations This branch provides technical and operational expertise in the development, application, and enforcement of regulatory requirements for conventional and nonconventional resources. The branch ensures that oil and gas operations are conducted in a safe and responsible manner through incident response, resource conservation, protection of the environment, and industry liability management. Operating from Field Centres across Alberta, field staff inspect construction, operation, and abandonment operations at oil, gas, and oil sands facilities and respond to emergencies and public concerns on a 24-hour basis.  ;Corporate SupportThis branch incorporates several groups. Human Resources provides services and programs to ensure that a competent and committed workforce is in place to achieve ERCB goals and objectives. The Communications Group develops strategic communication, consultation strategies and delivers related media, Web site, and document services to keep staff and stakeholders informed about ERCB activities. Administrative Services provides building, library, and printing services.  ;Finance This branch provides revenue and expenditure management and administration of the industry funding levy. In addition, staff coordinate the preparation of the ERCBs three-year business plan and performance reporting.    ;Information and Systems Services This branch is responsible for ERCB information systems, support, and technological infrastructure, with a focus on new ways to deliver electronic commerce. Another core area is the collection and dissemination of energy resource information, including oil and gas production. This information is also used to determine provincial royalties, well records, regulatory publications, maps, and various energy databases.      ;Law This branch provides a wide range of legal advice and services to the organization, with a focus on procedural fairness and objectivity. Its responsibilities include application and regulatory policy, hearings, proceedings, related internal and external consultations, and the formulation of energy regulations and legislation. The branch administers intervener funding and leads a key advisory committee that advises the Board on decisions and policy matters.    ;Geology, Environmental Science, and Economics This branch maintains an integrated and current inventory of Albertas subsurface energy, mineral, and other resources in a geological framework. It provides knowledge, advice, and forecasts about the states of earth-energy resource development in the context of Albertas environment, economy, and society. The branch also develops and supports regulatory processes and best practices to conserve earth-energy resources, maintains environmental quality, assures public safety, and guides informed risk taking in regulatory and policy decisions. ;Oil Sands The Oil Sands Branch has overall responsibility for how the ERCB regulates oil sands activities in Alberta. The branch comprises the Mineable Oil Sands Group, which looks after oil sands developments that use mining recovery technology as well as bitumen upgrading, and the In Situ Oil Sands Group, which focuses on developments using recovery technology involving subsurface or in situ recovery methods. Collaborating with other ERCB branches, the Oil Sands Branch takes the lead on processing applications, conducting surveillance and enforcement of approved projects, and carrying out geological assessments as they apply to the oil sands. Energy ApplicationsAn application is a request by a company for ERCB approvalin the form of a licence, order, permit, or approvalfor an energy project. Most energy-related projects require ERCB approval. Each year tens of thousands of applications are reviewed and approved by the ERCB.The ERCB also plays a vital environmental protection role by reviewing flaring permits, oilfield waste disposal facilities, drilling waste practices, and emergency response plans. ERCB approval for a facility or project is considered to be routine if an application is complete, there are no landowner objections, and the company applying has met all technical, safety, public consultation, and environmental requirements. The turnaround time for a complete and well-prepared routine application can be as short as one day.Some projects require input from other government departments. The ERCB passes such applications to Alberta Environment, which handles distribution to other departments. This one-window approach means that applicants do not have to go to each government department for individual review and approval. The general rule is that each government department checks that a specific proposal meets its own regulations and standards and then forwards any deficiencies or concerns to the ERCB via Alberta Environment.Nonroutine applications take more timeweeks, or even monthsto process if there are landowner objections, community and environmental concerns, or objections from competing companies. Objections to applications may also be resolved through facilitation, mediation, or negotiated settlements approved by the Board. However, any unresolved matter or objection related to an application may proceed to an ERCB hearing.ERCB HearingsAn ERCB hearing is a formal process that provides an important opportunity for different points of view about an energy project to be aired in a fair and orderly forum. A hearing allows for an open, public testing of technical, environmental, social, and economic evidence from those involved. The process ensures that all relevant arguments for and against the energy facility project are heard. ERCB hearings are held when the ERCB receives an objection from a person who may be directly and adversely affected by a proposed project. Applications filed may create community concern or a need for more information; however, these matters are often settled through an Appropriate Dispute Resolution (ADR) process. When matters are settled through ADR or there are no public concerns and objections, there is no need for a hearing. The Board will also dismiss objections if the person does not appear to be directly or adversely affected.The ERCB mails a Notice of Hearing to inform people and organizations affected by an application about the hearing. The Notice of Hearing may be published in daily and/or weekly newspapers.Hearing notices are available on the ERCB Web site. Companies involved in large projects usually hold an open house to explain their proposed project, answer citizens questions, and address the communitys concerns.The Notice of Hearing provides interested parties with the following information:*date, time, and location of the hearing, *application number and nature of the application, *a contact for the company that filed the application, *ERCB information, *the due date for filing objections or interventions, and *a statement that all material relating to the proceeding is subject to Albertas Freedom of Information and Protection of Privacy legislation.An ERCB hearing follows a formal process to ensure that everyone has a say:*Opening Remarks: The panel chair explains the purpose of the hearing and introduces the members of the panel and all ERCB staff in the room. Then participants in the hearing register an appearance, coming forward and introducing themselves. *Preliminary Matters: Procedural and legal matters are presented, such as adjournment requests or the scheduling of a specific witness at a particular time. *Applicant (Application): The applicant presents its case and may question its own witnesses. Then interveners, ERCB staff, and the Board panel may cross-examine those witnesses. Once cross-examinations are complete, the applicant may question the witnesses again to clarify any issues that arose.*Interveners: Interveners next present their cases in the same order they registered. After the intervener gives direct evidence, the lawyer for the applicant may cross-examine, followed by the other interveners who wish to cross-examine. ERCB staff and panel members may then cross-examine the intervener. Following cross-examination, the intervener is entitled to clarify any matters that arose. *Rebuttal Evidence by Applicant: Once the above process is complete with all the interveners and their witnesses, the applicant may submit additional evidence to address new points raised by interveners evidence. *Final Argument or Summation: Each participant may provide an explanation of what he or she believes are the important aspects of the issues involved and what decisions they feel the panel should make. The applicant may respond to interveners arguments. *Closing of Hearing: The panel chair announces the hearing is completed and that the decision of the panel and the reasons for it will be given at a later date.External links*Energy Resources Conservation Board*Alberta Geological Survey WebsiteReferences
17360179
Charter_International
 footnotes Charter International plc () is a large British engineering business based in London. It is a constituent of the 250.HistoryThe business was founded as The British South Africa Company in 1889 by Charter.(Charter International: History)In 1965 The British South Africa Company merged with The Central Mining & Investment Corporation and The Consolidated Mines Selection Company to form Charter Consolidated.(In the 1980s the company disposed of its overseas mining concerns to concentrate on its British engineering interests.(In 1993 the companys name changed to Charter plc.(In 1994 it acquired ESAB(No deals please: we are Swedish) and in 1997 it acquired Howden.(Guide to interim management)In 2008 the business was restructured with the creation of a new Irish resident holding company known as Charter International plc.(New Jersey incorporated Irish tax resident London listed holding company)OperationsThe company has two main businesses:* ESAB: welding, cutting and automation* Howden: air and gas handlingReferencesExternal links* Official site
17378080
Drummond
Drummond may refer to:Places in Canada:* (electoral district), a Qubec federal riding* (provincial electoral district), a provincial electoral district in Quebec* Regional County Municipality, Quebec, a regional county municipality in Qubec* New Brunswick, a village in New BrunswickPlaces in New Zealand:* New ZealandPlaces in the United States:* Idaho* Maryland* Michigan* Township, Michigan* Montana* Oklahoma* Wisconsin, a town* (community), Wisconsin, an unincorporated community* Island, MichiganIn industry:* Company, a coal mining company with operations in Alabama and ColombiaPeople with the surname Drummond:* (surname)* DrummondSee also* (disambiguation)de:Drummondes:Drummond(homonymie)it:Drummondnl:Drummondpl:Drummondpt:Drummondru:vo:Drummond
17397612
Fandriana
footnotes        Fandriana is a town and commune in Madagascar. It belongs to the district of Fandriana, which is a part of Mania Region. The population of the commune was estimated to be approximately 29,000 in 2001 commune census.(In addition to primary schooling the town offers secondary education at both junior and senior levels. The town provides access to hospital services to its citizens. It is also a site of industrial-scale  mining.(Farming and raising livestock provides employment for 45% and 35% of the working population. The most important crop is rice, while other important products are cassava and potatos. Industry and services provide employment for 5% and 15% of the population, respectively.() References and notes fr:Fandrianamg:Fandrianapl:Fandriana
17420819
Sales_intelligence
Sales intelligence (SI) refers to technologies, applications and practices for the collection, integration, analysis, and presentation of information to help salespeople keep up to date with clients, prospect data and drive business. In addition to providing metrics for win-loss and sales confidence (Metrics for sales intelligence), SI can present contextually relevant customer and product information.The 2008 survey of 300 companies by the Aberdeen Group (Sales Intelligence, Aberdeen Group study (2008)) show that the recent economic downturn has lengthened traditional sales cycles. As businesses have been forced to reduce spending, sales representatives have been challenged to meet quotas. Top performing companies have implemented sales intelligence programs to improve the quality and quantity of sales leads. SI contextualizes opportunities by providing relevant industry, corporate and personal information. Frequently SIs fact-based information is integrated or includes Customer Relationship Management (CRM).Although some aspects of sales intelligence overlaps business intelligence (BI), SI is specifically designed for the use of salespeople and sales managers. Unlike relationship management (CRM) and traditional intelligence (BI) applications, SI provides real-time analysis of current sales data and assists with suggesting and delivering actionable, relevant information.Sales intelligence solutions are predominantly designed for companies in the manufacturing, distribution and wholesale sectors. These are highly competitive markets, where volumes are high, margins are low. (SI) solutions provide unique insight into customer buying patterns. By automatically analysing and evaluating these patterns, Sales Intelligence pro-actively identifies and delivers up-sell, cross-sell and switch-sell opportunities.Recent trendsThe sales Intelligence market is currently experiencing two major changes that raise radical moves in the sector : the distribution model and the data sources.Sales intelligence providers have historically been industry-centric with custom designed solutions to centralize and consolidate various customer data across the enterprises. Solutions were either delivered as tailor-made system or as isolated applications. With the emergence of SaaS (software as a service) in the cloud CRM solutions, sales intelligence providers are forced to migrate their solutions in the cloud, with deep interconnections with CRM solutions. Standalone client/server applications are less considered and struggle to maintain their market shares with vertical solutions.The second change is related to data sources : social networks and social media data have proven to be more effective than traditional sources to offer 360 comprehension of customers. With the openness of Facebook, Google or Linkedin databases (through their open APIs), the new providers offer constantly updates profile information and contact relationships. A new form of sales intelligence has emerged, encompassing social leads, sales influencers, partnership tactics, etc.ReferencesSee also* Analytics* learning* intelligence tools* (management information systems)* intelligence* Intelligence* Loop* analytics* Intelligence 2.0* mining* business planningintelligencede:Business-IntelligenceempresarialdcisionnelleinteligencijabisnisintelligenceanalitikaintelligenceintelligenceintelligenceIntelligenceintelligenceintelligence
17441411
Bralorne,_British_Columbia
Bralorne is an historic underground mining community in the Bridge River District, some sixty dirt road miles west of the town of Lillooet.BackgroundGold has been the central element in the areas history going back to the 1858-1860 River Gold Rush.  Miners rushed to the Cayoosh and River areas looking for placer deposits,  One named Cadwallader looked for the outcroppings on the creek that is now named for him and turned out later to be the site of the richest hard-rock veins in the region.  Early exploratory parties of Chinese and Italians in the upper Bridge River basin were driven out by Hunter Jack, who himself had a secret placer mine somewhere in the region, believed to be in upper Creek. and whose big-game hunting territory this also was.  During the 1870s Hunter Jack began to invite chosen prospectors into the valley, and ran a ferry across the Bridge River that virtually all entering the region had to cross.  Among these were those who would eventually discover the hard rock lodes on Cadwallader Creek.  Though styles the Bridge River Gold Rush, in this early period there were so few who had made it into the district that there were only forty residents during the 1890 Census, prompting the naming of one of the claims Forty Thieves.In the 1890s intrepid prospectors searched for the underground source of that gold in the mountains.  William Allen prospected the area in 1897, and his claim took the name from his hotel--the Pioneer-- in Lillooet.  A small mill was imported from California, and later Welshman John Williams, who had worked the California goldfields, built an arrastra or Mexican rock mill, which became a symbol of the Bridge River mines and remained in service into the heavy-production years of the mines.Again in 1897, three men hiked in from Lillooet to Cadwallader Creek looking for gold. They made three claims--the Lorne, Marquis, and the Golden King.  These would form the core of the complex of claims which became the  Mine.  Arthur Noel bought the claims and worked them sporadically, holding on in bad times, waiting for the good.. He installed a 12 stamp mill. Unfortunately, the mine became tied up in litigation and stood idle for a dozen years.. By 1914 Pioneer Gold Mines was set up with more industrial equipment, boilers and modern rock mill.  The site worked through the 1920s and the profitable King vein exploited. But it was the collapse of world markets and the solid price of gold in the Depression, when the mines really took off; when men and investment ramped up production.  The district was one of the few bright lights in the BC economy during the Depression - in a seven-year period in the 1930s, the mines of the Bridge River produced $370,000,000 in gold. Taylor installed a 100 ton a day capacity mill but under the direction of M. OBrian, output increased fivefold.(BC Dept of Highways viewpoint sign, Bralorne-Gold Bridge Road, often quoted in all sources.)The golden yearsAs said, Bralorne came into its own in the Depression years. In 1931 Austin C. Taylor and associates acquired Bralorne property and financed construction of a 100 ton mill. The Bralorne Mine operated from March 1932 until 1971.  In that time 3 million ounces of gold were refined from its adits. From this wealth, came a complete town, with schools, churches, post office, houses, recreation halls and hunting lodges.   The mines themselves needed support buildings of power houses, boiler houses, blacksmith shops, machine shops, concentrator buildings and so on.  Over one hundred miles of underground tunnels were dug in the forty or so years of operation. As Bralorne sits on a volcanic fault, the shafts were quite warm inside: 40 degrees C was not unknown.  On the topic of environment, the plant used cyanide to separate the gold from the quartz  (see cyanidation);  when the site was abandoned the drums of chemical sat open and leaching into the rivers, though  they have since been cleaned up.The Bridge River provided a sanctuary from the economic woes of the world.  As all around North America plants were idled and people starved, Bralorne provided a ray of hope. Hundreds of men were on the payroll for the mines. Huge bunkhouses were built to shelter the men. A huge community ensued--banks, churches, ball teams, and bakeries followed.  In fact, the Bralorne mines propped up an otherwise failing region.  Without the business from the mines, the Great Eastern railway, truckers, cariboo ranchers, and town of Lillooet probably would have failed.  Parts for all  heavy equipment for the mines were brought into the district  via the tortuous Mission Mountain Road and its continuation the Bridge River Road, after being barged down Seton Lake to Shalalth from the Lillooet end of the lake, when not shippable by railway.Other nearby minesAs the Bridge River is a geologic complex with gold mining at Cayuse Creek, other mines sprouted at Brexton and City These mines were not as large as Bralorne, employing men in the order of dozens, and not hundreds, but still contributed to the area.Bralorne todayFor many years Bralorne sat abandoned and forgotten.  Its empty buildings bare and open to all who want to strip or damage them. Lately, interest has been renewed in the area,and people are returning using some of the old buildings as recreation properties. An extensive museum of the area is in Bralorne. Some other buildings have fallen down, have been burned, or stripped of lumber and fittings.The rusting and derelict ball and concentrator mill, has been cleaned up under the Mine Reclamation Act.Since 2002 rising gold prices have led to new exploration in the area and plans for re-opening the Bralorne Mine, and nearby Pioneer Mine.(.)See also*Dome Mountain*British ColumbiaReferencesExternal links*Their Past Lives Here, Virtualmuseum.ca photo exhibit*Bralorne Gold Mines Ltd.
17460357
Co-occurrence_networks
Co-occurrence networks are generally used to provide a graphic visualization of potential relationships between people, organizations, concepts or other entities represented within written material. The generation and visualization of co-occurrence networks has become practical with the advent of electronically stored text amenable to mining.By way of definition, co-occurrence networks are the collective interconnection of terms based on their paired presence within a specified unit of text. Networks are generated by connecting pairs of terms using a set of criteria defining co-occurrence. For example, terms A and B may be said to co-occur if they both appear in a particular article. Another article may contain terms B and C. Linking A to B and B to C creates a co-occurrence network of these three terms. Rules to define co-occurrence within a corpus can be set according to desired criteria. For example, a more stringent criteria for co-occurrence may require a pair of terms to appear in the same sentence.Co-occurrence networks can be created for any given list of terms (any dictionary) in relation to any collection of texts (any text corpus). Co-occurring pairs of terms can be called neighbors and these often group into neighborhoods based on their interconnections. Individual terms may have several neighbors. Neighborhoods may connect to one another through at least one individual term or may remain unconnected.Individual terms are, within the context of text mining, symbolically represented as strings. In the real world, the entity identified by a term normally has several symbolic representations. It is therefore useful to consider terms as being represented by one primary symbol and up to several synonymous alternative symbols. Occurrence of an individual term is established by searching for each known symbolic representations of the term. The process can be augmented through NLP (language processing) algorithms that interrogate segments of text for possible alternatives such as word order, spacing and hyphenation. NLP can also be used to identify sentence structure and categorize text strings according to grammar (for example, categorizing a string of text as a noun based on a preceding string of text known to be an article). Graphic representation of co-occurrence networks allow them to be visualized and inferences drawn regarding relationships between entities in the domain represented by the dictionary of terms applied to the text corpus. Meaningful visualization normally requires simplifications of the network. For example, networks may be drawn such that the number of neighbors connecting to each term is limited. The criteria for limiting neighbors might be based on the absolute number of co-occurrences or more subtle criteria such as probability of co-occurrence or the presence of an intervening descriptive term.Quantitative aspects of the underlying structure of a co-occurrence network might also be informative, such as the overall number of connections between entities, clustering of entities representing sub-domains, detecting synonyms(Cohen AM, Hersh WR, Dubay C, Spackman, K: Using co-occurrence network structure to extract synonymous gene and protein names from MEDLINE abstracts BMC Bioinformatics 2005, 6:103), etc. Some working applications of the co-occurrence approach are available to the public through the internet. PubGene is an example of an application that addresses the interests of biomedical community by presenting networks based on the co-occurrence of genetics related terms as these appear in MEDLINE records(Jenssen TK, Laegreid A, Komorowski J, Hovig E: A literature network of human genes for high-throughput analysis of gene expression.  Nature Genetics, 2001 May; 28(1):21-8. PMID 11326270)(Grivell L: Mining the bibliome: searching for a needle in a haystack? New computing tools are needed to effectively scan the growing amount of scientific literature for useful information. EMBO reports 2001 Mar;3(3):200-3:  PMID 11882534). The web site Name Base is an example of how human relationships can be inferred by examining networks constructed from the co-occurrence of personal names in newspapers and other texts (as in Ozgur et al.(Ozgur A, Cetin B, Bingol H: Co-occurrence Network of Reuters News (15 Dec 2007) http://arxiv.org/abs/0712.2491)). Networks of information are also used to facilitate efforts to organize and focus publicly available information for law enforcement and intelligence purposes (so called source intelligence or OSINT). Related techniques include co-citation networks as well as the analysis of hyperlink and content structure on the internet (such as in the analysis of web sites connected to terrorism(Zhou Y, Reid E, Qin J, Chen H, Lai G: US Domestic Extremist Groups on the Web: Link and Content Analysis http://doi.ieeecomputersociety.org/10.1109/MIS.2005.96)).See also Takada et al.(Takada H, Saito K, Yamada T, Kimura M: Analysis of Growing Co-occurrence Networks SIG-KBS (Journal Code:X0831A) 2006, VOL.73rd;NO.;PAGE.117-122 Language;Japanese) and Liu(Liu, Chua T-S; Building semantic perceptron net for topic spotting. Proceedings of the 39th Annual Meeting on Association for Computational Linguistics, 2001; 378 - 385) References de:Textminingde textosde texteshu:Szvegbnyszatminingja:miningde textominingth:zh:de:Kookkurrenz
17480621
Golden_God
Golden God is a novel by Jeanne DuPrau published in 1981. In the novel, a group of American archaeologists flee Kalim when hostile rebel forces overthrow the government. When main character Chris (one of the archeologists) finds himself deep into a tunnel while mining, he claims he found something valuable. Though this valuable item could be worth up to 800,000 dollars should he turn it in or keep it a secret from the rest of the aceologists he was exploring with? 
17506786
Sulitjelma
Sulitjelma (, ) is a village in Fauske municipality in Nordland, Norway. The village has 481 residents (2007).() Sulitjelma is situated in a lush inland valley only 140 meters amsl along the shore of the Langvatnet lake. There are many old mines in the area. Sultitjelma are virtually sourrounded by mountains and glaciers. Sulitjelma is the southern endpoint - or entrance - for Nordkalottruta hiking trail. There is road connection to fauske town, which is 44 km to the west. Winters in Sulitjelma have reliable snow cover and is on average 2C colder than in Fauske town, while summers are the same. HistoryImage:1. may 1908 in Sulitjelma.jpg|thumb|day, 1 May, being celebrated in 1908 at SulitjelmaThe village has origins as a Smi settlement, with archaeological findings dating more than a thousand years back, with evidence of summer breeding of reindeer at the end of the 16th century(http://www.sulisavisa.no/). In 1858 copper and sulfur was found in the area, and a limited excavations were performed. In 1887 the Swedish industrialist Persson bought the rights to the findings, was the mining started. Sulitelma Aktiebolag was founded in 1891, and by the early 20th century it was the largest mining company in the country, and the second largest industrial company(http://wn.com/Sulitelma). At the peak in 1913 the company had 1,750 employees. In 1983 the mining rights were inherited by the state, who operated the mines until 1991. The construction of the line started in May 1891 when the mining company in Sulitjelma decided to build a railway between Sjnst and Fossen. The line was the first in Northern Norway.The expansion into the mountains to the mine at Fagerli began in 1912, and at the same time the gauge was increased from 750 mm to 1067 mm. The line closed on 22 July 1972 and was rebuilt, as a road, Route 830. This work was completed in 1975 External links * University of Troms: Architecture in Sulitjelma In English, with picturesReferencesda:Sulitelmade:Sulitjelmaes:Sulitjelmafr:Sulitjelmanl:Sulitjelmano:Sulitjelmann:Sulitjelmapt:Sulitelmasv:Sulitelma
17525884
Petroleum_Corporation_of_Jamaica
For the Dutch shortwave radio station see PCJJPetroleum Corporation of Jamaica is a company owned by the government of Jamaica. It was established in 1975 as State Energy Corporation under the Ministry of Mining and Energy and changed its name in 1979 by the Petroleum Act. The PCJ has the exclusive right to explore for oil in Jamaica. External links * Official website* Petroleum Corporation of Jamaica (PCJ) launches solar mascot
17548344
Willow_River_(British_Columbia)
The Willow River is a tributary of the River in the north-central Interior of British Columbia, Canada.  It enters the Fraser at the community of Willow River, just upstream from the city of Prince George, near the confluence of the River.  Its origin is in the goldfields at of Clubs Lake in the mining and arts community of British Columbia, near Barkerville.
17563339
tienne-Thodore_Pquet
 religion            Roman Catholictienne-Thodore Pquet (; January 8, 1850May 26, 1916) was a French-Canadian civil law notary, and provincial politician and civil servant. In 1879, he was one of four Liberal Members of the Legislative Assembly who crossed the floor in the middle of a parliamentary crisis, causing the Joly de Lotbinire government to fall.BiographyPquet was born a single child in 1850 in Saint-Nicolas, near Lvis, in what was then Lotbinire County, on the southern shore of the Lawrence River opposite City. The Pquet family was an influential one, with churchmen Benjamin and Louis-Honor, and theologian Pquet all important figures of the time. tienne-Thodores parents, tienne-Thodore Sr. and Nathalie Moffat, were farmers and merchants.( )( )  tienne-Thodore Sr. was mayor of Saint-Nicolas between 1867 and 1873.( )Pquet studied at the Sminaire de Qubec, then at University (then St. Johns College), before returning to Quebec to complete a of Civil Law degree at Laval, graduating in 1872 and beginning work as a law notary while taking care of the farm.(( ) In the 1875 provincial election, he ran as a liberal against Blanchet in the riding of Lvis. Blanchet, a family friend, was nearly twice Pquets age, and did not refrain from pointing it out during the campaign,( but ultimately lost to the younger man by a wide margin. Pquet hence became one of only four (at the time) MLAs aged less than 26 at the time of their election.( )(The only younger ones at the time were Saveuse de Beaujeu (elected 1871 at 24), Prfontaine (elected at the same time and aged 24 and ten months), and Chauveau (elected 1872 in a by-election and only a few months younger than Pquet).)Pquet was re-elected in the 1878 election, which had created a minority liberal government that was in precarious position for its whole length. On October 29, 1879, a series of political crises lead Liberal MLA James Flynn to propose an amendment demanding a coalition government. Pquet and three other Liberals (Chauveau, Napolon Fortin and Racicot) crossed the floor alongside Flynn to join the conservatives, causing the government to fall. of Quebec Robitaille, however, declined to dissolve the legislature, instead prompting opposition leader Chapleau to form a new government, in which Pquet was Secretary until July 1882. He was re-elected to his seat in November of that year, having resigned it upon his nomination to the legislative council.(( ) He married the daughter of prominent businessman LaRue in the cathedral of Trois-Rivires in 1880.( He was deeply involved in the establishment of the Crdit Foncier Franco-Canadien, a major union; in May of the next year both him and Saxton Campbell Wrtele were accused by Ross of having been offered money in the deal. Although Wrtele had refused the sum, Pquet argued it was solely for work as director in the new company, an explanation that was satisfying to the public opinion. The assembly eventually voted a motion by Ross to form a committee to investigate the issue. This committees findings, if any, are unknown.(( )() Due to infighting in the party, the investiture in Lvis for the 1881 elections was difficult to obtain, with disgruntled party members pitching him against Belleau, but Pquet eventually gained the nomination and the election.( As a government member, one of his goal had long been the construction of a bridge over the River between Saint-Nicolas and Saint-Romuald, an issue he defended in the legislature until 1879, after his nomination to the government, when a yearly sum was finally voted, although the bridge was not built before Mercier came into power.(Pquet left provincial politics in 1883 following a severe injury suffered while inspecting forest cuts with federal MP Bolduc, and was subsequently named  sheriff of Quebec County, an occupation he kept until 1890. He dabbled into various commercial ventures: aforementioned wood commerce, the Lvis and Kennebec Railway (auctioned off in 1881 to the Central Railway) and the Quebec Mining Co. amongst others. He ran as a conservative for Lvis and was defeated in the 1891 federal election. From 1894 to his death on 23 May 1916, he was the Quebec City postmaster. He is buried in the Saint-Nicolas parish cemetery.(The Pquet family home, in Saint-Nicolas, is a provincially designated historic monument, and the entire estate area is a municipal-designated historic district, the Heritage Site.( ) In his late years, Pquet wrote a historical publication on the parish of Saint-Nicolas.( His single son, also called tienne-Thodore, married the daughter of Tach.(See also*of Canadian politicians who have crossed the floorContent notesReferences
17579733
United_states_v_clintwood
#REDIRECT States v. Clintwood Elkhorn Mining Co.
17603876
Nuclear_power_in_Australia
Nuclear power in Australia is a heavily debated concept. Australia currently has no nuclear facilities generating electricity, however, Australia has 23% of the worlds uranium deposits(Australias Uranium and Nuclear Power Prospects) and is the worlds second largest producer of uranium after Canada. At the same time, Australias extensive, low-cost coal and gas reserves have historically been used as strong arguments for avoiding nuclear power.(Australia report gives nuclear nod BBC 22 November 2006)In 2005, the Australian government threatened to use its constitutional powers to take control of the approval process for new uranium mines from the anti-nuclear Territory government. The government is also negotiating with China to weaken safeguard terms to allow uranium exports there. States controlled by the Labor Party are blocking the development of new mines in their jurisdictions under the ALPs No New Mines policy. The Howard-led Coalition government went to the November 2007 federal election with a pro-nuclear power platform. This government was defeated by the Labor Party, however, which opposes nuclear power for Australia.(Support for N-power falls)(Rudd romps to historic win)1969 Jervis Bay Plant proposalThe Bay Nuclear Power Plant was a proposed power reactor in the Bay Territory on the south coast of South Wales. It would have been Australias first power plant, and was the only proposal to have received serious consideration as of 2005. Some environmental studies and site works were completed, and two rounds of tenders were called and evaluated, but the Australian government decided not to proceed with the project. Nuclear power politicsAs uranium prices began rising from about 2003, proponents of nuclear power advocated it as a solution to global warming and the Australian government began taking an interest. In late 2006 and early 2007, then Prime Minister Howard made widely reported statements in favour of nuclear power, on environmental grounds.(Martin, Brian.  Opposing nuclear power: past and present Social Alternatives, Vol. 26, No. 2, Second Quarter 2007, pp. 4347. Retrieved 12 January 2008.) Faced with these proposals to examine nuclear power as a possible response to climate change, anti-nuclear campaigners and scientists in Australia emphasised claims that nuclear power could not significantly substitute for other power sources, and that uranium mining itself could become a significant source of greenhouse gas emissions.(Diesendorf, Mark (2007). Paths to a Low-Carbon Future: Reducing Australias Greenhouse Gas Emissions by 30 per cent by 2020 (PDF))(Green, Jim (2005). Nuclear Power: No Solution to Climate Change (PDF)) In 2006, the Government commissioned the report, an investigation into the merits of Nuclear power in Australia. The report concluded that nuclear power would be competitive with coal power plants if credit sanctions were implemented upon Australia. The Industry would have been able to produce its first plant in 10 years and could have delivered 25 plants by 2050 supplying Australia with a third of its base load power.(Nuclear power in Australia within 10 years: Switkowski Sydney Morning Herald. 26 November 2006)An independent panel of Australian scientists and nuclear experts have been critical of the findings of the Switkowski nuclear inquiry. They found that the Switkowski report relies on some flawed assumptions which reveal a bias towards nuclear power on economic, technological, health and environmental grounds.(Media Release 24 November 2006: Response to UMPNER draft report)Queensland introduced legislation to ban nuclear power development on 20 February 2007.(Queensland bans nuclear facilities Aleens Arthur Robinson Client Update: Energy. 1 March 2007. Retrieved 19 April 2007.) Tasmania has also banned nuclear power development.(Australias States React Strongly to Switkowski Report Hieros Gamos Worldwide Legal Directories 10 December 2006. Retrieved 19 April 2007.) Both laws were enacted in response to the pro-nuclear position of John Howard,(Wikinews PortalAustralian nuclear debate) and the release of the  Switkowski report.(Uranium Mining, Processing and Nuclear Energy  Opportunities for Australia?)Anti-nuclear campaigns were given added impetus by public concern about the sites for possible reactors: fears exploited by anti-nuclear power political parties in the lead-up to a national election in 2007.(Matthew Franklin and Steven Wardill, PM nukes Labors campaign of fear, Courier-Mail, 6 June 2006.)(Joseph Kerr and Steve Lewis, Support for N-power plants falls, The Australian, 30 December 2006.) The Rudd Labor government was elected in November 2007 and is opposed to nuclear power for Australia.(Support for N-power falls The Australian, 30 December 2006. Retrieved 12 January 2008.)(Rudd romps to historic win The Age, 25 November 2007. Retrieved 12 January 2008.) The anti-nuclear movement continues to be active in Australia, opposing expansion of existing uranium mines, lobbying against the development of nuclear power in Australia, and criticising proposals for nuclear waste disposal sites.(ABC News, Anti-nuclear campaigners say Muckaty will be dumped, 26 November 2007, Retrieved 31 January 2008.)At the same time, a number of Australian politicians feel that the development of nuclear power is in the countrys best interests. Notably, on 13 June 2008, the annual South Wales state conference of the National Party passed the resolution, proposed by the delegates from Dubbo, supporting research into the development of a nuclear power industry and the establishment of an international waste storage facility in Australia. The resolution was opposed by the delegates from NSWs north coast and by the partys state leader, Stoner.(Nats leader not keen on nuclear power Business Spectator, 13 June 2008)(Stoner defies Nationals nuclear support, ABC News, 13 June 2008)Nuclear power debate in AustraliaIn the 2010 book Why vs. Why: Nuclear Power(Brook, B.W. & Lowe, I. (2010). Why vs Why: Nuclear Power. Pantera Press, ISBN 978-0-9807418-5-8) Barry Brook and Lowe discuss and articulate the debate about nuclear power. Brook argues that there are various reasons why people should say yes to nuclear power, and these reasons include:(*Because energy and energy efficiency may or may not solve the energy and climate crises*Because nuclear fuel is virtually unlimited and packs a huge energy punch*Because new technology solves the waste problem*Because nuclear power is the safest energy optionLowe argues that there are various reasons why people should say no to nuclear power:(*Because it is not a fast enough response to change*Because it is too expensive*Because the need for electricity is exaggerated*Because the problem of waste remains unresolvedOpinion pollsA McNair Gallup poll http://www.mcnairingenuity.com/ on the construction of power plants in Australia was carried out in 1979. The same poll was conducted again 28 years later in 2007 by McNair Ingenuity Research, using Assisted Telephone Interviewing on 1,000 randomly selected people throughout Australia. A new poll was asked in 2009 which marked the first time that more people support nuclear power than oppose it. The support for nuclear power is still in a plurality not an outright majority http://news.smh.com.au/breaking-news-national/more-aussies-back-nuclear-power-poll-20091013-gu7r.html . Respondents were asked the following question:		The 1979 poll was conducted soon after the  Three Mile Island Unit 2 (TMI-2) nuclear power plant accident located near Pennsylvania USA where a sequence of events lead to the partial meltdown of the TMI-2 reactor core reactor core(National Museum of American History (link: http://americanhistory.si.edu/tmi/tmi02.htm) Three Mile Island: The inside story. Retrieved   April 2008).The worst nuclear disaster in history occurred in 1986 the disaster, when reactor at the Nuclear Power Plant exploded resulting in a meltdown and a succession of explosions(World Nuclear Association (http://www.world.nuclear.org/info/chernobyl/info07.htm) Chernobyl Accident. Retrieved April 2008.). It seems from the 2007 McNair Gallup poll that the need to consider nuclear power as an alternative energy source overrides any concern that events such as the Chernobyl disaster will be repeated with more Australians conceding the need for nuclear power plants to be built in Australia. Opposition to the construction of nuclear power plants in the 2007 poll was strongest amongst females, Greens supporters and Australians aged 1829 and 40-49(Australian Social Science Archive (http://assda.anu.edu.au/polls/D0237.html) Opinion Poll D0237: Australian Gallup Poll, July 1975. Retrieved April 2008).								The McNair Gallup Poll showed a significant difference in opinion between ALP, Coalition and Green supporters. An overwhelming 78% of Green voters were opposed to the construction of nuclear power plants in Australia. In contrast, 34% of Coalition voters were likely to oppose the construction of nuclear power plants. The poll revealed that 59% of Coalition voters favoured the construction of nuclear power stations in Australia compared with only 30% of Labor voters.The 2007 McNair Gallup poll found differences in responses between men and women. Men were more likely to favour the construction of nuclear power stations (55%), with twice as many males in favour of the construction of nuclear power plants in Australia than women. 41% of men were more likely to oppose the construction of nuclear power plants in Australia.  In contrast, 65% of women were more likely to oppose the construction of nuclear power plants in Australia, while 28% favour the construction of nuclear power plants.See also* Nuclear Science and Technology Organisation* Flux Australian ReactorReferences External links * Australian Nuclear Science and Technology Organisation Australias Nuclear power and nuclear science options 2005 and beyond* Australian Conservation Foundation- Is nuclear power part of Australias global warming solutions? * Australian Institute of Energy Nuclear Power in Australia- Why, whether and how* Washington Post Three Mile Island * The United Nations A unified message of hope for Chernobyl-affected communities * The United Nations History of the United Nations and Chernobyl* The Australian Conservation Foundation Dr Jim Green- Nuclear Power No Solution to Climate Change* Labor insiders push for nuclear energy* Going nuclear not essential: Ruddnuclaire de lAustralie
17619006
Shizunai_River
 footnotes  is a river in Shinhidaka, Hokkaid, Japan. The Shizunai River drains from the Mountains into the Ocean. Origin of the nameThe Shizunai River was known as Shibuchari(Walker, The Conquest of Ainu Lands, pgs 18-19 ) and Shibechari.  This name was derived from Shipe-ichan meaining a salmon spawning place in Ainu. (Nippon-Kichi, Shizunai-gawaThe Shizunai River, last access 26 May 2008). The name Shizunai is derived from the Ainu language and has three possible sources:(, )* Shiputnai  A marsh at the origin of the Ainu.* Shuttonai  A marsh with lots of grapes.* Shutnai  A river at the foot of a mountain.CourseThe Shizunai River flows generally southwest from its headwaters in the Hidaka mountains at the confluence of the Koikakushushibichari and Koibokushushibichari rivers. It flows into , a reservoir created by the Takami Dam. Past the dam, the Shizunai river flows into . Past the Shizunai Dam, the river encounters Futa Dam before leaving the mountains for the flood plain. The river flows past the outlying communities of Shizunai before entering the Pacific Ocean just northwest of Shizunai harbor.Natural historyThe Shizunai River was designated as a wildlife protection area in 1965. Swans overwinter on the Shizunai River.(HistoryThe Shizunai River basin was the home of Shakushain the Ainu leader who lead a revolt against the Japanese especially the clan in the 1660s. In the period the region was used for gold mining.ListsList of bridges and damsFrom river mouth to source:*********List of (named) tributariesFrom river mouth to source:# Left  # Right  Perari River# Left   charcoal or coal mountain river# Left  Shunbetsu River# Right  Poyoppusawa River# Right  Pisenaisawa River# Left  Penkeonikemushi River# Left  Ponpanbetsu Creek# Left  Penkebetsusawa River# Left  Porokaunnai River# Right  Ibetsusawa River# Right  Abeunnai River# Confluence Left  Koibokushuchchari, Right  KoikakushuppichariReferences* Brett L. Walker, The Conquest of Ainu Lands, University of California Press, Berkely, 2001, ISBN 0520248341* , , , No year of publication.* Nippon-Kichi, Shizunai-gawaThe Shizunai River, 12 July 2007, last access 26 May 2008
17631409
Ogden,_British_Columbia
Ogden is an unincorporated locality on the outskirts of the gold-mining ghost of British Columbia, Canada. Now mostly abandoned, Ogden was once a bustling centre of commercial activities not tolerated in the company-run town, many of its establishments built on the highway easement or small parcels of steep mountainside flanking the road. Among these were Zadas house (where sewing was taken in for bachelor miners), which once suffered a small landslide through the main parlour but was back in operation soon after, and the once-famous Hotel, known in the mining industry as the main stope, which featured a miniature mining operation atop its gold-ore fireplace mantel. The first two versions of the Mines Hotel burned down soon after they were built, and the third, which stood until 1984 when it was destroyed by a furnace explosion, was built in a plain boxy style very different from the original alpine-timber design.   Ogdens heyday faded long before Bralorne closed, and only a few buildings survive other than a few houses. Ogden remains on the official listing of localities in British Columbia, and is used by locals as a reference to the general area where the town of Ogden had been. References * Bridge River Gold, Emma de Hullu, Irene Cunningham and others, self-publ.* The Great Years: Mining in the Bridge River Valley, Lewis Green, Tricouni (Vancouver), 2001
17646154
Faculty_of_Engineering_(UNAM)
website         www.ingenieria.unam.mxThe Faculty of Engineering () at the Autonomous University of Mexico (UNAM) is one of the most prestigious engineering schools in Mexico. At the undergraduate level, it offers twelve different majors. The faculty also offers some graduate programs. In the first semester of 2008 there were over 10,900 enrollments at the licenciatura level, plus 1,115 postgraduate students.( )HistoryThe Engineering Faculty at the UNAM has its origins as the Real Seminario de Mineria (Royal School of Mining), which building is still standing near the Zocalo in City.  After the university was closed in 1833, several scientific institutes were established in Mexico, all of them related to some branch of engineering. These   eventually merged into a single institution which in 1910 was put under the supervision of the newly created UNAM and renamed to Escuela Nacional de Ingeniera (National School of Engineering).In 1954 the school changes its location to Universitaria. In 1959, with the creation of the Engineering Institute and the availability of its first graduate program, the school changes its name to Facultad de Ingeniera.Organization & DepartmentsThe faculty is organized in divisions (somewhat the equivalent of departments), each under the direct supervision of a Head of division. These are themselves coordinated and supervised by the faculty dean, currently Jos Gonzalo Guerrero Zepeda.*  Fundamental Science Division:Is in charge of subjects such as physics and mathematics, every student has to take one or more subjects of this department, specially during the first 4 semesters. These subjects on science are then common to all students and are often regarded as the most difficult among all.* Mechanical and Engineering Division:In charge of the majors in the name, is the contact between the school and the industry, there are some programs for young entrepreneurial and some courses that may resemble an BA program in USA* Civil and Geomatic Engineering Division:* Engineering Division:The Electric Engineering Division is in charge of three different bachelor degrees: Electric Engineering, Computer Engineering and Telecommunication Engineering. It is the biggest division by number of students, as the degrees it offers have a high employment rate. This division has established many industrial partnerships with enterprises such as Telmex and Microsoft* Earth Sciences Engineering:This division is organizes the Mining, Petroleum, Geophysics and Geology Engineering bachelor Programs. Is one of the oldest divisions in the school and currently has some joint programs with PEMEX among other petroleum companies.* Distance and Continuing Education Division:As the name implies, this division is in charge of courses and diplomas for active professionals who wish to stay up to date with current technological trends or wish to stay in contact with the academic community in some way other  than the conventional graduate programs.* Social Sciences and Humanities Division:In charge of cultural activities and some subjects, such as literature, ethics and history.Location and facilitiesThe faculty has numerous facilities, most of which are located in Universitaria in City, near the Faculty of Science and the Faculty of Administration.It has two libraries for undergraduate students and one for postgraduates. It also has some of Mexicos finest laboratories for civil and mechanical engineering.Student organizationsThe faculty has several student organizations, among them a Tuna, a chorus and a photo club.Each major has its own student organization, which is in charge of promoting activities related to each specialization, such as extracurricular courses, workshops or congresses.*SAFIR Sociedad Astronmica de la Facultad de Ingeniera (Astronomical Society of the Faculty of Engineering )(Pgina de la sociedad SAFIR)Sitio oficial de SAFIR en FacebookPresidentes de SAFIR       *Farah Simn (Founder)(http://www.comoves.unam.mx/archivo/quienes/quienes_147.html)Graduate programsEach division within the faculty organizes graduate programs. There are also graduate programs in cooperation with other faculties and other higher education institutions in Mexico.ReferencesExternal links*Facultad de Ingeniera&ndash;UNAM, official website de Ingeniera (Universidad Nacional Autnoma de Mxico)
17658354
Freiburg_Bchle
thumb|right|Bchle on central squareThe Freiburg Bchle are small water-filled runnels or formalized rills in the Forest city of Freiburg. They are supplied with water by the Dreisam and can be seen along most streets and alleyways in the old city, being one of the citys most famous landmarks. The word Bchle comes from the German Bach, meaning stream, with the Alemannic diminutive ending  -le.HistoryFirst documented in the 13th century, the Bchle once served as a water supply and were used to help fight fires. Today the Bchle are loved by children and tourists alike but in the 19th century they were seen as obsolete and most of them were covered with iron plates. The Bchle were seen by many (among them the ADAC) as a traffic hazard due to their original location in the middle of the road and as a consequence they were moved to the edge of the roads in 1852.It is local superstition that if you accidentally step in the Bchle, you will marry a Freiburger.The first documented mention of the Bchle dates back to the year 1220 when Count Egon I of Freiburg gave the Tennenbacherhof monastery permission to use a field which was irrigated by a Bchle. Another reference to the Bchle can be found in a document from the year 1238, according to which the Dominicans built a monastery adjoining the city wall inter duas ripas (Lat: between two (river)banks).Several archaeologists deduce from the outcome of excavations that the Bchle had already been in existence in 1120 when Freiburg was founded, some one-hundred years earlier than documented. The city of Freiburg was founded on the site of a previous settlement at the foot of the Schlossberg. The construction of artificial water courses, used to irrigate pastureland, was convenient because of the natural slope on which the settlement was built.Around the year 1180 some street levels in the city were raised by up to three metres with layers of gravel. Unlike in many other settlements this was not done to protect against floods since the riverbed of the Dreisam is significantly lower than the city. It is now believed that the entire system of Bchle was instead elevated in order to supply newer parts of the city with water. Thus, houses from the first half of the twelfth century are in line with a lower street level and all constructions after 1175 with a higher one. Those aggradations made the ground floor of a lot of houses impassable from the street, so that they were either raised or simply had front doors built at the level of their upper floors - which were then at street level. The amount of newly constructed buildings around 1175 thus surpassing the number expected by natural population growth, presumably also because the aggradations were used to substitute wooden constructions with stone ones.The Bchle were part of the dual water supply system of Freiburg: The provision of the city with drinking water proved to be difficult, since the ground water is located 12 meters under the ground and the few deeper wells could only last for emergencies. People directed mountain water from the bottom of the Bromberg in the east of Wiehre across Deicheln towards Freiburg and thus injected the urban running fountains. This system was sufficient for the supply of drinking water for the population, but it did not cover the demand of service water for animals outside of the city walls. Therefore, additional water was branched of the Dreisam and drained through the citys artificial waterstreams, called Runze. Since for a long time the term Runze was used for both the Bchle and for canals, it is not possible to properly distinguish the two facilities in historical sources.Ever since their existence the Bchle transported rainwater out of the town, carrying along all sorts of dirt. In order to be a positive sight at daytime, no substances causing offence (rgernis erregende Stoffe) were allowed to be disposed of at daytime. Council regulations from the 16th century then forbade the disposal of solid substance in the Bchle entirely:After their way through the town, the Bchle were used to irrigate fields. The water was funneled to the fields across the moat by wooden bridges called Khner. The used Bchle water increased the value of the fields massively by being a very nutrient-rich fertiliser. The Bchle floated snow out of the town and hereby extended crop cycles in spring. In case of drought they secured the continuance of the harvest.The Bchle originally ran down the middle of the road, which can only be seen today in the Market street. They were considered because of the massive increase in the population in the 19th Century as an obstacle for the rise in traffic. Between 1840 and 1851 they were laid at the edge of the road and the majority were covered with wood or iron plates or edged with stone chutes or pipes. It was recorded that the response was negative from some of the population:The Freiburg residents did not want to abandon the Bchle. New Bchle were even produced until 1858, for example, in the Ro-, Engel-, and Kasernengasse (streets), and also the timber market place. (Die Amtszeit von Otto Winterer sah weitere Bchle in Stadt- und Tennenbacherstrae sowie die Offenlegung einiger verdeckter Bchle.14  Die Planer der Straenbahn ignorierten den eingeholten Rat des Oberingenieurs der damaligen Straenbahn Hamburg, der im Jahr 1899 die Fhrung des Gleises am Bach entlang ... unter keinen Umstnden empfehlen konnte.15Neben der Deckung des Brauchwasserbedarfs und der Bewsserung der Wiesen ermglichten die Bchle eine bessere Versorgung mit Lschwasser als die Tief- und Laufbrunnen. Die Brunnen hatten kein Reservoir, doch der Zufluss der Bchle konnte bei Bedarf rasch erhht werden und die Lufe lieen sich zur besseren Wasserentnahme stauen.) For this task, according to the fire safety regulations of 1692, the townsfolk of Oberlinden had to appoint people of their group every year on the 1st of May who were supplied with studs by the city. For instance, in 1713, prior to the siege by the French army, 46 households were supplied by these. The fire regulations of 1838 again fortified the important role of the Bchle. It directly requested the fountain craftsmen to instantly adjust the water in fountains and city streams according to the area of the blaze. Since this way, there was fire water available directly available at the location of the fire, it wasnt necessary to build up long bucket brigades to the next water standpost anymore.The modernization of the drinking water and water network from 1850 20 and the production of fire hydrants in the late 19th Century meant that the importance of the Bchle decreased as a source of water to fight fires. However, in the following Century they helped to extinguish fires during the British raid on the 27th of November (Operation Tiger fish), in which parts of the town centre were totally destroyed. Witnesses reported that after the raid, the Bchle came in handy, because the industrial streams were buried and the water pipes destroyed therefore deeming the hydrants useless. 21 Without the water from the Bchle, the area of Oberlinden, the historic department store, the Wentzinger house and other buildings wouldnt have been able to be saved.By November 1945, mayor Wolfgang Hoffmann had already called for the courses of the stream to be cleaned in order to start using the Bchle again. Because of the cleaning work, the Bchle often couldnt flow properly, and at times, the Bchle themselves exacerbated the work. Due to these two factors it took until the beginning of the 1950s for the Bchle to be able to run again in the rebuilt city. In 1952, the FAC (Freiburger Automobil-Club) demanded the removal of these traffic obstacles. A visitor in 1956 proposed to attach references of the Bchle to the place-name signs. At roughly the same time a merchant filed a suit against the town of Freiburg after having driven into a Bchle in Salzstrae and consequently hitting the wall of a house. The lawsuit over the costs of 2360 DM was repelled. A similar thing happened 1964 to a tourist who sued the city after breaking a leg when he tumbled into the Bchle at Adelhauser Street. He was sentenced to pay a third of the damage himself. This was based upon the fact that the Bchle should have attracted his attention after a day in the city and that it should so long as somehow possible keep holding on to such a characteristic, beautiful and hygienic quirk as presented by the Bchle. At least, in consequence of the accidents at the end of the 1960s, the city instituted that the bottom plates of the Bchle, among others the ones in the Salz- and Bertholdstreet, were put higher.In 1973 the city centre of Freiburg was made a pedestrian zone with tram traffic. Since that time the Bchle didnt pose a significant traffic inconvenience anymore even though some of them actually run parallel to the tram  tracks. The Bchle network between Rempartstrae and Martinstor was further enhanced and previously closed Bchle on Universittstrae and Niemensstrae were reopened in 1986 following the Innenstadtkonzept 86 (City Centre Concept 86). Near the Neue Messe established in 2000 a Bchle was planned, but the idea nearly failed for financial reasons. Therefore citizens and enterprises of Freiburg were appealed to sponsor: 500 DM for one meter of that particular Bchle. Thus even two kilometres from the city centre there now is a Bchle. It is completely independent from the ones in the city centre, however.The current version of the Article for the cleaning of pavements (Gehwegreinigungssatzung) issued on 8 March 2007 by the city administration mentions the Bchle in several passages: In pedestrian and traffic-calmed zones pavements are defined as the lateral areas separated by Bchle or gutters. Bchle are to be kept free of snow and rubbish.InfrastructureFar above the old town, at the Kartauses grit channel, a watergate directs water from the Dreisam into the canal.  Before being moved to its present-day location in 1852, this water conduit was located below the Sandfangbrcke. Up until the beginning of the 21st century, this watergate had to be operated manually. It was as recently as 2009 that an automatic inlet construction was put into operation. The canal fills a mining tunnel at the bottom of the Schlossberg. This roughly 400 meter long tunnel was partly bricked and partly sculpted into rock. Memorial stones for master builders, master-workmans and mayors of Freiburg can be found there. A historic map implies that the canal was an open stream before the construction of the Vaubans stronghold from 1679 onward.At the same level of the Schwabentor, the water volume is regulated by means of a watergate. That way, 200 liters (according to a different source, 250 liters) of water can flow into the Bchles network. Thereby it is completely refilled every 8 minutes. Thanks to the difference in altitude between east and west of Freiburgs old town, the Bchle flow downwards in a north-west direction with a natural base slope of 1 to 2. The main distribution happens in Oberlinden. Its also possible to branch off some water in order to water the alte Linde (old lime-tree) from the year 1729. After running through the city, the water flows back into the canals at Predigertor. It is redirected into the Dreisam at the Hllentalbahnbrcke and near Lehen. However, some of the canals water is also flowing from the northern stream course through different streams into the Glotter. Back when the Bchle were still used for the watering of fields, it was also redirected at the Christoffeltor and the Mnchstor over the city walls.The Runzknecht ensures the distribution of water. 142 brass valves 35 help the regulation, through which the water can also be turned off during the cleaning of the Bchle.  Furthermore, there are plugholes on the bases of the Bchle, which connect the Bchle water systems with the central sewerage system into which the water drains.  15 overflow thresholds in the sewers or the industrial stream prevent basements being flooded with high levels of water 15.The responsibility of keeping the streams clean rests on two full-time Bchleputzer (previously: Bachrumer) (bchle cleaners / Bach clearers) since at least 1789, who are employed by the city administration of Freiburg. Twice a day they clear the Bchle of rubbish and leaves which also get caught in the Bchle grills. Furthermore, the so-called Bachabschlag takes place annually in autumn and during a weekend in spring, when the water from all of the canals and Bchle is drained. The Bachabschlag is used not only for cleaning but also to check for damage and if necessary, repair. Further reasons for stopping the Bchle are for example: road works, the Freiburg wine festival and the Carnival/Fasching parade in which Hstrger, (those wearing a Carnival costume) from the Bchleputzer jesters guild (established in 1935) can be marveled at.Accommodated to the width of each respective street, the Bchle themselves are each different sizes. The widest Bchle with a width of around 75 cm is located near the Schwabentor and the smallest one which is approximately 15 cm wide runs through the narrow old city alleys. Over time the shape of the streams has changed:At first the Bchle were flowing freely in shallow ditches at street level, but in the nineteenth century a sandstone frame was put in to control the flow of the Bchle. Since the construction in the 19th century the base of the Bchle was cemented and the lining was made up of granite tiles. Then in the 20th century it changed and remains the same to this day: the bases are paved with granite or Rhine gravel.  The Rhine gravel is also used for paving, but is hard to come by. This requires a specially educated paver.  The lining of the Bchle can also be made with Rhine gravel, porphyry or basalt.image:Baechle-Querschnitt-1.svg|Middle ageimage:Baechle-Querschnitt-2.svg|19th centuryimage:Baechle-Querschnitt-3.svg|19th to 20th centuryimage:Baechle-Querschnitt-4.svg|20th and 21st century Flora and Fauna The presence of microorganisms such as the larvae of some kinds of Mayflies, Caddisflies and Black Flies indicate the high water quality throughout the Bchle. In some years, Amphipodae can also be found in the Bchle. They are known to prevent the growth of algae. Quotes on the Bchle According to a legend from the Baden region, anybody who accidentally steps into the Bchle on a visit to Freiburg will inevitably marry a Freiburg citizen. However, this has not come true yet for former president Schrder who stepped into the Bchle on his way to the town hall to the German-French summit in June 2001. Similar structures in different cities Water streams in cities were more common in earlier days, but nowadays Freiburg is one of few cities left to still have them in form of the Bchle. At the beginning of the 16th century, Antonio de Beatis wrote about Innsbruck that the streets were broad and had a lot of water channels and fountains. In Goslar the Gose was already rerouted through the city by 1200 and supplied the population with drinking water. For the sewage there were plastered gutters which could be flooded with fresh water in order to clean them or to help fight fires. Even older drainage ditches from the time between 1000 and 1100 were excavated in an Anglo-Saxon centre below Winchester in the 20th century.In the late 13th century the Brausch in Strasbourg was led through the paved streets to remove sewage. Former town registrar Adolf Poinsignon supposed in the late 19th century that the little streams in the oder towns in Alsace at the foot of the Vosges served as a model for the constructions. In the French micropolis Briaon, which has been reconstructed after a fire by Vauban, one can also find Bchle. A stream comparable to the Bchle in Freiburg is to be found in the centre of the wine-growing municipality Gumpoldskirchen in Lower Austria.BchleinBchle(Freiburg)Bchle
17682662
Tourism_in_Peru
Tourism in Peru make up the nations third largest industry, behind fishing and mining.(PERU: COMPENDIO DE ESTADISTICAS ECONOMICAS Y FINANCIERAS, 1997-98) Tourism is directed towards archeological monuments, ecotourism in the Amazon, tourism in colonial cities, gastronomic tourism, adventure tourism, and beach tourism. According to a Peruvian government study, the satisfaction rate for tourists after visiting Peru is 94%.(Peru Travel - Peru.com - Trip to Peru, perfect vacation, tours to Per, reservations, package tours, testimonials, hotels, restaurants, travelers guide, tours, visas, transpo...) Tourism is the most rapidly growing industry in Peru, growing annually at a rate of 25% over the past five years.(::Per logra mayor crecimiento turstico en Amrica del Sur ::) Tourism is growing in Peru faster than any other country in South America.( The most popular countries of origin for tourists are the States, Chile, Argentina, Kingdom, France, Germany, Brazil, Spain, Canada, and Italy.( Transportation File:PeruRail Highest point.jpg|thumb|250px|PeruRail train en route to TiticacaAirPeru does not have one clear national airline,(Humberto Campodnico: Per: Sin lnea area de bandera y sin marina mercante) but rather various different airlines offering service to Peru from America, America, Europe, and Asia. Some of the most popular airlines are Per (domestic and international), Peru (international), and Peru (domestic). The countrys airports are also served by many international airlines from other nations. The Chavez International Airport in Lima is the nations leading international airport and received 7,507,811 passengers in 2007. Domestic air travel serves as a major method for tourists to traverse the country with multiple airlines offering service between many of Perus cities.HighwaysAdditionally, Peru has land borders with five countries and has highway connections with all but Colombia. International bus routes are operated on each of these highways providing service from Peruvian cities to other American cities. Domestically, the highway system is extensive and covers nearly the entire country excluding the department of Loreto which can only be accessed by boat or airplane. There are frequent buses traveling throughout the country. But, bus travel is dangerous as many of these highways are built on cliffs, and accidents leading to death are frequently reported by the media. Occasionally buses are held up by highwaymen in remote areas. The buses range in size and comfort but they usually have cushioned reclining seats and a form of onboard entertainment, such as a movie or music. Many offer bus-camas, or sleeper buses, with seats that recline to become beds.RailPeru is starting to build a metro in Lima, but other regions do not have this system. Tourists must travel by bus or taxi within the city. Outside of Lima, there are only two major railway systems in operation, one in the central part of the country and the other in the south. The central railway starts at sea level in Lima and traverses the Andes, crossing through the Junin and Huancavelica departments. The southern railway is the one most commonly used by tourists, as a segment of its route goes from the city of Cusco to the citadel of Picchu, a major tourist attraction. This route offers seating options ranging from economy class to first class. The railway originates in the city of Mollendo in the Department and goes through the Puno and Cusco departments, passing through the cities of Arequipa, Puno, Juliaca, the citadel of Picchu, and ends at Cusco. The railway is operated by PeruRail, the largest railway manager in Peru.RiverAnother mode of transportation in the Amazonian area is river transport. River transportation companies operate routes between the cities of the Amazon. The main hubs of this network are the cities of Iquitos, Maldonado, Pucallpa, and Yurimaguas. Because of the lack of roads in this region, river transport, along with air travel, are the most  efficient and important methods of transport.DataTourism is the third largest industry in Peru.(http://www.eleconomista.es/empresas-finanzas/noticias/355907/02/08/Peru-supedita-crecimiento-de-turismo-en-2008-al-aumento-de-la-capacidad-aerea.html El Economista newspaper, Spain) It employs 10.8% of the force in Peru (484,000 direct and 340,000 indirect jobs) the majority of them belonging to the hotel and transportation industries. The industry makes up 7% of the Peruvian domestic product and is the fastest growing industry in the country. It is regulated by the Commission for the Promotion of Peru (PromPeru) belonging to the Ministry of Foreign Commerce and Tourism.ThemesCultural tourismFile:Arquidicesis de Lima.JPG|thumb|250px|The of Lima in the Centre of LimaCultural tourism forms the largest sector of the tourism industry in Peru. Pre-Columbian civilizations &mdash; most notably the Empire, Chavn, Moche, and Nasca &mdash; left a large archeological and cultural impact on the nation. The ruins of Picchu are the most internationally recognized of all the ruins of Peru and therefore receive the most tourists.  The other popular ruins are those of Chan, Sipan, Kuelap, lines, Ollantaytambo, Caral, Sacsayhuamn, and Sillustani.Tourists also visit the Spanish colonial architecture in many cities in Peru. Some of the most outstanding examples of Spanish colonial architecture are in the cities of Lima, Arequipa, and Cusco. These areas, many built over 500 years ago, demonstrate the superb architectural ingenuity of the colonists during the of Peru. The city of Lima has many acclaimed museums holding works of art reflecting the diverse history of the country. These museums include the National Museum, National Museum of Anthropology, Archeology and History; Rafael Larco Herrera Archeological Museum, National Museum of Peruvian Culture, and Museum of Italian Art, among many others.EcotourismFile:Jaguar tier 2.jpg|thumb|250px|The jaguar, an animal native to the national parks of Peru60% of the land of Peru is in the Basin. Peru has a higher percentage of land area protected in national parks and preserves than any other country in America. The  Amazon is one of the most pristine, virgin, and untouched rainforests on the earth, making it a destination for tourists interested in nature and ecology. Increased tourist infrastructure has been developed. The Peruvian Amazon is divided into two areas: the High Jungle and the Lower Jungle. The High Jungle is more easily accessible, while the Lower Jungle is more pristine and untouched. In recent times, however, the government has increased accessibility to the Lower Jungle.  Both areas contain an unrivaled diversity of animal and plant life. Large national preserves of interest to tourists include the National Park, Abiseo National Park, and the Tambopata-Candamo Protected Area. Tourist agencies in these areas promote eco-friendly tourism to preserve the fragile ecosystems of the rainforest.Adventure tourismBecause of Perus geographical diversity, it is possible to go surfing, sandboarding, 4x4, buggy, alpinism, rafting, rappelling, downhill, rally, trekking, skiing, and climbing. Surfing is extremely popular in Peru, and the country has been host to numerous national and international competitions in the sport. File:Incatrail in Peru.jpg|thumb|250px|The Trail from Cusco to Picchu. The country is home to the world-famous surfer Mulnovich.Peru is divided into three geographical regions: the coast, the sierra, and the jungle. Each one has numerous activities suited to its particular climate and environment. The sport of skiing is developing in the city of Huaraz, and new resorts are created to suit the rising tourist demand. The sand dunes of Ica are popular for dune buggies. River rafting has become very popular among national and international tourists in recent years, and availability in Lima and Cusco is high. Rapids range in difficulty and there is rafting options from novices to experts. Trekking has become the most popular type of adventure sport among tourists in Peru. This is because of the treks offered from Cusco to Picchu, as well as trails in other parts of the country such as Ancash. Mountain climbing is a popular sport among tourists in the sierra region.For more information on adventure tourism see the Ancash section of this article below.Gastronomic tourismPeruvian cuisine stems mainly from the combination of Spanish cuisine with traditional native Peruvian ingredients, with later influences from the cuisines of China, Italy, West Africa     and Japan, due to the arrival of immigrants from those locations. Each of these cuisines has had to be heavily adapted because of a lack or scarcity of many ingredients. For example, it is still impossible to find such commonplace items as lemons, turnips, kale and chestnuts in Peru. It is next to impossible to find authentic foreign cuisine to this day because of a lack of ingredients. For example, one can not find authentic Chinese dishes such as dofu. Instead one finds a curious mixture of Chinese cooking that has been adapted to the ingredients available in Peru. This cuisine is known as Chifa. Cusco restaurants are home to the tastiest meals of the country and in places such as Aguas Calientes (the small town below Macchu Picchu) some say the best flavour of the world can found.The three traditional staples of Peruvian cuisine are corn, potatoes and beans. These ingredients have been combined with a number of staples brought by the Spanish, such as rice, wheat and meat (such as beef, pork and chicken). Many traditional foods, such as quinoa, kiwicha, peppers and several roots and tubers which had previously been tossed aside for European products, have seen a resurgence in popularity in recent decades with a revival of interest in native Peruvian food crops.Beach tourismFile:Ceviche del Per.jpg|thumb|250px|Ceviche is a popular Peruvian seafood dish.Peru boasts a 2,414-kilometer coastline littered with many beaches attractive to any type of traveler. Beachgoing in Peru is extremely popular among domestic and international travelers alike. Beach resorts and towns are abundant along the coast and many are in popular areas which attract visitors. Two of the most popular beach areas are Mancora and Sal in the Piura and Tumbes departments respectively, and Asia in the Department.The northern beaches of Mancora and Sal have a pleasant beach climate year round whereas Asia is primarily a summertime beach. Because Asia is located near the city of Lima, many beachgoers own houses in that area. In contrast, Mancora is many hours from major cities so visitors usually stay in hotels or resorts.Beachgoing in Peru is affected by fads: Beach homeowners moved from beach to beach resulting from the oversaturation of one beach. In previous years, the beach of Ancon was the most popular of Lima; it became oversaturated and beachgoers moved south of the city to the beaches of Punta Hermosa, San Bartolo, Santa Maria and Pucusana. In the last decade, these beaches have become oversaturated as well and beachgoers have moved further south to the development of Asia, which has now become extremely popular and is the primary beach destination for Limeans.Mancora, 17 hours north of Lima by bus and 1.5 hours by plane from Talara, is older than Asia but still a relatively new development. In recent years it has experienced a tourist boom and beachgoers flock there. Its beaches have white sand and the town has many nightclubs and bars frequented by thousands of tourists. The popularity of this beach has become so great that a movie has been made about the beach: Mancora. Sal is another beach a half hour north of Mancora, less popular among young people, and the destination for older people seeking relaxation.File:Mancorabeach1.jpg|275px|thumb|A beach in Mancora, Piura, Peru Nonetheless it remains a large tourist attraction and is characterized by its white sand beaches and turquoise color waters.Peruvian beaches are popular places for surfing and their waves are world renowned.Luxury travelPeru has also been experiencing a continuous growth in luxury travel. This niche of tourists seeking high-end hotels in unique destinations, travel mainly from the U.S. and Europe to visit Cusco, Urubamba, and Picchu. Recently this segment has been expanding to other area such as the region and Titicaca, as well as Iquitos and the Canyon in Arequipa, as local and international tourism firms have made large investments in hotels and tourism development.Nowadays there are entrepreneurs of the best hotel brands of USA ready to invest millions of dollars (minimum of US$10 million) in 5 star hotels and resorts in the Mancora and Punta Sal area under capital investment or joint venture schemes. The investors are comprised by more than 115 investment funds of USA and Europe.Destinations by departmentThe two most frequented areas by tourists in Peru are the cities of Lima and its historic centre, and Cusco whose principal attractions are the Valley of the Incas, Picchu, and incan and colonial architecture. Amazonas The region of Amazonas is a land of microclimates each containing an extensive amount of biodiversity. Additionally, the department was home to pre-Columbian civilizations that have left stunning remnants of their once great culture. The capital of the department, Chachapoyas, adds to the diversity of ecology and culture as it is home to picturesque colonial architecture. The streets of this city are narrow. It contains a main square as common throughout Peruvian cities and maintains colonial mansions and balconies which add to the flavor of the areas mixed culture.Arguably the most impressive destination of the department is the ancient fortress of Kulap. Often referred to as the Picchu of the north, Kuleap was built by the Chachapoyas civilization, an ancient tribe of warriors who resisted the Incas imperial expansion. The Gocta Waterfall is in this department and is the third highest waterfall in the world. As it was only recently discovered in 2005, the Peruvian government is making plans to develop it for tourism. Ancash File:Taulliraju.JPG|thumb|250px|The National Park in Ancash.The region of Ancash is home to the Blanca, the highest mountain range in Peru. The department is the epicenter of Perus adventure tourism sector and attracts visitors seeking to participate in all sorts of activities. The department is a paradise for trekkers and hikers as there is a vast network of trails. The benefit of trekking in Ancash is that only a select few trails have been commercialized. The scenery along these pre-Columbian trails is spectacular and there are more than 12,000 lakes. Picturesque villages are scattered throughout the department and are very hospitable. The most popular treks in the department are that of the Llama trek, the Blanca, and the Huayhuash.The capital city, Huaraz, has a small but reasonably developed skiing industry. Mountain biking is the fastest growing sport in the region. Mountain bikes are available to the traveler at each level of expertise. White water rafting is a significant activity in the department. Rapids range in difficulty from novice to expert. Mountain climbing is a very large industry in the area. The department has a high concentration of peaks and is not very crowded. The weather is mild year-round and is easily accessible from Huaraz. Twelve of Perus twenty tallest mountains are located in the department ranging from 5,000 to 6,700 meters (15,000 to 22,000 feet).To the cultural tourist Ancash also has much to offer. The de Huaylas is home to de Huantar, an ancient archeological complex built over 3,200 years ago. The area is a World Heritage Site. Picturesque cities litter the Callejon such as that of Recuay, Carhuaz, Yungay,Chacas and Caraz. These cities retain a unique blend of European and Andean architecture. One of the principal attractions of the department is the National Park which is a World Heritage Site. The park is home to Perus highest mountain, Mt. Huascarn. Apurmac Apurmac is in the southern Andes of Peru and is home to many villages and towns characterized by uncommercialized natural beauty. In addition to natural beauty, the cities of Abancay and Andahuaylas are home to Spanish colonial architecture each with a main square and narrow cobblestone streets. The main tourist activities in this area are hiking and white water rafting. Since the regions are close to Cusco, many tourists make offshoot trips from Cusco to Apurmac.ArequipaFile:CatedralArequipa.JPG|thumb|230px|The cathedral of Arequipa in the centre of Arequipa.The Arequipa region is one of the most geographically, culturally, and socially varied of Peru. Main attractions of the department are the city of Arequipa, the Canyon, adventure tourism, and wildlife observation. The city of Arequipa, the second largest in the nation, is known as the white city. The name comes from the colour of the citys buildings which are made of sillar that comes from the volcanoes in the area.The city is overshadowed by the Misti volcano which adds to the citys charm. It is the most developed city in Peru after Lima. The centre of Arequipa was made a World Heritage Site by the Nations for its abundance of Spanish baroque colonial churches and mansions, and the Catalina Monastery, a city within a city with cobblestone roads, plazas, and patios. Arequipan cuisine has remained more heavily influenced by Spanish colonial cuisine than that in Lima and it has remained relatively free from the later influence of immigrants that migrated to Lima, such as the Chinese and Japanese. The Canyon is 100 miles northwest of Arequipa and is double the depth of the Canyon in the States. The Canyon, located nearer to the city but considered less picturesque, is the deepest in the Hemisphere.AyacuchoFile:Ayacucho church by night.jpg|thumb|230px|Cathedral of AyacuchoThe Ayacucho department is in the southern Andes and contains a number of tourist sites attracting many visitors. The capital city, also known as Ayacucho, is said to have a church on every corner. These churches were built by the Spanish in the colonial period and contain much artwork. The department is home to various Wari archeological sites. The cities and towns of Ayacucho specialize in creating and selling handicrafts. Many of the handicrafts are created in Huamanga stone which is native to the department. The Vilcashuaman archeological site is an important Incan site.CajamarcaFile:Cathedral of cajamarca.JPG|thumb|230px|The cathedral in the city of CajamarcaThe region of Cajamarca is a melting pot of colonial architecture, historical significance, and a beautiful countryside. The city played an important part in American history as it was an Incan stronghold that was taken by the Spanish who eventually conquered the continent and formed the of Peru. From the conquest of the area, the city of Cajamarca ceased to be Incan and the Spanish imposed their magnificent colonial architecture upon the city. The city retains this architecture and it is a focal point to tourism in the region.Tourist destinations include Inca Baths, medicinal hot springs that were built by the Incas; the Ventanillas de Otuzco, an Incan cemetery carved into volcanic rock; Cumbemayo, a pre-Incan hydraulic engineering complex still working today; a picturesque hacienda called La Colpa; Kuntur Wasi, a commercial centre dating to B.C. containing a museum thought to have the oldest gold artifacts known to man; and a zoo. The city of Cajamarca is home to the Room, an Incan room that the Spanish ordered to be filled with gold and silver to secure the release of the Incan ruler Atahualpa. The ransom was met but the emperor was still killed.CallaoThe Province of Callao is really a city rather than a political entity. It forms part of the Metropolitan Area and is the transportation hub of the country. It is the location of the Chavez International Airport, the largest in the country. Callao is  Perus largest maritime port and was founded in 1537. During the of Peru, all wealth extracted from the South American Continent had to pass through this city. This wealth is evident through the remaining colonial mansions and elaborately carved balconies which characterize the city.The Felipe Fortress is an important tourist attraction which was built in 1747 to protect the city from pirates such as Francis Drake. The fortress played a key role in the War of Independence. Chucuito, a neighborhood of Callao, is known for its Gothic and neo-Renaissance houses as well as brightly colored homes. The district of La Punta was once home to the beach houses of Limas aristocracy and contains stately homes dating back to the early 19th century. The La Punta district is characterized by an ocean boardwalk, pebble beaches, and elegant mansions. The islands of El Camotal, San Lorenzo, El Frontn, Cavinzas and Palomino are just off the coast and home to sea birds and sea lions. The island of El Fronton once housed some of Perus most dangerous criminals.CuscoFile:Panoramic Cusco from Sacsayhuaman.jpg|thumb|right|250px|The city of Cusco, the ancient capital of the Empire.Cusco is the most visited department in Peru. It is home to the city of Cusco, the Valley of the Incas, and the citadel of Picchu, one of the Wonders of the World. The city of Cusco was the capital of the Empire and was placed on the World Heritage Site by the Nations in 1983.Incan monuments are throughout the city and are some of the most impressive in Peru. Additionally, after conquest by the Spanish, they attempted to bring their architectural and cultural influence to the city and rid of the Incan presence. Their goal was only partially successful as their architecture and culture did remain. With the occurrence of earthquakes and other natural event over the centuries, the more well-built Incan buildings also remained. This is what has given Cusco its unique blend of culture.File:80 - Machu Picchu - Juin 2009 - edit.2.jpg|thumb|250px|The citadel of Picchu, Perus largest tourist attraction.It is the most touristically developed area in Peru; tourism is by far the largest industry and infrastructure is extremely well developed. The city has thousands of hotel rooms ranging from hostels to five-star hotels. Gastronomy is representative of all of Peru as well as local cuisine. International cuisine is also largely present in the citys many restaurants. The city has a wide variety of languages due to the large tourist presence with many common languages spoken other than Spanish being English, German, and French. In addition to these languages, Quechua is spoken by many residents of the city along with Spanish. Most tourism agencies have offices in this city.Major attractions include the historic downtown with colonial architecture and the main plaza, Sacsayhuamn, the palace of Inca Roca, neighborhood of San Blas, and the archeological sites of Qenko, Pukapukara, and Tambomachay. The Valley has a multitude of picturesque towns such as Psac, Maras, and Chinchero. Additionally, a variety of archeological sites such as Ollantaytambo are located in the valley. Arguably the most popular tourist attraction in Peru is located a few hours from Cusco by train: the citadel of Picchu. These ruins are beyond description and are the most beautiful and important legacy of the Incan people. The site is one of the Wonders of the World and a World Heritage Site. Picchu can be accessed by the PeruRail train or a hike on the Trail. Other routes like the Salkantay trek, Inca Jungle Trek or even the Cacao & Coffee route have been recently opened to access MachuPicchu.Huancavelica File:Nazca colibri.jpg|thumb|250px|The lines viewed from the air. The Huancavelica department is the least developed and poorest department of Peru. Despite this, the department has a rich history and maintains evidence of it through beautiful colonial architecture and archeological monuments. This department was inhabited by the Wari and the Chancas before being conquered and incorporated into the Empire. Following this, with the conquest of Peru, Huancavelica became part of the of Peru. The Spanish established themselves in this area because of silver and mercury mines found here. They left magnificent colonial mansions and churches in the capital city, also known as Huancavelica.HunucoThe Hunuco region is divided into two distinct geographical regions, the sierra and the jungle. The capital city, also known as Huanuco is in the Andean sierra. It was founded in 1539 by the Spanish and ever since it has been a site of colonial architecture typical of the Peruvian Andes. On the opposite side of the department, in the jungle area, is Maria, the departments second largest city. It is home to the Maria National Park which contains a variety of flora such as orchids, cats claw, and dragons blood, as well as animals such as little spotted cats, jaguars, reptiles, sachavacas, oilbirds, Cock-of-the-rock, and the monkey. A tourist destination in this area is the Owls Cave home to nocturnal birds and the Turkeys Cave home to abundant vegetation. Ica The Ica region was the location of various ancient civilizations that literally left their mark. One of the most popular attractions of this area are the lines, an enigma that modern archeologists have not been able to figure out. These lines stretch for miles in the desert and form pictures of animals and figures only viewable from the air. The National Reservation is another point on this circuit which attracts many ecological and cultural tourists alike as it is a refuge to sea lions, otters, penguins, dolphins, more than 200 species of birds from flamingos, waders, and guano birds.  Additionally in the preserve, there are magnificent beaches, like La Mina, La Catedral and Mendieta beaches, and beautiful rock formations. Elsewhere in the department there are a variety of vineyards which produce pisco and wines. Wine tasting in this area is among the best in Peru. Another popular destination is the oasis of Huacachina which is visited by tourists on behalf of its beauty and for the fact that it was the birthplace of Afro-Peruvian music.JunnThe region of Junn, just as Hunuco, is divided by the sierra and the jungle. The western side is made up of steep mountain ranges, and the east is made up of jungle vegetation. The capital city, Huancayo, is one of the largest of Peru and is in the River valley. The area in western Junn was one of the first settled by the Spanish and preserves much of the colonial architecture from that time. Tourist attractions include the Convent of Santa Rosa of Ocopa which contains a library with over 25,000 volumes. The city of Jauja was the first capital of the of Peru and still contains many of the remnants of its important colonial past. The city ofTarma, known as the city of flowers, has a spectacular climate and a picturesque countryside. Other important attractions are the National Reservation and the Chacamarca Historic Sanctuary.La LibertadLocated in the region of La Libertad, the city of Trujillo is known as the city of eternal spring and tourists are attracted to its pre-Incan monuments such as the Huaca of the Sun and the Moon temple, El Brujo, and most notably the ancient Chimu city of Chan. To the west of Trujillo is the beach resort of Huanchaco which is famous for the caballitos de totora &mdash; boats used by local fisherman since ancient times. Trujillan colonial architecture is some of the finest in Peru. The historic centre contains magnificent examples of colonial architecture and ambiance including various churches, the main cathedral, the main plaza, and 100-year-old colonial houses.LambayequeRoyal Tombs of Sipan Museum in the city of Lambayeque The department of Lambayeque is one of the most touristic in the nation. It was home to the ancient civilization of the Moche who created some of the most ingenious monuments and works of art known to ancient Peru. In 1987, royal tombs of ancient Moche rulers were excavated. The artifacts found in the tomb were transferred to the Royal Tomb of Sipan Museum in the city of Lambayeque. Also there are the Brunning Museum and the Sicn Museum in Ferreafe. These museums display the magnificent ancient artwork produced by the ancient Moche. The pyramids of Tcume are also in this area. In 2007, more than 306,000 tourists visited the museums of Lambayeque.(http://www.perualdesnudo.com/turismo_ene08_306mil-turistas-museos-lambayeque.htm) There are more than 20 adobe pyramids all of which are 40 meters (131 feet) in height and are in an abundance of vegetation and wildlife. Also in the area is the Chaparr Ecological Reserve which has abundant biodiversity.The department of Lambayeque boasts some of the best cuisine in Peru. The most popular dish in this area is duck with rice. The city of Chiclayo, the capital of the department, is the second largest in the Peruvian north and has a vibrant nightlife.LimaThe department of Lima is the most populous of Peru since the city of Lima is there. The city of Lima is the transportation, cultural, economic, social, political, and touristic hub of the nation. Because Peru is a highly centralized nation, much its organization and commerce are centered on this city.Lima was founded in 1535 by the conquistador Pizarro. What he founded is now known as the Centre of Lima which contains much of Limas colonial architecture which is known to be arguably the best in America. During the colonial era, Lima was the centre of Spanish rule in America and administration of the continent passed through this city. Because of this, a large colonial presence was built up until independence. After independence, cultures from all over the world began to melt together until creating what Lima is today.An example of this union of cultures is the citys gastronomy. Limas cuisine is a combination representing all the groups of people who are part of the city. European, Asian, and Andean cuisine was mixed together to create what is now known as Limean cuisine. The food sector is an extremely important part of Limas tourist economy as many of South Americas best restaurants and chefs are there.Not only is the mixing of cuisines evident in Lima but the mixing of cultures is as well. Nothing exemplifies this more than the multiple museums found throughout Lima. Among these, the largest and most recognized are the National Museum, National Museum of Anthropology, Arqueology and History, Rafael Larco Herrera Archeological Museum, National Museum of Peruvian Culture, and the Museum of Italian Art. The district of Miraflores is one that is frequently appealing to tourists because of the multitude of restaurants, hotels, parks, events, and attractions in the area. The District along with the District has a vibrant nightlife with various nightclubs and pubs. Peas a special type of venue are popular in Barranco among tourists.The of the Reserve and the Park of the Exposition are in the city and are one of Limas main greenspaces. Lomas de Lanchay National Reserve is 105 kilometers north of Lima and is home to a variety of wildlife and vegetation. Caral, located in the middle of the desert, is the oldest city in the Hemisphere as it was built 5,000 years ago. Lunahuana, to the south of Lima, is a centre of adventure tourism with white water rafting and other activities. The beach of Asia, 100 kilometers to the south, is popular among residents as a summer getaway. Loreto Loreto is the largest yet least-populated department in Peru. Its geography is made up of dense Amazonic vegetation characterizing the type of tourism that occurs there. Iquitos, the capital, is the largest city in the Amazon and has various tourist attractions. The city is home to European architecture brought by the boom at the end of the 19th century. One of the main attractions is the Iron House, a building designed by the French architect Gustave Eiffel who designed the Tower. The city has buildings constructed during the Nouveau era.The Belen district of Iquitos is in sharp contrast to the Art Nouveau architecture of other parts of the city. Belen lies on a series of canals and is often referred to as the Venice of the Peruvian jungle. Buildings are built atop rafts and other flotation devices to protect from flooding. Loretos rivers contain many beautiful beaches that serve as day trips from Iquitos. The region of Loreto contains numerous national parks as well as private reserves. These protected areas are home to an extreme diversity of animal and plant life unmatched in the world. These areas are served by organized guides many of which can be obtained in Lima or Iquitos.Madre de Diosriver banks of Lake Sandoval in Madre de DiosThe Madre de Dios department contains some of the most pristine virgin rainforest on the earth. The department is criss-crossed by rivers; boats are the primary mode of transport in the region. The capital, Maldonado, is the tourist hub of the department and is a necessary stop to gain access to the departments national parks.The National Park is the largest protected area in the department and the most diverse. It is home to 800 species of birds and 200 species of mammals. This park set the record for the greatest amount of bird sightings in one day with 324 species of birds seen.The Tambopata-Candamo National Park is the most biodiverse area in the world with the world record for the greatest diversity among species of butterflies. Another protected area in this department is the National Park. One of the reasons for tourist attraction is the lack of population in the department. The Madre de Dios department is the least populated in Peru. Because of this, the rainforest has remained almost untouched. Accessibility to the department is easy as there are daily flights to Maldonado from Lima and Cusco. There is a road connecting it to the Cusco department that is being repaved as part of the Highway.MoqueguaThe department of Moquegua in southern Peru is an area characterized by picturesque towns whose charm is that they retain their centuries-old traditions. Moquegua is a wine growing region and wine tasting is activity which can be enjoyed by tourists. The region is also a producer of the Peruvian beverage, Pisco.The quaint capital city, also known as Moquegua, is characterized by traditional houses with slanted roofs. The main square of the city contains a fountain designed and built by Eiffel, the designer of the Tower. The main cathedral, known as the Cathedral of Santo Domingo, is home to the remains of Santa Fortunata, an early Christian martyr. Outside of the city, beaches along the coast have white sand and beautiful rock formations. The port of Ilo, a commercial centre, is west of the capital on the coast.PascoThe geography of the Pasco department is as varied as its people. The western half of the department is characterized by the Andes while the eastern half is made up of Amazonic tropical rainforest. In the 19th century, German and Austrian immigrants populated the area and brought their European architecture with them. Oxapampa and Pozuzo are picturesque towns and are beautiful examples of Austrian and German architecture. Further adding to their charm is their jungle setting. The descendants of the immigrants still live much how their ancestors lived, cultivating crops. Pasco is home to the National Park which contains 350 species of orchids, more than 520 species of birds, and nearly 125 species of mammals like the otter, the jaguar, the bear, and the dwarf brocket deer, all of which are endangered and nearing extinction.PiuraThe department of Piura is one of the most touristical in the country. The department is characterized by the Desert in the west and the Andes in the east. The capital city, also known as Piura, was the first city founded by the Spanish in Peru. Catacaos a town 12 kilometers from the city has a beautiful main plaza and a magnificent cathedral. This town has many works of pottery and its restaurants are exquisite. The Piuran coast is home to many attractions and receives tourists from all over the world.Mancora, in northern Piura, is one of the largest beach resorts in Peru. It is commonly visited by international tourists as well as domestic tourists. Not only are the beaches known for their quality and secludedness, their waves are a favorite among surfers. The town of Mancora is home to nightclubs and bars frequented by youth throughout the year. Cabo Blanco, south of Mancora, was once home to Hemingway. Cabo Blanco is known to have some of the best waves for surfing in all of Peru.PunoFile:Intikawan Amantani.jpg|thumb|250px|Titicaca in PunoThe department of Puno was home to the great civilization of the Tiwanaku who were once the most advanced civilization of all the people. The area was conquered by the Incas in the 15th century and by the Empire in the 16th century.The capital city, also known as Puno, serves as magnificent evidence of the combination of cultures that have left their mark. Puno lies on the shores of Titicaca and is the folklore capital of Peru. The citys beauty is characterized by its location next to Titicaca and its colonial architecture. The nearby city of Juliaca is a transportation hub for the department. Nearby are the Chullpas de Sillustani a monument built by the Collas which is still perfectly preserved today. Titicaca is home to the Uros, artificially made floating islands made of totora reeds. National Reservation is refuge to many species of plants and animals, as well as breathtaking stretches of Titicaca.San MartnFile:Huallaga River.jpg|thumb|250px|The River in San MartinThe San Martin department is home to  both high and low jungles. One key attraction is the Abiseo National Park. This park is registered as a World Heritage Site by the Nations and is home to 36 archeological sites. In addition to this cultural aspect, the park contains 980 species of flora, particularly bromeliads, orchids, and ferns, 220 species of birds and over 50 species of mammals such as the woolly monkey, the Andean deer, the bear, and the jaguar, all of which are endangered and nearing extinction. The department is dotted with lakes, hot springs with medicinal properties, and waterfalls. In addition to the Abiseo National Park, San Martn is home to the Mayo Protection Forest and the Cordillera Azul National Park both equal in excellence to Rio Abiseo.TacnaFile:Tacna Pampa Del Cerro Intiorko.jpg|thumb|250px|Monument of Alto de la Allianza in TacnaThe department of Tacna has a mild climate and a strong economy. There are many wineries in the region as well as pisco producers. The capital city, also named as Tacna, is known to be the most patriotic city of Peru. There are many monuments throughout the city honoring the heroes of the War of Independence and the of the Pacific. The city preserves much of its colonial architecture and retains colonial churches, mansions, and other buildings. The beaches of the department are equally popular among tourists and residents alike and become popular during the summer.TumbesFile:Punta Sal, Peru.jpg|thumb|250px|Sal, Tumbes.The Tumbes region is the smallest in Peru and also the northernmost. It is near the border with Ecuador. Despite its size, it is home to extremely varied terrain which attracts equally varied tourists. The coast of the department is defined by white sand beaches such as Sal and Zorritos. The protected areas of de Amotape National Park, Reserved Zone, and the de Tumbes National Sanctuary are all visited by tourists worldwide. The de Amotape National Park is home wildlife such as the condor, the spotted cat, the deer, the peccary, the northern anteater, the bear, the grey deer, and the Guayaquil squirrel. The mangroves forests are home to birds such as black hawks, egrets, and other types of birds. The swamps contain crocodile farms, a species nearing extinction. The departments cuisine is exquisite and uses local resources such as black scallops and crabs. More than 50% of the land area of this department is in national parks.UcayaliThe region of Ucayali is in the Amazon. Its capital, Pucallpa, is the second largest city in the Peruvian Amazon after Iquitos. The department is home to a variety of geological monuments such as waterfalls. Tourist lodges are abundant, allowing visitors to experience the Amazon firsthand. The large bodies of water such as the jungle rivers and lakes are perfect for aquatic sports such as water skiing, rowing, and fishing. The Ucayali river passes through the department and is the most important mode of transportation. Tourist information and assistance The Peruvian national tourist office, iper, gives free and neutral information for travelers that covers destinations, attractions, maps, recommended routes, and recommended tourism companies in Peru. It provides assistance on procedures and helps tourists who have problems (complaints, claims and suggestions for destinations and tourism companies (lodging, travel agencies, cruisers, airlines, buses, etc.).) World Heritage Sites The following monuments are designated as Heritage Sites by the Nations organization, UNESCO.  These monuments receive many tourists due to their uniqueness, aesthetic attraction, and cultural significance.* Caral* Chan Chan Archaeological Zone* Chavin de Huantar (Archaeological site)* City of Cusco* centre of Lima* Historic Sanctuary of Machu Picchu* centre of Arequipa* National Park* Lines and Geoglyphs of Nazca and Pampas de Jumana* National Park* Abiseo National Park See also * tourist information and assistance* of sites of interest in the Lima Metropolitan area* of national parks in Peru* cuisine* Peru References  External links * Everything Peru- Hotel & Restaurant Reviews and Ratings* Peruvian governmental tourism agency* Prom Peru*  Estadsticas de Visitantes de los Museos y Sitios Arqueolgicos del Per (1992-2008)* Por las Rutas del Per - Tourism in Peru* Tourism in Peru* Peru travel guide and tourist informationi Peruen el Perau Proudi Peruno Peru
17703110
Ferrexpo
 footnotes   Ferrexpo plc () is a leading Swiss-based iron-ore producer operating in Ukraine. It is a constituent of the 250 Index.HistoryThe business was founded in 1960 to exploit iron-ore reserves in Poltava in Ukraine.(Ferrexpo appoints new CFO Ambition, 3 December 2007) The business was privatised in 2001 by the Ukrainian Government. In 1977 it started selling its product in the form of pellets. It was first listed on the Stock Exchange in 2007.(OperationsThe Company sells most of its product to the steel mills of Europe.(Ferrexpo has attractions despite founders big slice) It is organised into the following units:* Ukraine - mining and sale of ore* Switzerland - sale of oreOwnershipThe founder, Zhevago, owns 51% of the company.(Ferrexpo must show its mettle to woo investors)ReferencesExternal links* Official site
17713595
Gold_Harbour,_British_Columbia
:This page is for the former mining town in the Queen Charlotte Islands.  For the bay on the island of South Georgia, see HarbourGold Harbour, was a gold and silver mine and camp on Mitchell Inlet, part of Sound on Island in the Charlotte Islands of the North Coast of British Columbia, Canada.  It is notable as the location of the first lode mine worked in what is now British Columbia.The mine property, first prospected by Captain Mitchell of the Bay Company in 1852 in the wake of the Charlottes Gold Rush, and between $5,000 and $75,000 in gold was taken out by Major W. Downie by 1859.  The sixteen claims by then forming the property and owned by J. McLellan  were bonded Nuba Mining in 1907 but the mine did not have a successful showing and the company surrendered its claims in 1912, with McLellan continuing his own work on the site until 1933. A good many Japanese nationals worked at this mine.  In that year Harbour Mining Limited milled tailings and a new cut and is reported to have recovered $179,000 in gold, but operations were suspended on December 13 of that year.The Gold Harbour area is a Historic Site of Canada.See also*TasuReferences*BC MINFILE Record Summary
17736274
East_Kutai_Regency
File:Lokasi Kalimantan Timur Kabupaten Kutai Timur.svg|thumb|Location of East Kutai Regency KalimantanEast Kutai Regency, or in , is a regency of Kalimantan province, Indonesia. It has an area of 35,747,50 km(www.kutaitimur.go.id) and a population of 253,904 at the 2010 Census.(www.kutaitimur.go.id) Sangatta is the capital of the regency.The regency is subdivided into 18 subdistricts.(There are several mining companies with concessions around this regency, including Prima Coal, one of the largest coal mining companies in Indonesia. External links * ReferencesKutai TimurKutai WtanKutai Timur
17770467
Bee_Gees_Gold
Bee Gees Gold was a compilation album, released in America and Japan only, that focused on the early hits of Bee Gees. Labeled as Volume 1, it featured all their Top 40 hits between 1967 and 1972 (except for First of May which was replaced with the Gees 1st album cut I Cant See Nobody), this album was intended to replace the two previous hits compilations, of Bee Gees and of Bee Gees, Volume 2. It reached #50 on Billboards album chart during a time when The Bee Gees were topping the charts with their new R&B/Disco sound found on their then current album of the World. Gold went gold in America in January 1978 and has sold 1.3 million copies to date. A second volume was never issued as Gees Greatest was issued instead in 1980 which summed up the disco years from 1975-1979.Strangely, it was never released on CD, though the previous two compilations mentioned above were released in the late 1980s. Cassette versions were available well into the 90s. Track listing Side One# Can You Mend a Broken Heart? 3:57# Holiday 2:52# To Love Somebody 2:58# Massachusetts 2:22# Words 3:13# Days 3:46Side Two# Run To Me 3:10# Gotta Get a Message to You 2:59# My World 4:18# I Cant See Nobody 3:43# Started a Joke 3:04# York Mining Disaster 1941 2:09Gees GoldGees Gold
17796301
Gold_Coast_United_FC
socks2FFFFFFGold Coast United Football Club is a professional football (soccer) club based on the Gold Coast, Queensland, Australia. It was officially announced as an expansion team for the A-Leagues 2009-2010 season on 28 August 2008. It is the second bid accepted by the league, with an unrelated bid known as Gold Coast Galaxy FC preceding it. The club is owned by Clive Palmer, the wealthiest man in Queensland.()HistoryConsideration for 2008-2009 leagueA consortium under the working title of Gold Coast Galaxy FC, led by real estate magnate Fred Taplin was, along with , was considered for admission for the 2008-2009 season but Federation Australia delayed expansion of the league until at least the 2009-2010 season.()() The Galaxy was strongly expected to join in the 2008-2009 season along with Queensland Thunder, expanding the league to ten teams. Although the Galaxy bid appeared to have good support, the Thunder bid appeared much less secure, particularly after a major financial backer pulled out of the franchise on 5 March 2008. The FFA determined on 11 March that neither team would be granted entry in the best interests of the league, given that a nine team format was generally unfavoured.  Clive Palmer, who originally owned the club fully, sold 10 percent ownership of Gold Coast to close friends who live in Melbourne at the start of 2007 when the club were not fully expected to be given a license into the A-League.During the off-season prior to the 2008-2009 season, a number of players were touted to join the club and it made some tentative signings, including former Roar manager Bleiberg,(Coast reaches for stars) goalkeeper Higgins,() and former Phoenix Brazilian player Felipe. Without entry into 2008-2009 season, the players became free agents and can still sign for the 2009-2010 season depending on the terms of their next club contracts. The franchise was also linked at times with signing Kanu as their marquee player.(Gold Coast Keen on Kanu SBS The World Game website, Retrieved on June 6th, 2008)The name Galaxy was an interim name and it was always undetermined whether or not that name would be used by the club as a permanent name. Galaxy was said to have ties to American League Soccer club Angeles Galaxy, which would have meant pre-season warm-up matches and possible player sharing opportunities. Indeed, in February 2008 there was even talk of Beckham turning out for a pre-season match.(Gold Coast Chasing Beckham Gold Coast Bulletin, February 22nd, 2008 Retrieved on June 6th, 2008) The Galaxy consortium had planned to market the club deep into Northern South Wales, down to Harbour.Consideration for 2009-2010 leagueOnce the FFA had decided not to have new franchises in 2008-2009, the focus turned to 2009-2010. The club is 70 percent owned by Clive Palmer, the richest man in Queensland, and the other 30 percent is owned by 3 unidentified men. The Galaxy consortiums chances of entering the A-League were dealt a severe blow in June 2008 when a rival consortium headed by real estate and mining businessman Clive Palmer entered talks with the FFA.(Billionaire eclipses Galaxy A-League bid Gold Coast Bulletin, 30 May 2008 Retrieved on 6 June 2008) On 3 June 2008, Fred Taplin announced that the Gold Coast Galaxy had dropped out of the race for the Gold Coast licence and a place in the A-League in the interests of football.() The same day, FFA chief Buckley confirmed that the Palmer consortium had succeeded in securing the franchise.(FFA backs Clive Palmers Gold Coast A-League bid Courier Mail June 4th, 2008 Retrieved on June 6th, 2008) On 6 June, Palmer signed a provisional agreement with the FFA to field a team in the 2009-2010 season. The press conference was held at Stadium, further reinforcing the suggestion that the new franchise will play at the 27,000 capacity stadium.(Gold Coast accept A-League licence Morning Herald 6 June 2008 Retrieved on 6 June 2008) Palmer declared that he would build a side capable of winning the League in its first season.(Gold Coasts Glitzy A-League Entry FourFourTwo Magazine online, 7 June 2008 Retrieved on 7 June 2008)2010-11 SeasonOn the 9 April 2010 it was reported that Palmer had ended his financial support of Gold Coast United, putting the club at risk of instant closure. However, this did not eventuate, and Palmer retained control of the club.() Gold Coast United chief executive Clive Mensink denied the club will fold, but the club will be forced to change its ownership structure.()And after crucial recruitings of Djite, Perchtold, and the regaining of Smeltz, would lead to the most dangerous attack in the whole of the A-League.Colours and badgeThe colours of the club are yellow and royal blue. These colours are synonymous with, and representative of, the Gold Coast.() The clubs alternate jersey is all white.Company Queensland Nickel are Uniteds title sponsor, with their emblem firmly emblazoned on the clubs strip and sponsorship boards. Other sponsors to appear on Uniteds strip include Modern Solar,() WAECO() and Westpac.()StadiumThe clubs home ground is Park. It shares this ground with the Coast Titans NRL team. It is located in the growth suburb of Robina, next to Robina railway station. Skilled Park is able to seat 27,400 people. Low crowds in 2009 had led to the club capping crowds at 5000. The lowest crowd attendance was 1,714 when they played the Queensland Fury at Skilled Park, on December 1, 2010 in a 2-1 loss.RivalriesDue to its proxmity to Brisbane, Gold Coast Uniteds match will naturally be against the Roar. There is also an existing rivalry with North Queensland FC given both clubs status as Queensland clubs and both clubs starting in the same season. This rivalry was intensified by Gold Coasts 5-0 thrashing of North Queensland early in the season. Gold Coast also compete with Glory for the Ore Cup, with owners and mining magnates Palmer and Sage being the inspiration behind the fixture.Supporter GroupsGold Coast United has a relationship with the GCUSC, the major supporter group following the club situated in Bay 30 at games.Current squadSenior squad  (on loan from Hearts)Youth squad Notable Former PlayersAustralia*  Caravella*  Culina*  Djite*  ulbi*  PantelidisBrazil*  AndersonNetherlands*  van den BrinkNew Zealand* Smeltz Scotland*  Miller All-time A-League win/loss (including finals) Last updated 15 February 2011International teams wins/lossReferencesExternal links*Gold Coast United  Coast UnitedCoast United Football ClubCoast United Football Club FCCoast United Football ClubCoast United FCja:FCCoast United FCCoast UnitedCoast United FCCoast United FC
17814157
Wandjuk_Marika
Wandjuk Marika OBE, born 1927, died 1987, was an Australian Aboriginal painter, actor, composer and land rights activist. He was a member of the Riratjingu clan of the Yolngu people of north-east Land, Australia.(MARIKA, Wandjuk, Foreword, in ISAACS, Jennifer, Australian Dreaming: 40,000 Years of Aboriginal History, 1980, ISBN 0-7254-0884-7, p.5)(Biography of Wandjuk Marika, Gallery of New South Wales) (Wandjuk Marika, Australian Broadcasting Corporation, December 1, 2003)His paintings expressed his peoples traditional religious beliefs, and included Djangkawu Story (1960) and Birth of the Djangkawu Children of Yelangbara (1982).((Wandjuk Marika, The Concise Grove Dictionary of Art, University Press) Djangkawu is the founding ancestor of the Riratjingu in traditional stories.(He co-founded the Aboriginal Arts Board in 1973, and became Chairman in 1976.(Australia Council, Annual Report, 1976/77 (Canberra: AGPS, 1978), pp 7 and 8.) He was awarded the of the British Empire that same year.(Wandjuk Marika, Broadcasting Corporation, December 1, 2003)His name was given to the Wandjuk Marika 3D Memorial Award, a category of the prestigious Aboriginal & Torres Strait Islander Art Award, awarded annually by the and Art Gallery of the Northern Territory.(24th Telstra National Aboriginal & Torres Strait Islander Art Award, Northern Territory government website) His portrait hangs in the National Portrait Gallery in Canberra(National Portrait Gallery), and several of his paintings feature in the Gallery of New South Wales.(As an actor, Marika appeared in the films the Green Ants Dream (1984) and Initiation (1987). He also appeared in the television miniseries of the Sun. He was both actor and composer in Where the Green Ants Dream.(Wandjuk Marika on IMDB)He was the author of The Aboriginal Childrens History of Australia.(MARIKA, Wandjuk, The Aboriginal Childrens History of Australia, Rigby, ISBN 0727002368, 1977)Marika wrote frequent but unsuccessful letters to the Australian federal government to protest against mining activities on Yolngu lands.(Wandjuk Marika was the uncle of Marika.(Further reading* Wandjuk Marika: Life Story, by Jennifer ISAACS, of Queensland Press, ISBN 0702225649, 1995References
17843289
BlackRock_World_Mining_Trust
BlackRock World Mining Trust () is a large British trust dedicated to investments in mining and metals. Established in 1993, the company is a constituent of the 250 Index. The Chairman is Anthony Lea. It is based in London.The fund is managed by the UK subsidiary of BlackRock.References*  Official sitezh:
17859655
Billy_Felton
 ntupdate   William Felton (1 August 1900  22 April 1977) was an English professional footballer who played as a full back for a number of football league clubs, including Sheffield Wednesday, Manchester City and Tottenham Hotspur in the 1920s and 1930s, before a long spell with Altrincham. He earned a solitary cap for England in 1925.CareerEarly careerFelton was born in Tyne and Wear into a mining family.() His cousins included Barkas (Bradford City, Manchester City and England), Barkas (Halifax Town), Barkas (Huddersfield Town, Birmingham and Chelsea) and Barkas (South Shields, Gateshead and Liverpool). While working as a coal-miner, he played amateur football for various colliery teams before joining Jarrow in the Eastern League. In January 1921, he joined his first League club, Grimsby Town playing in the Third Division. For the 192122 season, Grimsby joined the newly formed Third Division North and Felton soon became a regular in the first team. Grimsby finished the season in third place, but only the champions were promoted.Sheffield WednesdayIn December 1922, he moved to Second Division Sheffield Wednesday for a fee of 1500,( making his debut on 1 January 1923 in a goalless draw against Southampton. He soon became a fixture in the team and gained a reputation as a tough, excellent, uncompromising tackler, comfortable at either right or left back, with excellent powers of recovery.In 192324 he missed a handful of games, as Wednesday finished in eight place. The following season he was a virtual ever-present, missing only two games as Wednesday again finished in a mid-table position. Success eventually came in 192526 when Felton formed a full-back pairing with Blenkinsop, which helped Wednesday claim the Second Division title by three points over Derby County.His only international appearance came against France on 21 May 1925. In this match, Englands goalkeeper Fox had to leave the field in the 75th minute following a head injury sustained in a charge by Dewaquez when scoring a goal, and was prevented from completing his sole appearance for England. Following an earlier withdrawal by Gibbins, the scorer of Englands opening goal, England finished with nine men, but managed to hang on to win the game 32.(France 2 - England 3: 21 May 1925 (Match report))Once in the First Division, Felton lost his regular place to Tommy Walker who had been signed from Bradford City in March 1926. Although Felton remained at Hillsborough for three First Division seasons, his appearances were now infrequent and, in March 1929 he was transferred to Manchester City. In his six years with Wednesday, he made a total of 164 appearances in all competitions.Manchester CityFelton spent three years at Road in the First Division. In 192930 he was paired up with John Ridley as City finished the season in third place, although they were thirteen points behind the champions, Feltons former club, Sheffield Wednesday.In March 1932, Felton played for Manchester City in an Cup semi-final against Arsenal. In the final minute of the match Felton lost possession of the ball to Arsenal forward Jack Lambert who set up Bastin for the winning goal. Though earlier in the match Felton had prevented a goal by clearing an Alex James shot off the line, he was deemed responsible for the defeat, and never played for the club again, being transferred almost immediately to London club Tottenham Hotspur of the Second Division.() In total Felton made 83 appearances for Manchester City.Tottenham HotspurAt Tottenham, be became team captain( and in 193233 he missed only one match as he led the club to promotion as runners-up by one point to Stoke City. Once back in the First Division, Felton again lost his place, this time to Channell and at the end of the 193334 season he was placed on the transfer list. In his two years at Hart Lane he played a total of 75 games, scoring once from a penalty, in a 11 draw with Arsenal on 11 September 1933.(Spurs results - 1933-1934)Altrincham Spurs had been looking for a transfer fee of 1000, but eventually accepted an offer of 500 from Altrincham of the County League. Felton made his debut for Altrincham in an Cup tie against Timperley Athletic. He was immediately appointed team captain and went on to help Altrincham clinch the runners-up spot in the Cheshire League for the next two seasons.At Moss Lane he was a near ever-present during his five seasons. Rarely injured, he led the side with dedication and total professionalism. Playing primarily as a left back he was just as comfortable on the right. He took on the responsibility as Altrinchams dead ball specialist, even though he had only scored one goal in his professional career. Unusually, he even managed to score a trick against Hurst in an 81 win, two of the goals being penalties and the third a free kick.Unfortunately, after finishing second in the league in successive seasons (193435 & 193536), Altrincham started to struggled to survive financially. Felton was appointed player/coach for his final season (193839) before retiring just prior to his 39th birthday and the onset of the World War. In his five seasons at Moss Lane, he made a total of 210 appearances, scoring 17 goals.ReferencesExternal links*England profile on www.englandstats.com*England profile on www.englandfc.com*Sheffield Wednesday profile*Altrincham profile
17871497
Yabulu,_Queensland
 location1 Yabulu is a small residential suburb approximately 25 kilometres north of Townsville, Queensland, Australia.  At the 2006 census the population of Yabulu was 603.(The New Townsville City: Townsville State Suburbs, accessed 10 June 2008.)Yabulu is the site of a major nickel and cobalt refinery, owned by Clive Palmer.  Facilities located at Yabulu include a Mobil service station. Queensland Nickel Yabulu Refinery The Yabulu refinery became operational in 1974 after completion of the Greenvale to Yabulu railway line.  Mining at Greenvale took place between 1974 and 1992 during which nickel laterite ore was transported to the Yabulu refinery by rail and processed up until 1993.  Importation of ore from mines in Caledonia, Indonesia, and the Philippines commenced in 1986; ore from these countries continues to be processed to this day.(Nickel and Cobalt Refining by QNI Pty. Ltd. Yabulu, Qld, accessed 10 June 2008.)Approximately 750 people are employed by the refinery, which produces 32,000 tonnes of nickel and 1,900 tonnes of cobalt per year.(BHP Billiton - Yabulu Refinery, accessed 10 June 2008.) See also *Billiton Ravensthorpe Nickel ProjectReferencesExternal links* University of Queensland: Queensland Places: Yabulu
17886329
Kentucky_Space
Kentucky Space is a non-profit consortium of private and public universities, companies, and other organizations with the goal of designing and leading innovative space missions within realistic budgets and objectives. The enterprise is supported by the Space Grant Consortium and developed out of the programs of the Science and Technology Corporation. Consortium * Kentucky Science and Technology Corporation* Kentucky Council on Postsecondary Education* Kentucky Science and Engineering Foundation* Space Grant Consortium* Belcan* State University* State University* of Kentucky - Space Systems Laboratory* of Louisville* Kentucky University* Community and Technical College System Partners * Ames Research Center* Kentucky Virtual Campus Projects * KySat-1, a CubeSat designed by Kentucky Space which defines a standard reusable bus.* Space Express 1, a sub-orbital rocket payload launched in 2007 from Sands Missile Range.* Balloon-1, a balloon payload launched from Bowling Green, Kentucky on July 14, 2008.()* Space Express 2, an measurement unit payload designed for a Garvey Spacecraft Corporation rocket. Asteroid mining On August 4-6, 2008 a group of space professionals, entrepreneurs, venture capitalists and mining engineers gathered in Pleasant Hill, Kentucky to discuss the development of an asteroid resource development business strategy.  The discussion ranged from space technology, propulsion, and orbital mechanics to space law, markets, value proposition and financial plans.() See also * of space agencies References  External links * Official Site for Kentucky Space* Official KSGC website* Kentucky Science and Technology Corporation* Space Systems Laboratory (University of Kentucky)__NOTOC__
17904750
Fran_Logan
Francis Fran Michael Logan (born 25 February 1956) is an Australian politician who is currently a member of the Australian Legislative Assembly representing the electorate of Cockburn in the southern suburbs of Perth for the Labor Party. He was first elected at the 2001 election following the retirement of Bill Thomas, and served in the Ministry as Minister for Energy until the Labor governments defeat at the 2008 election.() Logan emigrated to Western Australia in 1980 after travelling around Asia, leaving the UK after the Thatcher government was elected. Having trained as a mechanic, he worked in the aircraft and mining industries and later completed a of Arts with Honours at University.() Employed as a trade union official with the Manufacturing Workers Union from 1986() until winning preselection for the seat of Cockburn on the retirement of Bill Thomas. Logan went on to win the seat at the election, and subsequently retained it at both the 2005 and 2008 elections.()  Early in his time in office, he was appointed Parliamentary Secretary to the Minister for the Environment. Following the 2005 election, he was promoted to the Ministry on 10 March 2005, becoming the Minister of Housing and Works and Minister for Heritage, as well as the Minister assisting the Minister for Planning andInfrastructure (MacTiernan). On 3 February 2006, Logan was appointed Minister for Energy, Science and Innovation in the Ministry. Following a reshuffle of the Ministry on 13 December 2006, he gained the Resources portfolio as well as Industry and Enterprise, whilst losing Science and Innovation to Carpenter.In May 2008, Logan caused a political storm when he admitted that he badgered a female ministerial staffer into having sex with him and another employee of the government. The woman involved had stated that Logan had propositioned her to take part in a threesome on more than one occasion.()() Carpenter refused to sack Logan over the scandal, after Logan claimed it was a joke.()Following Labors loss at the 2008 state election, he formally ceased his duties as a Minister on 23 September 2008, and became the Shadow Minister for Water, Consumer Protection and Industrial Relations.References
17917486
Atlas_Iron
Atlas Iron an Australian mining company and an iron ore explorer, developer and producer, predominantley active in the Pilbara region.(Atlas Iron Securities Exchange website, accessed: 25 November 2010)The company operates two iron ore mines in Australia, the mine, which opened in 2008,(Pardoo Atlas Iron website, accessed: 24 November 2010) and the mine, which opened in July 2010.(Wodgina Atlas website, accessed: 24 November 2010)Company historyAtlas was listed on the Securities Exchange on the 17 December 2004,( under the name of Atlas Gold Limited. On 30 March 2006, the company changed its name to Atlas Iron Limited.(ATLAS IRON LIMITED (AGO) delisted.com.au, accessed: 25 November 2010)Atlas became Australias newest iron ore producer when it commenced production at Pardoo in late 2008.(Atlas misses out as orders dry up Age, published: 21 October 2008, accessed: 24 November 2010)The company plans to lift production from its Pilbara operations to 12 million tonnes of iron ore by 2012, up from 6.5 million tonnes in late 2010. Of these, 10 million tonnes are scheduled to come from the new Turner River hub, which is to blend and process ore from the companys northern Pilbara projects, located at Wodgina, Abydos and Mt Webber.(Atlas Iron lifts exports ahead of schedule Sydney Morning Herald, published: 1 November 2010, accessed: 24 November 2010)Atlas is hopeful to come to terms with BHP Billiton in regards to using the companys rail infrastructure, the railway, in the future. BHP, in late 2010, had agreed to a joint feasibility study into how an arrangement might work.(Atlas Iron optimistic about using BHP rail line to Port Hedland ABC Rural, published: 23 November 2010, accessed: 24 November 2010)In December 2010, Atlas Iron made a bid to buy Giralia Resources; it may be possible to merge Atlas Mt Webber mine with Giralias nearby Dalton mine.()ReferencesExternal links* Atlas Iron Limited website
17930434
Swedish_submarine_incidents
The submarine hunts or submarine incidents were a series of several incidents involving foreign submarines that occurred in Swedish territorial waters during the War, more specifically during the 1980s. In this time, there was intensive debate and speculation in Swedish media about the possibility of Soviet submarine infiltration of Swedish waters.While there had been earlier incidents involving foreign submarines (as seen below), the incidents normally referred to in this context are those that followed the sensational stranding of the Soviet submarine U 137 deep inside Swedish waters on October 27, 1981. The Swedish navy responded aggressively to these perceived threats, increasing patrols in Swedish waters, mining and electronically monitoring passages, and repeatedly chasing and attacking suspected submarines with charge bombs, but no hits or casualties were ever recorded.Reports of new submarine sightings and television imagery of Swedish Navy helicopters firing depth charges into coastal waters against suspected intruders became commonplace in the mid-to-late 1980s. They remain, for many Swedes, one of the iconic images of the Cold War and of the Swedish relation to the Soviet Unionfor some underlining what was considered a major threat to Swedish sovereignty, while for others illustrating the tense and, in the view of some, paranoid atmosphere of the time. However, the reports of these incidents are not uncontested, and an intensive debate emerged early on. This debate unfolded somewhat, but far from exclusively, along leftwing/rightwing lines, and became tied up with the larger issues of relations to Moscow and Swedish neutrality. The Soviet Union consistently denied that it was responsible for violating Swedish waters, and claimed that the U 137 had only crossed the border because of navigational faults. Russia today maintains this stand. While the submarine sightings subsided with the fall of the Soviet Union, the debate about these events has reemerged in the 1990s and 2000s. They have been the subject of a number of government investigations in Sweden, and continue to attract media attention.List of major reported incidents*1962: During a military exercise, a submarine is discovered by radar echo and hydrophone, north of Fr at Gotland. It retreats only after repeated charge strikes.()*Fall 1969: During a Navy drill on the coast of Norrland, the Swedish submarine Springaren comes into contact with a foreign submarine in Swedish waters; it leaves the scene.()*1974: A submarine periscope is spotted by the Coast Guard near Kappelhamnsviken on Gotland. A destroyer is sent to the scene and establishes contact, at which point the foreign submarine leaves Swedish waters.(*Fall 1976: During a marine drill in the Stockholm Archipelago, a Soviet Type W submarine exposes itself by using radar, outside Swedish territorial waters. A Swedish submarine monitors the Soviet vessel entering Swedish waters, and records sounds from it. When Swedish submarine-hunting helicopters and destroyers arrive, it speeds out towards international waters and disappears.()*18 September to 6 October 1980: The Swedish Marine tugboat Ajax discovers the turret of a submarine outside Ut in the Archipelago. Submarine hunting helicopters are dispatched to the scene, establish contact, and fire warning shots. The submarine does not leave the area, but attempts to avoid capture, and a prolonged submarine hunt began. This lasted for several weeks, during which time the submarine is repeatedly sighted.(()*October 27, 1981: The U 137 incident. On the evening of October 28, 1981, a fisherman residing in the eastern part of the Karlskrona archipelago phoned in to the Coast Guard and reported that a submarine had capsized in Gsefjrden, 30 km from the town centre of Karlskrona. Originally, it was not taken seriously because of its location, as Gsefjrden is a very difficult terrain to navigate in, as well as being a dead end. Nevertheless, the fisherman was right, and the vessel was found to be of Soviet origin. The grounded submarine generated intense media interest, and Swedish military forces were put on high alert following suspicions that the Soviet Union would try to recapture the vessel. After several rounds of interrogation, the conservative/Liberal government led by Flldin decided to release both the vessel and its crew. This marked the beginning of the submarine hunts (ubtsjakter), as nicknamed by Swedish media.* October 113, 1982: The Hrsfjrden incident. After a long period of submarine incidents, the Swedish navy sets a trap by sealing off an area with mines and sensors. A foreign submarine is then recognized to have entered the trap, and the Navy responds in force with major forces stationed nearby. A reported 44 depth charges and 4 naval mines are detonated, trying to sink the submarine, but it is later determined that it avoided the trap or fled at an early stage. This incident triggers the appointment of a parliamentary committee under the leadership of Andersson, whichpartly due to the efforts of Bildtblames the Union, thereby escalating tension with Moscow. Later research has cast doubt on many of the conclusions of the committee, with some of the sound recordings from the purported submarine now believed to have come from a civilian ship.(http://www.dn.se/DNet/jsp/polopoly.jsp?d147&a771372) The entire incident is now hotly disputed, with some arguing the submarine may have been of NATO origin.(http://www.expressen.se/debatt/1.953772/de-doljer-sanningen-om-ubatsjakten)*May 4, 1983: A suspected submarine is reported in Trefjrden, North of Lule, and mines are detonated.* May 1983: Submarine hunt outside Sundsvall. Helicopters establish contact with a foreign submarine, but are unable to fire, reportedly because civilian journalists have entered the safety area.()*Summer 1983: Submarine hunt in Treviken.*August 1983: Submarine hunt in the harbor area of Karlskrona and in the adjoining archipelago. Depth charges are fired inside Karlskrona harbor.*February 929, 1984: Another submarine hunt in Karlskrona. 22 depth charges are fired against a suspected submarine.*Early summer 1986: A mysterious object is reported diving into the water in Klintehamnsviken on Gotland. The sea floor is examined, and double-track trace is discovered, allegedly from a submarine vehicle, extending 1100 meters.*June 1987: Another submarine hunt in Trefjrden.*Summer 1987: While examining the magnetic sensors of a minefield in Kappelshamnsviken on Gotland, the military discovers clear traces on the bottom from a tracked submarine vehicle.*Early summer 1988: A suspected foreign submarine is noticed in Hvringebukten outside Oxelsund. Submarine sounds and air venting is said to have been recorded.*April 13, 2011: A possible foreign submarine is noticed in Baggensfjrden in Nacka. The Swedish Armed Forces Naval Tactical intelligence service, MTS-M2 investigated the incident.() Later it was confirmed that the object was really a raft frozen in moving ice.()*September 11, 2011: An eyewitness contacts the Swedish armed forces after seeing something outside the harbor of Gotenburg that possibly could have been a foreign submarine. The Swedish navy deployed several surface warships in an attempt to locate the unknown object. (http://svt.se/2.34007/1.2534922/frammande_ubat_i_goteborgs_hamn)(http://www.forsvarsmakten.se/sv/Aktuellt/centralanyheter/Marinen-undersoker-iakttagelser-i-Goteborgs-skargard/) Controversy As noted above, these events have been hotly disputed in Swedish media and by politicians and journalists active during the time. Although there were some clearly recognized cases of foreign military activity in Swedish waters (eg. band tracks on the sea floor, or most obviously the U 137), many of the supposed submarine incidents were based on intelligence reports, radar, underwater sensors, or witness statements, giving a less than full picture of the source of the disturbance.As a result, there is no clear consensus on the extent of possible infiltration, or on whether trespassing submarines were necessarily of Soviet origin. Some suggest that NATO submarines may have been responsible for the most well-known incidents, which has led to a further line of debate, on whether such submarines were secretly allowed to exit Swedish waters unpursuedthat would have been in contravention of the publicly declared Swedish neutrality. There is also a dispute concerning sound recordings purported to be of submarine engines, which some now allege stem from natural sounds, fish, mink, civilian vessels, etc.The discussion also focuses on whether U 137 was sent to spy on Swedish defenses (supported by the large number of similar suspected espionage infiltrations, and by the depth to which it had penetrated), or, as its captain claimed, was lost because of a navigational error (supported by the fact that it ran aground). Furthermore, there is a debate on whether this vessel was armed with weapons. Swedish military teams are said to have registered high levels of radiation on counters when examining the stranded submarine.Twenty years after the events, they still generate controversy in modern-day Swedish politics, with prominent politicians and former military officials active on both sides of the dispute.Ola Tunander attributes majority of these incursions to be of NATO origin.()()Cultural influenceThe incursions during 1982 and 1983 form a basis for the plot of Troubled Man (Den orolige mannen), the final Wallander novel written by Swedish author Mankell and published in 2009. Mankell considered the incursions to be one of the worst scandals in Swedish political history.(Staff (11 August 2009). Mankell p vg att lmna deckarna. Ystads Allehanda (Sknemedia AB).) Mankells upcoming play Politik set to debue at Stockholm City Theatre in autum 2010, also deals with the  submarine incidents of the 80s.(Staff Writer (17 August 2009). Palmepjs av Mankell i Stockholm (in Swedish). Dagens Nyheter (Bonnier AB).)ReferencesFurther reading* U-Boot-Affre     i Sverige
17949169
Victorian_Athletic_League
The Victorian Athletic League organises professional footrunning events ranging from 70 to 3200 metres. The most famous of these events is the Gift which has been run since 1878 and hosts the richest footrace in Australia. Many other gifts are held around Victoria in country and metro locations including Ballarat, Bendigo, Wangaratta, Maryborough, Keilor, Yarrawonga, Ringwood, Rye and Park. Races are run under a handicap system which makes races competitive.(Victorian Athletic League) Each race has a different handicap limit. Generally, the greater the sum of the prizemoney for a race, the less handicap is available, limiting the class of runners that can win. Runners are awarded prizemoney when making finals and bookmaking occurs at major meets. History of Professional Running Professional foot-racing or pedestrianism as it was often called, has its origins in the mid-eighteenth century when the Industrial Revolution was occurring and English public schools and the wider community were becoming very interested in games and sporting pursuits. One of these sporting pursuits was pedestrianism which was the act of rapidly covering a variety of distances on foot, distances which ranged from shorter sprints to the coverage of hundreds of miles. These activities were often accompanied by substantial wagers with large sums of money being won and lost.It was against this background that early settlers arrived in the Australian colonies from the United Kingdom in the nineteenth century.In Australia professional foot-racing is said to have begun in the gold-mining days. The miners raced against each other, often in a one-to-one match-race situation on a handicap basis for the gift of a gold nugget offered by the local publican or mine owner.It was at this time that the main sprint race came to be run over the Sheffield distance of 130 yards, regarded as a true test for professional sprinters. This sprint distance originated from the Sheffield Handicap event in Yorkshire over 130 yards in which the winner was presented with a purse of gold. The metric equivalent of 120 metres has been used in gift races since the mid seventies. Present Day Professional Footrunning Professional foot-racing has been conducted throughout Australia using prizemoney provided by sponsors since the eighteen-hundreds. Each state has a circuit of carnivals directed by its State Athletic League operating under the Australian Athletic Confederation.The Mecca of professional foot-running in Australia is the Stawell Gift Carnival which has been held during Easter for over one hundred years.However, its status as the richest carnival has been superseded in recent years by the Botany Bay Gift Carnival which boasts total prizemoney of $120,000 and $70,000 for its main race with a $50,000 first prize. The Stawell Carnival has a total prizemoney pool of $90,000. The main race the Stawell gift is over 120m and the winner receives $40, 000.There are many other carnivals and events conducted under handicap foot-running conditions throughout the nation each year.Some of the more famous long-running carnivals are the Bay Sheffield Carnival in South Australia, Bendigo and Ballarat in Victoria, Burnie in Tasmania, Jupiters Carnival on the Gold Coast in Queensland, Temora and Macksville Carnivals in New South Wales. Since the late 1980s athletics and the Olympic Games have been open, meaning that the so-called amateurs and professionals can all compete together for prizemoney without being penalised or discriminated against. History of the Victorian Athletic League The Victorian Athletic League was established in 1895. Professional running in Australia began in the gold-mining days and boomed in areas where miners were prospecting and digging for gold. The miners raced against each other for the gift of a gold nugget offered by the local publican or mine owner. The miners raced over various distances but the main race was run over the Sheffield distance of 130 yards. In the 1860s big money began to creep into the sport which attracted a wealth of athletic talent. Competitions took on a carnival atmosphere and crowds flocked to see local champions. In April 1878, nearly two thousand people witnessed the running of the first Stawell Easter Gift which was won by 24-year-old farmer W.J.Millard. The sport of professional running continued to grow. Big prizemoney and heavy betting attracted talented athletes as well as a range of shady characters. By the early 1890s, the sport of professional running was in crisis. Athletes running under false names, hiding past performance, corrupt officials and other controversies led the need to establish a controlling body for professional running in Victoria. The Victorian Athletic League was formed on 15 April 1895 when RV Lewis of Benalla was elected president and Hastings Bell of Stawell was appointed secretary. Originally the League was administered from Stawell and formulated rules and regulations for country towns that conducted sports carnivals. It also acted as arbitrator in any disputes arising at those carnivals. In 1902 a regular office was established in Melbourne and the Victorian Athletic League began to promote the sport of professional running. Carnivals were held in Melbourne and major Victorian towns and became extremely popular with the sporting public. 1917, a dispute over prizemoney led to a breakaway group, the Victorian Athletic Association, being formed and conducting event in opposition to the Victorian Athletic League. In 1921, through the mediation of the Stawell Athletic Club, the Victorian Athletic League and the Victorian Athletic Association were merged. ES Herring of Maryborough was elected president and Joe Bull appointed as secretary. The Victorian Athletic League established an office in Brunswick and held mid week sports meetings were held at White City in Tottenham, at the Exhibition Grounds and at the Monodrome. During the 1920s and 1930s, popularity of professional running grew tremendously and the VAL staged World Sprint Championships. At the outbreak of World War II, many Victorian Athletic League clubs abandoned their meetings. However, the federal cabinet granted permission for the Victorian Athletic League to conduct footrunning at Maribyrnong for the benefit of athletes on leave from the armed forces and men employed in essential services. After World War II the Victorian Athletic League gained strength and had nearly fifteen hundred registered runners, three hundred trainers and was conducted sports carnivals at seventy centres across Victoria from mid November to early June. By the early 1960s, interest in professional running had waned. The number of registered runners had declined and only twenty-eight carnivals were held across Victoria. In an effort to revive the sport, the Victorian Athletic League invited champion international athletes such as Bob Hayes, Alan Simpson and Robbie Hutchison to compete in Australia. In 1969, the St Kilda club staged the richest footrace in the world with a first prize of $2,000. In 1977, the Victorian Athletic League undertook substantial administrative changes becoming an incorporated company, establishing a computerised record of handicaps and results, and commissioning the use of an electronic race finish recording machine. After years of segregation between amateur and professional athletics, in 1986 saw the dawning of open athletics when Stawell Gift winners Chris Perry and John Dinan competed for Australia at the Commonwealth Games in Edinburgh. In recent years, the Victorian Athletic League has extended its athletic format beyond club carnivals. The League moved into conducting special events such as the famous Dandy Dollar Dash at VFL/AFL football matches, the Moomba Mile run down Bourke Street in the Melbourne CBD, 400 metres series during international cricket matches at the MCG and sprint events during horse races at Moonee Valley. In 2001, the Victorian Athletic League moved offices to be co-located with Athletics Victoria at Olympic Park in Melbourne. The League began to form a strong alliance with Athletics Victoria through formal affiliation, sharing resources and establishing a dual-registration process. Athletes that have run in Professional Footrunning Events (Include VAL, SAAL, QAL, NSWAL, TAL)- Freeman- Christie- De Castella- Ross- Rawlinson- Lewis- Peris-Kneebone- Gainsford-Taylor- Pape (Australian Olympian)- Bola Lawal (Nigerian Olympian)- McNeil (Scotland)- Ravelomanantsoa (Madagascar)- Rick Dunbar Rye Gift Held usually around January every year the Rye Gift attracts tourists celebrating the Christmas period and New Year. It has bookies and the track for the 120m is on a slight decline.Past Winners  2000-2007 (Mens)2000 R Devalle2001 M Moresi2002 C Touhy2003 C Foley2004 C Dunbar2005 G Brown2006 D Burgess2007 M CallardPast Winners 2000-2007 (Womens)2000 A Fearnley2001 J Chehadei2002 K Moore2003 A Deery2004 A Deary2004 A Deery2006 C White2007 K Steward Ringwood Hosted by the Ringwood Professional Athletic club this event is held usually in January. Its gift has ranged from 120m, 200m and 400m over the years. Currently the Gift race is held over 400m.Past Winners2003 E King2004 G Mawer2005 J Hooper2006 J Boulton2007 C White Wangaratta This event attracts both VAL and NSWAL competitors because of the close proximity of the event. Professional cycling events are also held at the same time as the footrunning.Past Winners2000 P Walsh2001 M Callard2002 E Everton2003 J Hilditch (Scotland)2004 J Lewis2005 D Arthur2006 J Boulton2007 A Flanagan Ballarat The Ballarat Gift as a strong history dating back to 1949. It has been held at City Oval, Sebastopol Oval and Northern Oval where VFL team the Northern Bullants play. It was first conducted in 1949 and won by Ted Marantelli. During much of the 1970s and 1980s the only Gift conducted in Ballarat was the Sebastopol Gift. After the demise of the Sebatopol Gift in 1988, the Ballarat Gift returned to the VAL calendar in 1989 at the City Oval. After traditionally being held in February since inception, in 2010 the Ballarat Gift was moved to the weekend after the Stawell Easter Gift (April). With the assistance of the Goldfields Council, the Gift was worth a record $40,000. With all six Stawell Gift finalists entered, the 2010 Ballarat Gift final featured four of them including Stawell Gift winner Tom Burbidge. The Gift was won by 44-year-old Ballarat based, self trained athlete, Peter ODwyer. It was ODwyers second Ballarat Gift after winning the race in 1996.Past Winners (since it was resurrected in 1989)* 2010 Peter ODwyer* 2009 Rod Matthews* 2008 Bola Lawal (Nigeria)* 2007 Nick Sampieri* 2006 Nathan Dixon* 2005 Warwick Vale* 2004 Victor Oyanedal* 2003 Scott Beaven* 2002 Bett Blanco* 2001 John Cara* 2000 Darren Paull* 1999	Chris Pattison* 1998	Robert Ballard (NSW)* 1997	Shaun White* 1996	Peter ODwyer* 1995	Vince Cavallo* 1994	Andrew Paull* 1993	Tony Birrell* 1992	Mark Ladbrook* 1991	Chris Russell* 1990	Peter Bennetto* 1989	Peter Bennetto Bendigo The Bendigo Opal is held around March every year and conincides with the International Cycling Madison. It holds the richest 400m footrace in the world.Past Winners2003 Duncan Tippins2004 Mark Howard2005 Nathan Dixon 2006 Tommy Neim2007 Nick Magree 2008 Glenn Stephens Stawell Gift The Gift is considered the countrys and quite possibly worlds most prestigious professional footrace. Over 120m it is televised across the country and thousands are at Stawell every year at Easter. Stawell Gift Winners 1990-2010 * 2010  Tom Burbidge,             Canberra (ACT)* 2009  Aaron Stubbs,            Kurrawa (QLD) * 2008  Sam Jamieson,            Williamstown (VIC)* 2007  Nathan Allen,	        Toowoomba (QLD)* 2006  Adrian Mott,	        Essendon (VIC)* 2005  Joshua Ross,	        Gillieston(NSW)* 2004  Jason Hunte,	        Barbados* 2003  Ross,	        North Lambton (NSW)* 2002  Stuart Uhlmann,	        Cedar Grove (QLD)* 2001  Andrew Pym,	        South Riverview (NSW)* 2000  Jarram Pearce,	        Wodonga (VIC)* 1999  Rod Matthews,	        Buninyong (VIC)* 1998  Dale Seers,	        Edithvale (VIC)* 1997  Daniel Millard,           Mt Gambier (SA)* 1996  Steve Hutton,             Alberton (SA)* 1995  Glenn Crawford,           Katamatite (VIC)* 1994  Rod Lewis,                  Ringwood (VIC)* 1993  Richardson,       Caulfield South (VIC)* 1992  Andrew McManus,             Essendon (VIC)* 1991  Brimacombe,       Eltham (VIC) * 1990  Capobianco,          Kalamunda (WA) History of finalists:http://www.stawellgift.com/images/stories/documents/stawell%20gift%20winners%20since%201878.xlsReferencesExternal links* http://www.val.org.au/* http://www.stawellgift.com/* http://web.archive.org/web/20020208042218/http://www.geocities.com/~ewen/r2002_01.html* http://www.myspace.com/victorianathleticleague
17964717
Klamath_Mountains_(ecoregion)
Image:Level III ecoregions, Pacific Northwest.png|thumb|right|350px|Level III ecoregions in the Pacific Northwest. The Mountains (78) borders the Coast Range (1), Willamette Valley (3), Cascades (4), Sierra Nevada (5), Southern and Central California Chaparral and Oak Woodlands (6), and Eastern Cascades Slopes and Foothills (9) ecoregions.The Klamath Mountains ecoregion is a Level III ecoregion designated by the States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) in the states of Oregon and California. It lies inland of the Coast Range ecoregion, extending from the Umpqua Valley in the north to the Valley in the south. It encompasses the highly dissected ridges, foothills, and valleys of the Klamath and Mountains. The ecoregion was unglaciated during the epoch, when it served as a refuge for northern plant species. Its mix of granitic, sedimentary, metamorphic, and extrusive rocks contrasts with the predominantly rocks of the Cascades ecoregion to the northeast. The mild, subhumid climate of the region is characterized by a lengthy summer drought. It supports a mosaic of both northern Californian and Northwestern conifers and hardwoods.()The Klamath Mountains ecoregion is a vast, well-protected region that is sparsely populated. While the Klamath Mountains do not have the charismatic mega-fauna that make other National Parks or vast wilderness areas attractive to visitation, the plant diversity offers an enjoyable hiking experience.EcologyThe ecoregion harbors rich biodiversity,() with several distinct plant communities, including rain forests, moist inland forests, oak forests and savannas, high elevation forests, and alpine grasslands. Thirty conifer species inhabit the region, including seven endemic species, making the region one of the richest coniferous forest regions of the world in species diversity. The region also has several edaphic plant communities, adapted to specific soil types, notably serpentine outcrops.Conifer species include Douglas-fir (Pseudotsuga menziesii subsp. menziesii), Cypress (also known as Port Orford Cedar, Chamaecyparis lawsoniana), Pine (Pinus ponderosa), Pine (Pinus lambertiana), Hemlock (Tsuga mertensiana), Fir (Abies concolor subsp. lowiana), Fir (A. magnifica subsp. shastensis), Spruce (Picea breweriana), Redwood (Sequoia sempervirens), and Yew (Taxus brevifolia). These forests mark the northern extent of the range for Buckeye,()Level IV ecoregionsIV ecoregions, Klamath Mountains.png|thumb|right|350px|Level IV ecoregions in the Klamath Mountains in Oregon. Contiguous areas in California have not been mapped yet. (Full map).The Oregon portion of the ecoregion has been subdivided into seven Level IV ecoregions, as described below. Level IV mapping is not yet complete in the California portion, which is nearly twice as large.Rogue/Illinois Valleys (78a)The Rogue/Illinois Valleys ecoregion includes terraces and floodplains in the Rogue and Illinois river valleys at an elevation of 900 to 2,000 feet (274 to 610 m). Historically, the valleys supported white oak and black oak woodland, with madrone, pine, and grassland. Common understory plants included fescue, snowberry, and serviceberry. areas supported willow and cottonwood. Much of the land has been developed for agricultural or residential use, and little of the original vegetation remains. Remnants of savanna, prairie vegetation, and seasonal ponds persist on the mesa tops of the Table Rocks north of Medford. Elsewhere, land uses include orchards, cropland, and pastureland. Climate, vegetation, and resulting land use are more similar to Californias inland valleys than to the Willamette Valley ecoregion to the north. The region covers  in Oregon, in three separate areas around Medford and Ashland, Grants Pass, and Cave Junction.(Oak Savanna Foothills (78b)The Oak Savanna Foothills ecoregion consists of moderately sloping mountain foothills bordering the Rogue and Illinois river valleys and sharing their climate. Elevation varies from 1,400 to 4,000 feet (427 to 1,219 m). The driest area, east of Medford, is dominated by Oregon white oak and California black oak woodlands, grassland-savanna, ponderosa pine, and Douglas-fir. The wetter foothills flanking the Illinois Valley support Douglas-fir, madrone, and incense-cedar. Understory species include oceanspray, poison-oak, snowberry, fescue, California brome, bluegrass, and ceanothus. The region is lower and less dissected, with more oak woodland and less closed-canopied forest than the Inland Siskiyous. It covers  in Oregon.(Umpqua Interior Foothills (78c)The Umpqua Interior Foothills ecoregion is a complex of foothills and narrow valleys containing fluvial terraces andfloodplains. Elevation varies from 400 to 2,800 feet (122 to 853 m). It is drier than the foothills of the Willamette Valley, partly because the summer Pacific high pressure system arrives earlier and remains longer than in ecoregions to the north. Summers are hot and dry, and soils have a moisture regime in contrast to the udic soils of the Mid-Coastal Sedimentary ecoregion to the west. The slopes are covered by Oregon white oak woodland, Douglas-fir, fir, ponderosa pine, madrone, tanoak, and chinkapin, with an understory chaparral community that includes snowberry, salal, grape, poison oak, oceanspray, and swordfern. Many areas have been converted to pastureland, vineyards, orchards, and crops. It covers  in Oregon in the Umpqua Valley, including the city of Roseburg.(Serpentine Siskiyous (78d)The Serpentine Siskiyous ecoregion consists of highly dissected mountains containing perennial, high gradient streams at an elevation of 1,500 to 4,300 feet (457 to 1,311 m). It is lithogically distinct from the rest of the Klamath Mountains ecoregion. Many plants have difficulty growing in its soils due to a shortage of calcium and high levels of magnesium, nickel, and chromium. As a result, vegetation is often sparse and composed of specialist species that have evolved to grow in the potentially toxic and nutrient-poor serpentine soils. It supports a mixed conifer forest of pine, tanoak, incense-cedar, Douglas-fir, and montane chaparral composed of manzanita, ceanothus, Idaho fescue, and Lemmon needlegrass. Historic gold, nickel, chromite, copper, and mercury mining have contributed to quality problems. The region covers  in Oregon, including portions of the River  Siskiyou National Forest and the Kalmiopsis and Wild Rogue wildernesses. Contiguous areas in California have not been mapped yet.(Inland Siskiyous (78e)The Inland Siskiyous ecoregion is higher and more mountainous than the neighboring foothill and valley ecoregions, with an elevation of 800 to 7,000 feet (244 to 2,134 m). It has a higher fire frequency, less annual precipitation, and longer summer droughts than the Coastal Siskiyous. Forest cover is a diverse and multi-layered mix of conifers, evergreens, and deciduous trees and shrubs, featuring Douglas-fir, ponderosa pine, Oregon white oak, California black oak, madrone, serviceberry, snowberry, Oregon grape, California fescue, and poison oak. The largest of the Klamath Mountains subregions mapped so far, it covers  in Oregon, including public lands within the Rogue River  Siskiyou National Forest. Contiguous areas in California have not been mapped yet.(Coastal Siskiyous (78f)The Coastal Siskiyous ecoregion consists of highly dissected mountains with a wetter and milder climate than elsewhere in the Klamath Mountains ecoregion. Elevation varies from 600 to 5,300 feet (183 to 1,615 m). Productive forests composed of tanoak, Douglas-fir, maple, laurel, and some Orford cedar cover its mountainous landscape, with chinkapin, salal, rhododendron, and swordfern; tanoak is more common than elsewhere in Oregon. evergreens, such as tanoak and madrone, quickly colonize disturbed areas, making it difficult to regenerate conifer forest growth. Xeric soils derived from Siskiyou rock types are characteristic; udic soils which support hemlock and Sitka spruce are present but are less common than in the wetter Coast Range ecoregion to the west. The region covers  in Oregon, including portions of the Rogue River  Siskiyou National Forest and the Kalmiopsis and Wild Rogue Wilderness wildernesses. Contiguous areas in California have not been mapped yet.(Klamath River Ridges (78g)The Klamath River Ridges is characterized by highly dissected mountains, with a dry, climate. Elevation varies from 3,800 to 7,500 feet (1,158 to 2,286 m). Vegetation varies with slope, aspect, and elevation. Higher altitudes and north-facing slopes have Douglas-fir and fir; lower elevations and south-facing slopes are covered in pine and juniper, species that are more drought-resistant than other vegetation types found within the region. The chaparral features Oregon grape, western fescue, snowberry, wheatgrass, and ceanothus. The region covers  in Oregon near the Summit, including portions of the Rogue River  Siskiyou National Forest and the National Monument. Contiguous areas in California have not been mapped yet.(See also* Ecoregions defined by the EPA and the for Environmental Cooperation:** of ecoregions in North America (CEC)** of ecoregions in the United States (EPA)** of ecoregions in Oregon** of ecoregions in California* The conservation group Wildlife Fund maintains an alternate classification system:** of ecoregions (WWF)** of ecoregions in the United States (WWF)ReferencesExternal links*A Celebration of the Conifer Diversity in Northwest California*Conifers of Northwest California*Klamath-Siskiyou forests (World Wildlife Fund)*Klamath-Siskiyou Forests images at bioimages.vanderbilt.edu (slow modem version)*CNPS: Rare and Endemic Conifers of Northwest California 
17969554
Whitley_Beaumont
Whitley Beaumont was an estate in the county of Yorkshire, England, near Huddersfield. Whitley Hall (now demolished) was the seat of the Beaumont family. A part of the former estate is now in use as a Scout camp-site.HistoryIn around 1200 the lord of Pontefract castle, Roger de Laci presented William Bellomonte, ancestor of the Beaumonts of Whitley, 24 bovates of land in Huddersfield, half meadow and half wood and four marks rent on the mill in the same place. Although there were probably houses built on the site in the interim, the first documented Hall was built by Sir Richard Beaumont in the early 17th century. The house was then rebuilt in the 18th century in an imposing Georgian style using local millstone grit. The gardens were landscaped by Brown.By the early part of the 20th century the house stood empty and the fittings were sold in 1917. The estate was then bought in 1924 by Charles Sutcliffe an industrialist. Unfortunately this was not enough to save the house and estate and it continued to deteriorate until it was sold in 1950 and split up, the major part to an opencast mining company and the house was demolished.ScoutingCharles Sutcliffe first allowed Scouts to use the kitchen gardens to camp in 1928 or 1929 and after the 1950 break-up of the estate an area of land south of the hall passed into the hands of the Huddersfield Scout districts. It is now run by volunteers reporting to Huddersfield South-East district.External links* Whitley Beaumont Camp-site
17983989
Whim_Creek_Copper_Mine
The Whim Creek Copper Mine is an operating copper oxide mine, located in the Pilbara region of Australia. History thumb|left|Old headframe from historic workings, Whim CreekCopper was discovered several kilometres west of the town in 1872 and gold  north in 1887.Copper has been mined on and off at Whim Creek over a period of 120 years. Copper was mined initially via a series of small adits and stopes into the Whim Creek and Mons Cupri deposits by artisanal miners, with records indicating that as early as 1882 small quantities of malachite, azurite, chrysocolla and other copper minerals were being won. Copper was shipped via a small port on the coast at the nearby town of Balla Balla. A single track narrow-gauge railway ran from Whim Creek to Balla Balla. At its peak, the town supported two hotels, a blacksmith, a police station and a horse track.In the early 1900s a second period of mining began, with around 60,000 tonnes of copper concentrate produced mainly from the Whim Creek Mine. In the 1960s Japanese interests undertook a resource drilling program, with diamond core drilling, and built a small oxide mining operation. This shut down in the early 1970s. The mine used two large diesel engines from World War One submarines to power the mine equipment. The engine blocks can still be seen on the site today.The leases passed to Whim Creek Consolidated Limited, but the company found profit elsewhere, and the mining leases were passed through several owners until the mid-1990s when Straits Resources Limited took over the tenure.Straits undertook a resource definition drilling programme and upgraded the resource to around 10 million tonnes of ore grading 1% copper, predominantly composed of oxidised copper minerals such as malachite, azurite, chalcocite and chrysocolla. Other minerals noted within the ore bodies are willemite, sphalerite, chalcopyrite and rare copper. The majority of resources were defined at the Mons Cupri deposit and the Whim Creek deposit.Straits Resources Limited, after closure of the Copper Mine in 2001-02, investigated the feasibility of translocating the solvent extraction and electrowinning plant from South Wales to Whim Creek to set up a large scale open cut oxide copper SX-EW heap leach operation. Operations commenced in 2003, with pre-stripping of the pits and commencement of site works, with the mine fully commissioned in mid-2005.The Whim Creek ore bodies are expected to be exhausted of copper oxide ore within early 2009. An option exists for the operation to continue as a sulphide operation thereafter. Geology The Whim Creek Copper Mine extracts two massive sulfide ore deposits, namely Mons Cupri (lit. copper mountain) and Whim Creek, which are located within the Cistern Formation and Rushalls Slate sedimentary members, which are part of a series of rift-related felsic, intermediate and mafic volcanic rocks known as the Whim Creek Group. The Whim Creek Group is approximately 2.9 to 2.8Ga old and lies unconformably upon an older basement of Portree Granite.The ore deposits are classified as supergene oxide copper deposits and are primarily composed of weathered copper sulphide primary ores now present as a variety of copper carbonate minerals and secondary sulphides - primarily chalcocite - hosted within slate and conglomerate.Ore genesisThe genesis model for the Whim Creek and Mons Cupri copper oxide deposits is that of a volcanogenic massive sulfide deposit. The main ore zones are located within sedimentary units which lie above a rhyolite footwall and below an andesite hanging wall (the Comstock Andesite member).Ores were formed by sulphur-rich mineralising fluids carrying copper, zinc, lead, silver and iron exhaling onto the sea-floor surface, where sulfide minerals were deposited as sheets of massive sulphide mineralisation up to 7 m thick, made up of sphalerite, galena, chalcopyrite and pyrite.The region has subsequently been deformed eight times (see Craton for details), with the regional structure being a 30x20km pericline formed around the underlying granite dome. Locally, a series of north-east to south-west trending folds control the geology. Both deposits are stratiform and dip south with their host geology.Mons Cupri is hosted within the Cistern Formation, which is predominantly a polymict volcanolithic pebble conglomerate. The conglomerate sits within the centre of the deposit and forms a central tor flanked by an apron of sulphides, which forms an elongate ribbon plunging west-southwest. The Mons Cupri rhyolite is in the footwall and shows typical silica-chlorite alteration. The Cistern Formation conglomerates are intensely silicified.Whim Creek is hosted within the Rushall Slate, which is a finer-grained equivalent to the Cistern Formation. The Whim Creek deposit forms a ribbon-like sulphide shoot which plunges to the south or south-east.Regionally, several sub-economic deposits and prospects are known, including the Salt Creek VMS deposit, the West Balla VMS prospect and the Balla Balla VMS prospect. Ore processing thumb|left|Copper cathode from the Whim Creek SX-EW facilityThe current mining operation at Whim Creek consists of an open cut mining operation, utilising drill-and-blast, trucking ore from Whim Creek and Mons Cupri to a central leach hydrometallurgy operation midway between the two. The operation runs via contract mining, with a fleet of five haul trucks and two production drill rigs.Ore is crushed and screened to <20 mm, agglomerated with concentrated acid, and stacked on heaps around 6 m high, which are placed atop a plastic membrane. The ore is irrigated via drippers with a dilute sulphuric acid solution and the leach liquor collected, and directed into a solvent extraction plant where the dilute lixivant is purified. The concentrated raffinate is then pumped into an electrowinning plant where 99% or greater purity copper cathode is produced for direct sale.The mines nameplate capacity is 15,000 tonnes per annum of A-grade copper cathode. Production averaged around 12,000 tonnes per annum for 2006-07.Barren overburden is stockpiled in close proximity to the open pits.There is an option to continue the operation as a sulphide crush-grind and flotation operation, as the current oxide ore bodies continue at depth as primary sulphides. See also * massive sulfide ore deposit* craton* Creek, Western Australia* Hydrometallurgy* Mining References * Straits Resources
17991319
Minerals_and_Mining_Law
The Minerals and Mining Law of 1986 (PNDCL 153), as amended by the Minerals and Mining (Amendment) Act of 1994 (Act 475) and the minerals and mining bill of 2005 (law No. 703), regulates in Ghana. Under the Minerals and Mining Law, mining companies must pay royalties; companies may also pay corporate taxes at standard rates. Companies are exempt from custom duties on accessories, equipment, machinery, and plants used for mining operations, but must pay local property taxes on their immovable properties.  The 1986 mining law had been instrumental in attracting more than $5 billion in foreign investment to the Ghanaian mining industry between 1986 and 2002. The 1994 amendments reduced the 45% general mining corporate tax rate to 35%, which is the same as that imposed on other industries. On December 15, 2005, the Ghanaian Parliament passed into law a new minerals and mining bill. Some of the provisions under the new Minerals and Mining Law, law No. 703, included access to mineral rights on a first-come, first-considered basis; a specific timeframe within which all applications are expected to be granted; the right for applicants to demand written reasons from the Minister if an application is rejected; the Governments right to acquire land or authorize its occupation and use if the land is required for mining purposes; the establishment of a cadastral system for the administration of mineral rights; a provision establishing the range of royalty rates, which is not to be less than 3% or exceed 6% of total mining revenues; the Governments right to obtain a 10% free-carried interest in mining leases; and the establishment of the period of duration of a mining lease, which is not to exceed 30 years and which may be renewed once for a period not to exceed an additional 30 years. References*This article incorporates text from the public domain Yearbooks.
18017490
Cameraria
Cameraria, a homonym, may refer to either of two genera of life forms:*Cameraria (moth), a genus of leaf-mining moths*Cameraria (plant), a genus of plants in the dogbane familynl:Cameraria
18039954
Irish_Centre_for_High-End_Computing
The Irish Centre for High-End Computing (ICHEC) is a distributed national centre providing support for research in computing and science in the of Ireland. ICHEC was established in 2005 and is jointly funded by Foundation Ireland and the Education Authority.  The first director was Dr Andy Shearer of Galway and the current director is Prof Jim Slevin, former president of the Irish Academy.As of 2010, ICHEC has 22 staff and manages four supercomputer systems: two IBM Gene systems(Schrdinger and Lanczos), an SGI Altix ICE server cluster(Stokes) and a Bull high memory system(Stoney). ICHEC has close ties with the Institute for Advanced Studies and the Associate Director, Dr J-C Desplat, is an honorary professor of computational science in the School of Cosmic Physics.  ICHEC works closely with the Irish Meteorological Service ireann, managing the system for the operation forecast and in many climate research projects. ICHEC is part of the e-INIS (e-Irish National Infra-Structure) consortium.ICHEC utilises HEAnets networking infrastructure to allow access to its supercomputer systems. These supercomputer systems are: * the Altix ICE server Stokes(, hosted in University College Dublin* the Bull high memory systemStoney(, hosted in University of Ireland, Galway.ICHEC is one of seven Nvidia CUDA research centers(List of Nvidia CUDA Research Centers, retrieved 22 July 2010). Its work in this area has included the porting to CUDA of the Quantum ESPRESSO and DL_POLY dynamics packages as well as various industrial benchmarking studies.ICHEC works with Ireland and Foundation Ireland to provide consultancy services to Irish companies in various areas including mining, Visualisation, GPGPU, management and development.References(External links* ICHEC web site
18056083
New_England_New_State_Movement
The New England New State Movement was an Australian political movement in the twentieth century.  Originally called the Northern Separation Movement, the aim of the movement was to seek the secession of the New England region and surrounding areas from the State of South Wales (NSW) and the establishment of a new State of New England.  While initially popular and the subject of two Commissions, the movement was ultimately unsuccessful, following defeat at a referendum in 1967.Geographical DescriptionImage:New england location in NSW australia.PNG|thumb|right|Approximate location of New England within South Wales; red a narrow definition, yellow a broader definitionBecause New England has never had a formal identity, its claimed boundaries have varied with time. In broad terms, it covers the humid coastal strip including the Valley to the Queensland border, the New England Tablelands and the immediately adjoining Western Slopes and Plains.In economic and geographic terms, New England forms a natural unit that has survived to the present day. In political terms, the boundaries have varied. The initial separation discussions excluded the Hunter, in part because of tensions between the industrial and mining heartland of the lower Hunter and the rest of the area. This created a problem because an urban/industrial centre like Newcastle and the Hunter were seen as an essential part of New England, or any new state, in economic and geographic terms. The boundaries recommended by the 1935 report of the Nicholas Commission into areas of NSW suitable for self-government included Newcastle and the Hunter. These boundaries were adopted by the New England New State Movement and used as the basis for the 1967 self-government referendum.NameNew England was initially called Northern NSW, the North, the Northern Districts or the Northern Provinces. The name New England was originally the name of the Tableland area forming New Englands core. The Tablelands are known as the Northern Tablelands, the New New England Tablelands or sometimes just the New England to distinguish them from the broader New England area. The name New England was adopted for the whole area by the Northern Separation Movement at its 1931 Maitland convention. From there its usage spread, contracting again as the new state movement went into decline after 1967. New State AgitationImage:EarlePage.jpg|thumb|Earl Page, activist in the New State movement and later Minister of AustraliaThe first separatist agitation occurred during colonial times at the time of the separation of Queensland from NSW. While this was followed by outbreaks of agitation, these remained sporadic.This changed in the twentieth century. Agitation began again at Grafton towards the end of the First World War led by Page, a local doctor and later a prominent politician, rising to caretaker Minister of Australia. This was picked up a little later by Victor Thompson, editor of the Tamworth Daily Leader who launched a sustained newspaper campaign that involved papers as far south as Cessnock in the lower Hunter. This led to the creation of a formal movement. In 1922 a formal request to the Commonwealth was made by the lower house to establish a new state in northern New South Wales.(Totaro, Paola. Historys lesson to the bush: if at first you dont secede, try, try again. Sydney Morning Herald. 28 July 2003.) One outcome was the 1924 Cohen Royal Commission into New States.The Cohen Commission ruled against to the movement and it went into decline, resurging at the start of the Great Depression. This forced another Royal Commission, the Nicholas Commission. While this recommended in favour, the movement was again in decline as economic conditions improved.Agitation started again at the end of the Second World War and this time was sustained by permanent staff. In 1953, 21 councils defied the state government and held unofficial referendum on the issue of a new state. The people voted overwhelmingly in favor of the referendum.(Altered states. Sydney Morning Herald. 25 Jan. 2005.) In 1961 the movement launched Operation Seventh State, raising over AU100,000. This allowed more staff and greater agitation.This acceptance of boundaries determined by the Nicholas Commission proved to be the movements critical strategic error. It assumed that a state was not viable unless it was  dominated by a large urban population on the English/London model. Yet, the evidence from similar federations like Canada and the USA revealed numerous successful farm states, like Wyoming, Montana and the Dakotas, with comparatively small capital city populations tied to a single, essentially rural community of interest. This metrocentric mindset ensured that two quite distinct communities of interest were being pressured into a doomed arranged marriage. It was also the very antithesis of an act of free choice as that choice involved imposing a majority rural will over a geographically distinct urban community. A new state proposal based in most part on boundaries formed by those Local Councils with majorities that actually wanted the change would have acquired a critical momentum. Premier Askin and the Cabinet believed in 1966 that a secession referendum would win, so they had the upper Valley and Newcastle included within the boundaries of the proposed new state before putting it to a vote.(ReferendumA referendum of New England electors was held on 29 April 1967. The no vote was led by the Labor Party who campaigned hard. The referendum was narrowly defeated with 54% voting no.(29 April 1967, NSW Electoral Commission) The very high no vote in the Labor strongholds of Newcastle and the Lower Hunter offset the majority yes vote elsewhere, although the no margin was not high. The threat of restricted access to the highly regulated Sydney milk and dairy products market also boosted the no vote in rural areas.Despite this defeat, four New State candidates stood for election at the 1968 state election and gained 0.80% of the total state vote with Nehl, in the seat of Clarence, winning 35% of the primary vote. However this was a brief twilight in the campaign and, exhausted, the movement again went into decline for the next four decades.21st century revivalThe movement underwent a resurgence in 2004, primarily in response to State (Labor) Government shire amalgamations and farmers responses to new vegetation management policies. The Annual General Meetings of NSW Farmers passed resolutions to investigate the feasibility of a non-metropolitan state in both 2004 and 2005. A task force was formed chaired by then NSWF President Mr Malcolm Peters. Some polling was commissioned and a convention was held but little further effort appears to have taken place.References*Aitkin, D. A., The Colonel: A Political Biography of Sir Michael Bruxner, Australian National University Press, Canberra, 1969.*Belshaw, J. D., David Henry Drummond 1890&ndash;1930: the formative years, Armidale and District Historical Society Journal and Proceedings, No 22, March 1979, 19&ndash;42.*Belshaw, J. D., Journalist, Public Agitator and Theorist,Public Servant and Historian - An obituary of Ulrich Ellis, Armidale and District Historical Society Journal and Proceedings, No 25, March 1982, pp. 147&ndash;160.   *Australian New States Conference. Official Report. Leader Print, Tamworth, 1922 *Drummond, D. H., Constitutional Change in Australia: Current Problems and Contributing Factors, Glen Innes Examiner, Glen Innes, 1926.*Drummond, D. H., The New States Movement - Its basis and Objective, The Australian Quarterly, June 1931, No 10, Vol 3, pp. 46&ndash;57.*Drummond, D. H., Australias Changing Constitution: No States or New States, Angus & Robertson, Sydney, 1943.*Drummond, D. H., Australian Dilemma, Armidale Express Print, Armidale, 1935*Ellis, U. R., New Australian States, The Endeavour Press, Sydney, 1933.*Ellis, U. R., The Country Party: A Political and Social History of the Party in New South Wales, F W Cheshire, Melbourne, 1958.*Harman, G. S., New State Agitation in Northern New South Wales, 1920&ndash;1929,Journal of the Royal Australian Historical Society, Vol 63, Pt 1, June 1977, pp. 26&ndash;39.*Homes, Macdonald J., The New States Idea and its Geographic Background,New Century Press, Sydney, 1933.*New States Royal Commission 1933&ndash;1934: Evidence of the Royal Commission of Inquiry as to the Areas in New South Wales suitable for Self-Government as States in the Commonwealth of Australia, Government Printer, Sydney 1934.*New States: Report of the Royal Commission of Inquiry (H. S. Nicholas) Respecting Areas in the State of New South Wales suitable for Self-Government as States in the Commonwealth of Australia, Government Printer, Sydney, 1925. *OHara, J. B, A Doctor in the House: Earle Page 1915&ndash;1920, Armidale and District Historical Society Journal and ProceedingsNo 14, April 1971, pp. 87&ndash;89.*OHara R. L. The Influence of the Moreton Bay Separation Movement in New England and the Clarence, Armidale and Historical Society Journal and ProceedingsNo 11, December 1968, pp. 2&ndash;19.*Page, E and others, A New State: Proposed Separation of Northern New South Wales. The Case for Separation, Examiner print, Grafton, 1915.*Page, E, Truant Surgeon,Angus and Robertson, Sydney, 1963.*Report of the Royal Commission of Inquiry into Proposals for the Establishment of a New State or New States, formed wholly or in part out of the present territory of the State of New South Wales, (Cohen Commission), Government printer, Sydney, 1945. *Richmond, K, The New England New State Movement: Electoral Activity in 1968 and 1971. Armidale and District Historical Society *Journal and Proceedings, No 23., March 1980, 99 95&ndash;111.*Sommerlad, E.c. (Compiler), Australia Subdivided. The First New State, Examiner Print, Glen Innes, December, 1920.*Tapp, E. J., The Colonial Origins of the New England New State Movement, The Royal Australian Historical Society Journal, Vol 49, pt 3, November 1963, pp. 205&ndash;221.*Thompson, V. C., The New State embracing Northern New South Wales, Daily Observer Print, Tamworth 1920.*Thompson, V. C., New States in Australia, The Australian Quarterly, Vol 1, No 3, September 1929, pp. 47&ndash;53.*Woolmington, E R., A spatial approach to the measurement of support for the Separatist Movement in Northern NSW, Monograph Series No 2,Department of Geography, University of New England, Armidale 1968.NotesSee also*for new Australian States* New England New State Movement on FaceBook
18080259
Mexican_oil_boom
The Mexican Oil Boom was an boom from 1977 to 1981 which eventually led to a disastrous crash that lasted for most the 1980s, driving the economy to a payment default and a big deficit correction as oil prices fell. Pre Boom Period Since 1954 and until 1971 the Mexican economy performed very consistently, averanging 6% GDP growth each year and 3% inflation rate, allowing the country to sustain a $12.50 pesos per US dollar for 22 years (1954-1976). This period, called the Mexican Economic Miracle and Stabilizing Development, consisted in a ISI Model (import substitution). By late 1970s the economy faced certain limitations in the economic model, at the same time the States were troubled with a rising trade deficit, sparking an international financial period of uncertainty.Mexico opted out to put more public money and investment to sustain fast growth. This was fuelling inflation as government spending was fully financed with new printed money.A devaluation in 1976 caused some panic until Petrleos Mexicanos (PEMEX) discovered the Field, boosting perspectives to exploit the soaring oil prices and the government decided to invest and change the economic model. The Oil Boom Era Between 1977 and 1981 PEMEX oil production grew almost twofold from 1.086 million bbd to 2.313 million bbd*, and net exports 5-fold from 0.197 million bbd  to 1.154 million bbd*, this led to a 4 year 8.4% average growth in the GDP, and even as inflation crept up higher from a high base above 20% yearly, the massive job creation and rapid wage pace kept the workers mood calm.The expansion was mostly financed by loans and foreign money, as cheap credits from private banks and a blind faith from financiers allowed big sums of money to be invested easily, at the same time a free spending public sector began to invest in nearly anything within the nation.This money was trickling down to the broader economy and the private sector, the most benefited sectors were Construction, Mining and Transport, whose companies depending on private consumer also where in the free spending party, as result consumer goods imports soared 4.4 times* in 1981 from their 1977 level. Oil Prices Drops and its consequences When the world economy was hard hit by the interest rates hike from Volcker in 1982 to stop inflation in the United States, those highly indebted nations like Mexico, which invested heavily to develop its field, were in crisis.  Interest rates zoomed up dramatically at the same time oil demand and prices eased the result, was a gap of nearly 9% of the GDP in the national budget of 1982, turning Mexico in to default on their interest payments and finally signing up the commitments of the IMF, those financial commitments the government rejected back in 1976 when the fields were discovered.The effects of the budget cuts impacted the economy across the board, as the sale and privatization of the assets in the economy and job cuts pushed thousands of people out of work, government payroll shrank, and the ongoing restructuring of the private and public economy to face the new realities derived a series of reforms, aiming a growth dependent on trade, private investment and a bulk of sectors, this was called to cut the importance of the oil for the macroeconomy, and its dominance on the export earnings.  The economy growth during the 1980s was nil, and is often called the lost decade References * the data was taken from Micheal Gavin, Inter-American Development Bank from the Working Paper series 314 called: Mexican Oil Boom 1977-1985
18102414
Dead_Space_(comics)
Dead Space is a 2008 book prequel to the game Space: Extraction and to the film Space: Downfall. The game Dead Space continues where the film ended. It is published by Comics and is written by Johnston,(Wizard Q&A, Wizard, March 5, 2008) who also wrote the games dialogue, with art by Templesmith. An animated version of the comic was available to download via Xbox Live, PSN and various game review sites such as Gametrailers.com in summer 2008. The animated version is also available as bonus material in Dead Space: Extraction. Backstory In the distant future, humanity has colonized worlds beyond Earths solar system. Two-hundred years prior, a man named Michael Altman discovered an artifact of unknown origin (known as the marker) which led him to begin a new religion - Unitology - that supposedly taught the truth about human existence. Altman was later killed, allegedly by the government, in an attempt to silence the truth - however, the veracity of this account has yet to be confirmed. In present time, a new marker has been discovered on another colony and strange things have been happening amongst the colonists.  The comics start off with Neumann making a video log about what happens in the comic, but the comic drifts away from Neumanns point of view occasionally and feature events that Neumann is not present at.(EA : Dead Space : Language Selector) Introduction (Issue Zero)This issue is only available as an animated comic and is not available in print like the rest of the issues.Sergeant Abraham Neumann and Detective Vera Cortez, operatives from Planetside Security (P-SEC), are investigating a local disturbance at Apartment 23 Row D4 B Block, inhabited by a surveyor named Lisa and her husband Tom who works at the morgue. Neumann attempts to open the door and discovers the pad is inactive. He contacts Marla at P-SEC who unlocks the door from her end. Neumann and Cortez enter the room, which stinks according to Cortez, and find blood stains on the wall and floor. Neumann notes that this incident would be the 32nd assault in the past week, as opposed to three since the colony started. Cortez finds Lisas mangled body, which to her shock - moves. She calls Marla to request a trauma team. Without warning, Lisas writhing and growling corpse impales Cortez in the shoulder, while Neumann fires his weapon and calls for backup. After being thrown to the ground, Neumann finds a tazer which he then uses to shock Lisa. As operatives Jones and McCabe arrive, Lisas zombified body jumps through the wall. Neumann notes that it might be a long day. Issue One Chapter One begins with a very bloody Sergeant Abraham Neumann from P-SEC making a security log, with blood on the walls all around him. He says that if a planetside survivor finds the security log, they are doomed, and should not bother to escape. He warns that if anyone finds the log, they are to order the colony be nuked, so humanity doesnt suffer the same fate.Back at P-SEC five weeks prior, Marla is invited on a date by Neumann when she sees a video feed from Jen Barrows dig team showing an unknown, double helix-shaped structure covered with red symbols. Marla patches the feed to the P-SEC lounge where Sergeant Neumann, his partner Detective Vera Cortez and their Commander are watching in awe and confusion. Cortez contacts Barrows and asks if the structure is what she thinks it is. Barrows simply replies that it depends on how fucked up her thoughts are.Some time later, Neumann and Cortez go out for lunch at Lounge Area Three. A group of miners are talking about the find. One of the miners is upset that excavation prep was shut down because of what she believes to be a simple piece of rock while another, a Unitologist believes it be a Marker and the next step in human evolution; a new life beyond death. A scuffle breaks out between the two miners when the latters faith is insulted. Neumann and Cortez intervene, and it is revealed that Neumann isnt fond of Unitology, while Cortez is a Unitologist herself. The two miners avoid time in the brig when Neumann is unable to contact Marla.Meanwhile a miner suffering from insomnia is at the office of Dr. Tom Sciarello, asking for help. Sciarello believes the issue is depression caused by the miners having lost their chance at glory because of the Ishimura, but the miner insists that is not the issue. Unconvinced, the doctor prescribes some sedatives to help the miner sleep. After the miner leaves, the doctors nurse Katie notes this to be the 20th case of insomnia in three days, and the doctor agrees that something strange is going on.Later, at Union Square, VTM Engineer 1st Class and Unitologist Deacon Abbot is preaching to a small crowd of fellow believers, mentioning that it has been 200 years since the discovery of the First Marker by Michael Altman, and that the discovery of this unknown structure confirms the truth of Unitology. Cortez and Neumann are also present for the gathering - much to the dismay of Cortez, Neumann speaks up against discovery of the Marker, stating that the first one was black while the new one is red. Abbott and Neumann discuss the validity of Unitology, and Cortez sides with her fellow believers.At the Marker, now known as Dig Site GL-426, a small security team led by Natalia Deshinov is complaining about their assignment to look after the Marker. Natalia, although not a Unitologist, does think the Structure is an awesome find. She notes that Colony Manager Hanford Carthusia wants it looked after.Meanwhile, an assault takes place at Surgery 1 West Sector 9 Level 5. Neumann and Cortez respond to the call. Nurse Katie hiding behind a desk points out the insomniac miner from before is holding Dr. Tom Sciarello at gunpoint with a laser cutter, raving about what he sees at night while he cant sleep. Neumann attempts to appease the miner into putting the cutter down, but instead he fires it wildly around. Cortez shoots him in the shoulder and tackles him to the ground while Neumann tends to the doctor. As he regains his senses, he notices with horror that Katie has been cut in half across the torso.Some time before, Carthusia is in his office talking to Captain Matthius of the Ishimura via video call, who has just received unspecified orders from an authority higher than the government. Carthusia, a third-generation Unitologist, realizes this refers to the church of Unitology. Matthius assigns Carthusia the task of protecting the Marker at all costs until the Ishimura arrives. Carthusia is pleased to hear the structure is confirmed as a marker. Lastly, Deacon Abbot and a few fellow believers take a mole to see the Marker for themselves. Against his comrades wishes, Abbot defiantly touches the Marker, and has a vision of his deceased mother, who implores him not to let them take it. When he comes to his senses, he believes he had caught a glimpse of the other side.Issue TwoDr. Tom Sciarello is at a press conference at Union Square mourning the death of Katie, his nurse and assistant of five years. He mentions that her call to P-SEC saved his life and that he would willingly trade it back for hers. As he says this, Katie appears as an apparition and tells Tom that he has more important things to do, that hes gotta stop them. In shock, Tom breaks down and is escorted off the podium.Some time later that morning, Sergeant Abraham Neumann of P-SEC visits his partner Detective Vera Cortez at her home, Apartment 35, Row 7-A. She has developed insomnia and been late to shifts for the past 3 days. Shes been taking sedatives, and, just like other miners the pair have arrested, that doesnt always work. When Neumann makes a joke about Cortezs faith, she throws him out of her apartment.Meanwhile, Colony Manager Hanford Carthusia reprimands Deacon Abbot about his unauthorized visit to the Marker from his office via video call, claiming its a major archaeological find and that its status as a Marker is still to be determined. He adds that if Abbot goes near the Marker again, he will be deported back to Earth. Abbot is outraged how a fellow Unitologist is preventing them from practicing their faiths, yet Carthusia merely replies that he doesnt want them to stop believing, just for them to stay away from the marker. Just as Carthusia ends the call, Dr. Sciarello arrives to see him. Dr. Sciarello urges Carthusia to make the insomnia problem their top priority and points out that the problem started ever since the Marker was found. He requests that he be allowed to examine it, but Carthusia refuses and asks the Doctor to leave, but not before asking him where Katies body is. Sciarello claims its in the morgue, but when he asks Carthusia why he asked, the latter sends him away.At Dig Site GL-426, Natalia Deshinov once again shows her astonishment at the find to her partner Jerry. Deacon Abbot arrives with a group of people demanding to get closer to the Marker. Natalia politely rebuffs them, but then Abbot tells her about the vision he had, claiming it means the Marker is the real deal. He then politely requests to be let in, which Natalia accepts, but Jerry still refuses, citing the fact that Abbot was singled out by Carthusia. Abbot finally backs down, claiming the group will stay behind the security cordon to pray.Meanwhile Dr. Sciarello and Sergeant Neumann are en route to the dig site. Sciarello thanks the Sergeant for helping him, and the latter claims its because he also has suspicions about the rock. Sciarello is glad to hear someone NOT call it the Marker and the Sergeant once again voices his disdain about Unitology. When Sciarello asks about Cortez, Neumann claims she has the same insomnia as the other miners and had a falling out. However when asked if it was because of her faith, Neumann replies No. Because shes an idiot.Sciarello and Neumann arrive at the dig site. Neumann, seeing the Marker for the first time, is astonished. Natalia doesnt allow the two to get any closer but then Neumann spots Cortez amongst Abbots group, despite thinking she was sick in her apartment. Cortez replies that Abbot told her to go to the dig site instead and that she feels better already. Once again, Cortez and Neumann get into an argument about her beliefs, with Neumann claiming he lost his wife to their fucked up cult. Neumann then attempts to bring Cortez back to the colony for a psychiatric evaluation before Abbot stops him and Natalias security group orders Neumann to leave due to him disturbing the prayer group. Neumann asks Sciarello what just happened, but the Doctor merely states he doesnt want to be near the Marker for a second longer.On the return trip, Sciarello finds his scanner didnt detect anything unusual, despite scanning for every possible kind of reading: As far as science is concerned, its just a rock. Neumann states he worked with Cortez in three colonies and that just wasnt her. He claims hes certain that the Marker is the cause of all this and Schiarello states this cant go on.Back at P-SEC, Marla shows Neumann an unauthorized vid-log of the Marker. She comments on the glowing symbols, noticing some are repeated, like some sort of code or language and have similarities to advanced mathematics. Neumann laughs off these theories pointing out the Unitologists have tried to decipher the first Marker for centuries to no avail. Marla says maybe a fresh perspective is all it needs.At the same time, Carthusia is in his office talking to a security guard (and fellow Unitologist), wishing to know who made that vid-log. He orders the guard and his team to relieve Natalias team from guarding the Marker and arrest them if they refuse.The guard and his team then arrive at the dig site, telling Natalia that they are all relieved of duty and placed under arrest due to Carthusias suspicion that the vid-log was made by one of them. Natalia rebuffs all these accusations then suddenly draws a plasma cutter and kills the guard. When Jerry tries to calm Natalia down, she says she wont let them hurt it and even if they kill her Hed see her again. This ends up distracting Natalia long enough for one of the other guards to knock her unconscious.Later on, Neumann and his Commander are urging Carthusia to have the colony evacuated. Carthusia replies this is unacceptable, due to the mining operation having already cost several billions of dollars only to be abandoned 3 weeks before planet crack due to the death of a few miners. Carthusia adds that in 4 days, the Marker will be lifted into the colony then transferred onto the Ishimura when it arrives. Neumann is outraged at the thought of the Marker being brought into the colony, only for Carthusia to end the call. When Neumann asks the Commander what to do, he merely replies Brace ourselves. Issue Three Sergeant Abraham Neumann comments to Dr. Tom Sciarello how half the colony is walking around like its the end of the world. Sciarello recalls his vision of Katies ghost: he claims that despite being a life long atheist and skeptic and convinced the vision was an hallucination, if he were a spiritual man, hed be praying right now. Neumann is befuddled how a group of blue-collar miners can get so worked up over a rock, but Sciarello points out its the same thing as doing so about a chalice or a scroll. He adds that Hanford Carthusia finally allowed him access to Natalia Deshinov and plans to question her.Meanwhile, Deacon Abbott addresses an enormous crowd of Unitologists in a vehicle maintenance bay. He claims that everyone has a theory about the Markers purpose and origins but that Unitology has the truth: that the Marker is talking to them. He cites the growing depression felt amongst the miners since the Marker as proof of this: the Marker is preparing them, making them have thoughts of death and the realization that material life is unimportant.Later on, Dr. Sciarello arrives at Natalias holding cell. In a panic, she tells the doctor that every night, even when she cant sleep, she dreams about killing people. She adds that they have to leave the planet before attempting to strangle Sciarello. The holding cells guard then enters and subdues Natalia, who begs him to kill her while Sciarello looks in disbelief.At P-SEC, Marla tells Neumann to go to Union Square, where Abbott will be giving a speech. Abbott is jubilant at the fact that the Marker is about to be moved into the colony and tells the crowd about this glorious day and how they will be waiting for the chance to ascend and become one with God. He instructs the crowd to await the voice of God. Neumann spots Detective Vera Cortez in the crowd and once again tries to convince her to go home, citing Abbotts speech as proof that he is crazy but Cortez doesnt listen. Marla informs Neumann that the Marker is being placed inside the colony as they speak. Suddenly, everyone in the crowd of Unitologists draws out weapons and a deafening high pitched noise is heard, causing pain to everyone in the area. Abbott orders the crowd to listen to the voice of God and prepare themselves, at which point everyone in the crowd points their guns at their heads. Neumann tries to stop Cortez from doing so but she calmly replies Dont worry Braham. See you soon. The crowd, along with Abbott and Cortez then commits suicide. Carthusia watches this gruesome sight from his office and smiles.Later on, P-SEC officers Jones and McCabe go to check on the Marker. Foreman Barrow, the foreman responsible for the Markers transport, informs them everyone involved in transporting has felt sick, with one person even throwing up and collapsing. Barrow is unaware of what happened in Union Square and the officers inform him. Meanwhile, Captain Matthius is once again talking to Carthusia via video call. He demands that the bodies of the Union Square crowd be frozen so they can be in top condition when the Ishimura arrives. Carthusia asks if it makes any difference but Mathhias replies Better safe than sorry. All recumbents of the Church are treated the same way. Carthusia ensures the captain will get his cemetery and the Captain states that their future is depending on it and urges Carthusia to not let them down.Elsewhere in a megavent, a technician (later named as Supervisor Cameron) is leading Neumann far along the vent to show him something he found in the vent; a strange foul-smelling blob. Neumann attempts to collect a sample when suddenly, to his surprise, the blob moves. Neumann then starts burning the blob despite the technicians warning that the vent feeds into the entire colony. Neumann responds Exactly. Neumann leaves while Cameron resumes the job.Back in P-SEC, Jones and McCabe are looking at a large list of recent assaults and murders commenting they have never seen anything like this. Neumann arrives and Jones and McCabe inform him about the Markers status. Neumann looks at the list and notices that apart from the mass suicide, there havent been any violent crimes that day. Neumann asks about Marla and they tell him she went home sick from a headache.Meanwhile, Dr. Sciarello arrives at the apartment of Mrs. Fencher, who called him due to being concerned about her husband. She claims her husband was one of the members of the dig team that uncovered the Marker, and hasnt been himself ever since. Sciarello enters Mr. Fenchers room and finds the walls completely covered in scribbles like the Markers symbols, and phrases like Altman Be Praised and THE MARKER WILL SET US FREE. Sciarello finds Mr. Fencher in the corner babbling maniacally about the key and Death being the answer. When Sciarello approaches to give him a sedative, Mr. Fencher starts strangling him and screaming Kill! KILL! DEATH!, only to be saved by Mrs. Fencher who injects him with the sedative. Sciarello then compares this to the incident with Natasha and the suicides in Union Square. Mrs. Fencher asks whats going on and if her husband will be all right, only for Sciarello to reply that apparently right now no one can figure it out.At Carthusias office, Neumann once again confronts the Colony Manager, demanding they abort the operation. Carthusia once again refuses with the same argument as before. Neumann then shows Carthusia a list of all the deaths since the colony started: in the past two and a half years, only 3 deaths had occurred (all working accidents). After the Marker was found, 65 deaths. Carthusia dismissively states that 52 of those were suicides only for Neumann to once again plead for Carthusia to stop this before its too late. Carthusia replies its already too late. Even if he wanted to abort the operation he no longer has the authority to do so: the Ishimura has arrived and Captain Matthius has taken control of the operation.Issue FourIssue Four starts with Neumann and Dr. Sciarello walking along a hallway, discussing how things are after the marker has been taken up to the ship. While Neumann states that crimes have gone down, Sciarello replies that Almost 20% percent of the staff have psych problems. When they reach their destination Neumann wonders If shes not cured why did Sciarello take her out of the secure chambers? Sciarello replies that Shes not dangerous anymore, but far from cured. We quickly discover that Natalia Deshinov is inside the room. They enter the room, with Natalia asking whos the cop? Neumann notes that Natalia seems kinda cheery for a nut-case. Sciarello answers that it comes and goes.After they leave, Neumann asks about the writing on the walls, which Sciarello points out he has seen with numerous others who have come into contact with the Marker.  Neumann hastily leaves, saying he has a friend who would want to know about this.  On his way he receives a call from Supervisor Cameron who tells him he has found more of the strange alien growths in the megavents again, only this time theres a lot more of it (covering an entire wall).  Camerons assistant Lambert arrives late due to another case of insomnia, and questions if the stuff grew there overnight, to which Cameron replies Yeah, and you can make up for bein late by gettin down in those vents and burnin it off.Carthusia is speaking with the Captain about the status of the Marker and bodies, stating that the Marker is on its way and the murder victims will be on the second shuttle, the suicides will be on a third that will leave soon.  Carthusia is excited about the events about to take place only to learn that he will not be joining the Ishimura as Matthius points out that the colony is out of control and does not want the same madness to affect his crew.  He says he will issue a no-fly order between ship and planetside once the bodies are on board. An outraged Carthusia refuses to bring the bodies up himself, saying if Matthias wants them hell have to break his own order and get them himself.Neumann brings Marla to see Natalia.  Natalia rambles on saying theres no turning back, you dont understand, and death is the key.  Marla is stunned at the sight of all the writing on the walls.Neumann once again tries to warn Carthusia about the situation, showing him the video from the hub of the megavents.  He points out that only a small piece of it existed a week earlier, and now the entire hub is covered with it.  He fruitlessly attempts to convince Carthusia that there is a hostile alien life form on the planet that they somehow missed in the initial sweep and its infecting the colony.  He once again dismisses him completely and planet-crack will proceed according to schedule in the morning.Neumann comes to see Marla.  She is writing something down, convinced she knows what the Marker is, that it has something to do with DNA but is still working on the specifics.  Much to Neumanns chagrin, she is still obsessed about it and refuses to leave until shes finished. Planet-crack is about to start, with everyone getting ready.  The order is then given and as it starts, a flash occurs and the colony undergoes a blackout, resulting in the colonists starting to panic.  Neumann loses contact with Marla and cannot reach control.  Sciarello notes that the backup generators should have turned on by now.  He then spots Katies ghost, and she tells him Theres no time, Tom.  I tried to warn you.  Now its too late.  As Neumann desperately tries to get through the crowds, Natalia exits her room and Cameron notes the problem with the comm, calling out to Lambert, but receiving no response.  He goes to investigate and warns hims that he better not have fallen asleep but only finds his radio in the strange alien flesh.  As he calls out to him again, a horrific creature (referred to in Dead Space as a Necromorph) jumps out of a nearby vent and attacks him (most likely killing him).Neumann arrives at Marlas apartment and she asks about whats going on.  He warns her to get her gun as he has a bad feeling about whats going on.  She says that she had just realized something about the Marker when the power went out but Neumann interrupts her and says that they need to get to HQ and see what happened.Carthusia has reached the morgue to visit the suicide bodies, apologizing that they couldnt join the others and that hes not sure if there will be another chance.  The lights finally come on but the comm is still down.Neumann and Marla reach the HQ.  She questions the whereabouts of everybody and Neumann hopes that theyre heading for the shuttle bay if they have any sense.  They enter the HQ to find much to their horror that everyone is dead, including Jones, McCabe and the Commander.  He spots some of the alien flesh again, pointing out it got there pretty fast from the vents.Dr. Sciarello receives a distress call asking for help, telling him theres mass panic and people are dying.  Sciarello is interrupted by what sounds like a scream from the hall and goes to investigate, confused at first that theres nobody there but then finds bodies that have been torn to shreds.Neumann is stunned by the condition of the bodies and Marla warns him not to touch them.  He agrees saying that they should call the ME but she says that they need to leave.  She once again points out that she knows what the carvings on the Marker mean, it is in fact a set of instructions for altering DNA.  As this is happening, back at the Morgue, Carthusia promises the suicide victims that their time will come and that hell see to it himself.  Neumann states that DNA doesnt walk around and kill people, but she points out that it does if its recombinant (confusing Neumann), explaining that they mutate genes at a cellular level, like a cancer or virus.  Carthusia tells the bodies that they will all ascend soon.  Marla continues her explanation of the Marker that this particular recombinant DNA only spreads through specific target vectors.  This confuses Neumann once more and she yells Necrotic flesh Braham, it infects dead bodies!  At the morgue, Carthusia says Altman be praised as a Necromorph approaches him from behind.Issue FiveThe story picks up from where Issue Four left off.  Neumann is still confused about the situation with the Marker and what it does.  All right, fine, so it mutates dead bodies, but what killed them in the first place?  This... stuff?  Marla replies that shes not sure.  She attempts to call the Ishimura but with no luck as the comm is still down.  They both watch in disgust as one of the bodies starts to mutate and its ribcage appears to rip itself open.  Marla receives a distress call which she at first tries to put on hold but the caller yells ... are dying down here! Were being attacked! Theyre coming ...!  Marla is at first confused by who their attackers are.  When Neumann sees the creature start to move he tackles Marla to the floor in fear of her safety, but she points out that it wasnt after her, it was going for another corpse to reproduce again.  Neumann starts shooting the creature, swearing to kill Carthusia if he sees him again.Back at the morgue, Carthusia says Im ready. Take me.  And almost as if on command the Necromorph impales him through the chest.  It leaves the morgue for the hallway.  At Avenue B7 North Sector 3 we meet the caller of the distress signal.  Further, he exclaims People are dying down here!  Were being attacked!  Theyre coming right out of the walls! but loses the signal and is cut off from further communication as a Necromorph attacks him.Neumann at first thinks hes succeeded at killing the creature, only to see that the newly infected corpse has now mutated into a Necromorph.  He shoots it as well but the bullets have no effect on it.  Marla gets an idea to use an overturned table to trap it against the wall.  But they realize that the first one is still alive and is infecting another corpse and the current one is not as trapped as they thought.  Neumann grabs an axe and cuts off the Necromorphs head, believing it to be dead but they realize the first one will just keep making new ones so they decide to leave.  He tries to call Dr. Sciarello but cant get a hold of him.  He says they need to head for Union Square and get everyone out and head for the shuttle bay.  Marla points out that theres a no-fly order in place and Matthias will have a fit.  Neumann simply states Then Ive got two balls for his chin, because were not staying here.Sciarello and a few others are seen running for the Med-Labs trying to figure out the situation themselves.  One doctor explains they need to be at the Med-Labs as thats where people will expect them to be if they need help.  Sciarello reluctantly agrees.  They enter the morgue and Sciarello sees that the suicide victims are all gone, pointing out to the others that Carthusia kept them here, against Sciarellos wishes.  Sciarello starts to wash up when he feels a drip on his head, at first believing it to be a leak, only to his horror to discover a Necromorph hanging from the ceiling, which proceeds to impale him through the forehead.At Union Square the colonist are in mass panic and are waiting for the trams, but the one that arrives is already full.  The conductor attempts to convince them that it wont support the weight if any more get on, but the colonists are worried that theyll be dead before the next one comes.  Natalia is seen heading in the opposite direction, which one of the colonists points out that its her funeral, to which she responds Yes, I suppose it is.  Marla and Neumann arrive and he attempts to organize the crowd but Marla stops him.  She thinks they should head for the shuttle bay on foot and help out with those on the way.  The tram is about to leave as the conductor is finally able to keep them off, but he notices someone climbing on top.  He attempts to warn them to get off, only to realize its not a human.  The crowd becomes more panicked than before.  Neumann calls out telling the crowd to follow him as the Necromorphs start to attack.At East Sector 2, Level 1, Natalia is slowly walking along the halls infested with the alien flesh and dead bodies.  Among which are Necromorphs hidden in vents and behind doors, ready to attack.  Natalias fate is not yet revealed.At South Sector 4, Level 6, Neumann and Marla are leading the surviving colonists from Union Square.  One of them asks What the fuck are those things?  Neumann replies You wouldnt believe me if I told you.  At first the colonist replies angrily but Neumann tells him that theyre hostile and that bullets are ineffective against them.  They come up to a closed door and Neumann cant get it open.  Marla takes a look at it while the other colonists ask to find another way but Neumann shrugs the idea off as the only other path is a two-hour walk.  The two hours apparently looks good to them when the door opens.  Beyond the door is a room littered with bodies and the smaller Necromorphs move around to infect them.  Neumann states that they can move through safe if they go quietly and quickly, as the creatures are too busy with the already dead bodies to bother them.  The colonists are scared to do so as they witness the creatures eating the corpses.  One of the colonists heads in to save someone he recognizes, kicking the creature off of the body, only to realize that the body is already infected.  The body has mutated, and a nurse questions what it is.  Marla simply responds Its a sign.  A sign that we just ran out of time.  Run!Issue SixThe final comic begins with the colonist who was investigating an infected body getting impaled by the now-infected person, who has transformed into a necromorph. Marla and Neumann begin to lead the group away through the Necromorphs, but many of the colonists are slaughtered in the escape. As Neumann gets through the door leading out, he draws his gun, and Marla reminds him that shooting them has no effect. He replies by saying Who said anything about shooting them?! He then aims at a rack of oxygen tanks and shoots them as the door closes, creating a large explosion. Neumann and Marla arrive at a door to the shuttle bay with the survivors and one of them complains about how everything is the Unitologists fault. As Marla opens the door, a huge crowd is seen trying desperately to get into the few remaining shuttles. The scene cuts to Natalia Deshinov still walking the halls and writing symbols from the Marker on the walls in blood. Back at the shuttle bay, Marla says that only five shuttles are left, and that it is probably a 30 minute round trip for them to return for more passengers. Another shuttle takes off with more passengers, while onboard, the pilot and a passenger begin to argue about the excess payload of passengers. Neumann notices that the shuttle begins to rock back and forth from too many people onboard and the pilot and passenger get into a fight, resulting in the pilot being knocked out and the shuttle loses control. The shuttle soon after promptly falls and crashes into the launching bay, destroying it and most of the other shuttles. Neumann and the colonists express their frustration while Marla suggests to Neumann that she can maybe get a better communication signal to the Ishimura from the main communication needle. Neumann tries to dissuade her, saying it is too long of a walk. She refuses however, and they leave the launch bay to go try to get a signal. The scene then switches again to Natalia driving a rover to the edge of a cliff (possibly the site of the planet-crack) and marveling at the view before saying Im ready. Make me whole. She then jumps off the cliff, killing herself. Meanwhile, Marla and Neumann make their way into the comm. needle, with Marla telling him that there are no permanent staff at the needle. They find a door inside to be open, which is strange, since no one works at the needle. Neumann then states that something might have gotten inside before they did. More of the growth from earlier in the story happens to be prevalent in the room, and Neumann urges Marla to find a terminal. She then becomes stressed, saying that the orange-like growth might have killed the power and she would have to re-route power. Neumann calms her saying Youre a genius, remember? They are interrupted by a noise from the power room and they soon find out that inside of it the growth has greatly increased, with more Necromorphs inside. Neumann quickly loses concentration when he sees his deceased partner Vera Cortezs body sticking out of the growth. The Necromorphs in the room begin to approach, and Marla snaps him out of it. Neumann dashes back through the door, with Marla right behind him, who is struck down by a Necromorph. She gets up and attempts to run, but is impaled through the chest from behind. A dying Marla hits the close button to the door, saving Neumann but leaving her to be torn apart by the Necromorphs.As Neumann succumbs to his loss, the scene cuts to his security vid-log from Issue One. He says that Marla died 12 hours before he made the vid-log, and he has not seen another sign of life for the last six hours. He then states (maniacally grinning) that They say there are no Atheists in foxholes? Well after this, its more like the other way around. He then leaves the vid-log recording and walks away, saying to whoever may find it Dont come looking for me. You may not like what you find, ending the comic series.Dead Space: ExtractionThis is a oneshot issue that accompanied the Wii game, Space: Extraction. It is a prequel comic to the prequel game. The events occur before Isaac arrived on the Ishimura and revolves around Nicole Brennans journey to survival of the infection.(http://www.antonyjohnston.com/titles/deadspaceextractioncomic/) Characters * P-SEC - Planetside Security, the local colony law enforcement. Major characters * Sergeant Abraham Neumann - A devoted P-SEC operative and protagonist of the comic books events; he is usually called Braham by his co-workers. He staunchly disagrees, even resents Unitology, making it somewhat ironic that his friend and partner is a Unitologist herself. He mentions having lost his wife to Unitologys beliefs. After losing everyone close to him and soon losing contact with everyone else, he appears to be on the verge of insanity by the end of the series. The last we see of him he is walking away from the video log he was previously recording, presumably to his death. In the game, Isaac Clarke finds an audio excerpt of a message Neuman makes after the shuttles crash in issue five.* Dr. Tom Sciarello - The local colony doctor, a sound atheist and very confused by events of the story, including experiencing visions of dead friends. In the fifth issue, Sciarello is impaled through the forehead by a Necromorph hanging from the ceiling of the Morgue. An audio log found on the Ishimura has one of the medical staff members compare his situation of the insanity caused in the crew members to the one Sciarello faces on the colony.* Hanford Carthusia - The manager of the colony, a third-generation Unitologist and constant thorn in the side of Neumanns investigation. In the end of the fourth issue, he is approached from behind by a Necromorph, continued in the fifth issue where Carthusia allows himself to be impaled through the chest by it.* Necromorphs - The main antagonists in the Dead Space series, they do not appear until Issue Zero (but not officially until the end of Issue Four). Their exact origin is unknown or at least unrevealed. They exist in multiple forms but only two types are seen in the animated comics. According to Marla, the Marker has a series of carvings that are actually a code for recombinant DNA, and it mutates genes at a cellular level once the host is dead. The suicides being prime targets as they were exposed the longest, they mutated and started walking shortly after the planet-crack. The Necromorphs attack humans (and possibly other sentient beings) and kill them, leaving them to be infected by another type of Necromorph that crawls around. After mutation, the body appears to rip itself open and develop extra limbs that are used to impale and tear apart their victims. From what is seen in the Fifth Issue, Necromorphs are not greatly affected from bullets, which would explain the need for a weapon to dismember them, which Neumann accomplishes with an axe (however, it is possible he may have only stunned the creature as he cut off its head, and according to the game designers, decapitation is often not enough to kill them and it would probably just make their attacks more frenzied, which in Neumanns case would have been hindered as they had trapped the creature behind an overturned table). Alien flesh that has been spotted in several locations of the colony, particularly the megavents, seems to have some sort of connection with the Necromorphs, which in the game turn out to be part of the Hive Mind. Minor characters * Detective Vera Cortez - Neumanns partner and practitioner of Unitology, a fictional religion within the story. She develops insomnia, eventually becoming increasingly unstable, and takes part in a mass suicide with other Unitologists. To Neumanns horror, he sees her one last time at the end of the sixth issue, as part of the Necromorph flesh in the com needle.* Deakin Abbot - A First-Class C.E.C. engineer and high-level Unitologist. He is the first to experience strange visions, and leads the mass suicide.* Jen Barrows - The leader of the mining team that discovered the Marker.* Natalia Deshyanov - The leader of the team dispatched to protect the Marker. She develops a fanatical devotion for protecting the Marker, even at the cost of her own life. She is later placed into protective custody.  At the end of the sixth issue she commits suicide by jumping off a cliff, saying Im ready. Make me whole.* Captain Matthius - The Captain of the Ishimura. He has frequent communications with Carthusia, requesting that corpses be delivered to the Ishimura upon its arrival. His fate at the end of the comics is unknown, although most likely alive since the Necromorph infection had not yet spread to the Ishimura. He is last seen in issue four, talking to Carthusia via video communication. His death is depicted twice in the Space series. Once by Dr. Kyne, who considers it an accidental killing in an attempt to sedate Matthius as he exhibited symptoms of delirium as seen in a video log and Space: Downfall, where it confirms that the death was an accidental death. Captain Matthius appears in the Dead Space game as a Necromorph who is killed by Isaac, seeking Matthius RIG.* Supervisor Cameron - A technician working in the colonys megavents. He is the one who discovered the strange alien growths in the ventilation system and warned Neumann about it. He is later attacked and likely killed by a Necromorph.* Marla - The P-SEC go-to girl. It is implied that she and Neumann are in a relationship. She has an interest in Unitology, more specifically the Marker. She devises that the markings on it are a code for DNA and that it infects dead bodies, mutating them.  In the sixth issue after the shuttles are destroyed she comes up with a plan to radio the up to the Ishimura and call for help, bypassing the problem with the comm by heading straight for the comm needle, but upon reaching the needle she realizes that the alien flesh is probably the cause of all the problems with it and that her job would be ten times harder. Upon investigating an open door, she is attacked and killed by Necromorphs.* Katie - Toms assistant and nurse. She is killed by a stray cutting beam, and later seen in a vision of Toms. She warns Tom and Neumann of the imminent doom they are to encounter.* Jerry - A member of Natalias team.  His fate is unknown, though it is most likely he was killed along with the rest of the colony.   * Jones and McCabe - Fellow P-SEC operatives.  They are both killed by the end of the fourth issue.NotesReferences***Dead Space review at Bookalicious.netSpace (komiks)
18118852
Benjamin_Pickard
Benjamin Pickard (26 or 28 February 1842  3 February 1904) was a British coal miner, trade unionist and LibLab politician.Early life and familyPickard was born in Kippax near Wakefield in Yorkshire the son of a collier. He commenced work as a pit-boy at the age of twelve years. He earned a reputation as a studious boy and attended Kippax Grammar School. He also received religious training as a Wesleyan, becoming a local preacher and was connected throughout his life with the Lords Rest Day Association. He was associated from an early age with the trade union movement becoming lodge secretary at the age of sixteen. In 1864 he married Hannah Elizabeth Freeman of Kippax and they had four sons and four daughters. His wife died in 1901.Trade Union officialIn 1873 he was appointed assistant secretary of the West Yorkshire Miners Association and in 1876 he became Secretary. He was responsible for uniting the West and South Yorkshire Miners Associations into one body in 1881 and he became the first Secretary of the newly formed Yorkshire Miners Association. In 1877 he had become assistant secretary of the Miners National Union and was a leading player in the foundation of the Miners Federation of Great Britain, of which he was elected the first president.In 1893 Pickard led the miners in the biggest industrial dispute the country had hitherto seen. The most important result of a combined strike and lockout was the establishment of a Board of Conciliation to address problems arising in the industry and most disputes over the coming years were settled using this machinery. He played an active part in the obtaining of legislation in the mining industry including the Eight Hours Bill, restricting the length of time miners could be made to work underground, although it did not become law until after his death.International workPickard was active in the establishment of the International Federation of Mineworkers in 1890. He organised six international congresses of miners from Britain, Germany, Austria, France and Belgium which were held in Paris, Jolimont (Switzerland), Brussels, Berlin, Aix-la-Chapelle and London.  He also attended about eighteen Congresses of Trade Unions. In 1897 his interest in arbitration and the work of the Society led to his inclusion in a peace deputation to the president of the United States, Cleveland.PoliticsIn addition to his commitment to the interests of organised labour, Pickard was known as an ardent liberal. He served as a member of the Wakefield school board from 1881 until 1885 and in 1889 he was appointed an alderman of the West Riding County Council on which he was a co-opted member. He was re-elected alderman again in 1895 and 1901.In 1885 the Yorkshire Miners Association came to an agreement with the Liberal Party allowing them to nominate the candidate for elections to Parliament for the Normanton division of Yorkshire, a constituency where over 60% of the electorate were coal miners. Pickard was selected and won the seat at each election under this arrangement from 1885 until his death in 1904. In return he generally supported the Liberals in Parliament.DeathPickard died of heart failure in Westminster, having been ill for some time previously.References*Obituary in The Times, 4 February 1904*Who was Who, OUP 2007*John Benson, article about Pickard in Dictionary of National Biography, OUP 200408 External links * 
18146577
Japanese_Bolivian
Japanese Bolivian (, Japanese: Nikkei Boribiajin) is a Bolivian-born person of Japanese ancestry.HistorySince Bolivia has no coast, the first Japanese settlers came from neighboring Peru where their contracts ended prior to the 1950s. Most Japanese settlers had origins from Okinawa, while the rest from Gifu, Hiroshima, Kanagawa, and Osaka prefectures. In 1899, River Region in La Paz experienced the first entrance of 91 Japanese workers assigned for rubber plantations. Since then, Mountains continued to attract few more hundreds of Japanese laborers, who luckily caught work in mining and railroad construction. The inland River region appeared as the second main destination for the workers, who also came through Peru to work on rubber plantations in northwestern Bolivia. The end of War I and Depression shifted Japanese workers in the rubber and mining industries respectively. The only places in Bolivia that survived changes were the town of Riberalta and La Paz, which served as the Japanese commercial activities. In 1930s, most Japanese remained as settlers and many brought wives from their home country while most married local women; these made difference that divided the community.When War II began, only 29 Japanese Bolivians were deported to States. But because more than that, the war had not much effect on the lives of residents of Japanese descent in Bolivia, since the local government did not make anti-Japanese measures. Since the end of the war, the government warmly permitted Japanese refugees. Treaties after 1954 guided in a new chapter of Japanese Bolivian history and the massive influx of agricultural settlers from U.S.-controlled Okinawa and mainland Japan. The need of relocating surplus populations from war-torn Japan met the Bolivian governments wish to develop the eastern lower lands in Cruz Department. With the financial help of the Japanese government, the Colonia Okinawa and Colonia San Juan de Yapacan were established; the two settlements formed the distinctive communities with separate identitiesone Okinawan and the other mainland Japanesethat are also currently in transition from the immigrant to the Bolivian-born generation.LanguageFirst-generation Japanese settlers generally use Japanese in their daily discourse, and cannot speak Spanish fluently. Subsequent generations had a decreased fluency in the Japanese language, which was attributed to the absence of Japanese-language schools in communes, and speak Spanish more fluently than the first-generation settlers.(Kikumura-Yano (2002), p. 103)ReligionA study done by an Cheistopher Reichl and Thompson in the 1960s among the Japanese settlers at San Juan de Yapacan noted that 32% of the Japanese were Buddhist, with an equal number being Roman Catholics. A minority identified themselves as members of Gakkai or Shinto. The majority of the Japanese Catholics converted to the faith after reaching Bolivia. Conversion to Catholicism among the Japanese community increased during the 20th century, which Thompson noted was due to the absence of strong Shinto or Buddhist religious institutions which the settlers could emphasise their faith. Among the non-Japanese Christians, some first and second-generation settlers maintained household Shinto shrines, although the sizeable majority became agnostic in religious outlook.(Masterson/Funada-Classen (2004), p. 195-6)Notable Japanese Bolivians* Yoshida - Ambassador to Japan, former Chancellor of Bolivia* Nagatani Morishita - Presidential Candidate* Shimose  essayist, professor, and poetReferences Bibliography* Kikumura-Yano, Akemi (2002), Encyclopedia of Japanese Descendants in the Americas: An Illustrated History of the Nikkei, Rowman Altamira, ISBN 0759101493 * Masterson, Daniel M. and Sayaka Funada-Classen. (2004), The Japanese in Latin America: The Asian American Experience. Urbana, Illinois: of Illinois Press. 10-ISBN 0-252-07144-1/13-ISBN 978-0-252-07144-7; OCLC 253466232External links* Migration Historical Overview - Boliviaja:
